


Electronic waste - Wikipedia






















 






Electronic waste

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"WEEE" redirects here. For the EU directive, see Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive.






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: fix References Please help improve this article if you can. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Defective and obsolete electronic equipment


Electronic waste or e-waste describes discarded electrical or electronic devices. Used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal are also considered e-waste. Informal processing of e-waste in developing countries can lead to adverse human health effects and environmental pollution.
Electronic scrap components, such as CPUs, contain potentially harmful components such as lead, cadmium, beryllium, or brominated flame retardants. Recycling and disposal of e-waste may involve significant risk to health of workers and communities in developed countries[1] and great care must be taken to avoid unsafe exposure in recycling operations and leaking of materials such as heavy metals from landfills and incinerator ashes.[2]



Contents


1 Definition
2 Amount of electronic waste worldwide
3 Global trade issues

3.1 Trade
3.2 Guiyu
3.3 Other informal e-waste recycling sites


4 Environmental impact
5 Information security
6 E-waste management

6.1 Recycling


7 Recycling

7.1 Consumer awareness efforts
7.2 Processing techniques
7.3 Benefits of recycling


8 Electronic waste substances

8.1 Hazardous
8.2 Generally non-hazardous


9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Definition[edit]












Hoarding (left), disassembling (center) and collecting (right) electronic waste in Bengaluru, India


"Electronic waste" or "E-Waste" may be defined as discarded computers, office electronic equipment, entertainment device electronics, mobile phones, television sets, and refrigerators. This includes used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal. Others are re-usables (working and repairable electronics) and secondary scrap (copper, steel, plastic, etc.) to be "commodities", and reserve the term "waste" for residue or material which is dumped by the buyer rather than recycled, including residue from reuse and recycling operations, because loads of surplus electronics are frequently commingled (good, recyclable, and non-recyclable), several public policy advocates apply the term "e-waste" broadly to all surplus electronics. Cathode ray tubes (CRTs) are considered one of the hardest types to recycle.[3]
CRTs have relatively high concentration of lead and phosphors (not to be confused with phosphorus), both of which are necessary for the display. The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) includes discarded CRT monitors in its category of "hazardous household waste"[4] but considers CRTs that have been set aside for testing to be commodities if they are not discarded, speculatively accumulated, or left unprotected from weather and other damage.
The EU and its member states operate a system via the European Waste Catalogue (EWC)- a European Council Directive, which is interpreted into "member state law". In the UK, this is in the form of the List of Wastes Directive. However, the list (and EWC) gives broad definition (EWC Code 16 02 13*) of Hazardous Electronic wastes, requiring "waste operators" to employ the Hazardous Waste Regulations (Annex 1A, Annex 1B) for refined definition. Constituent materials in the waste also require assessment via the combination of Annex II and Annex III, again allowing operators to further determine whether a waste is hazardous.[5]
Debate continues over the distinction between "commodity" and "waste" electronics definitions. Some exporters are accused of deliberately leaving difficult-to-recycle, obsolete, or non-repairable equipment mixed in loads of working equipment (though this may also come through ignorance, or to avoid more costly treatment processes). Protectionists may broaden the definition of "waste" electronics in order to protect domestic markets from working secondary equipment.
The high value of the computer recycling subset of electronic waste (working and reusable laptops, desktops, and components like RAM) can help pay the cost of transportation for a larger number of worthless pieces than can be achieved with display devices, which have less (or negative) scrap value. In A 2011 report, "Ghana E-Waste Country Assessment",[6] found that of 215,000 tons of electronics imported to Ghana, 30% were brand new and 70% were used. Of the used product, the study concluded that 15% was not reused and was scrapped or discarded. This contrasts with published but uncredited claims that 80% of the imports into Ghana were being burned in primitive conditions.
Amount of electronic waste worldwide[edit]




A fragment of discarded circuit board.


Rapid changes in technology, changes in media (tapes, software, MP3), falling prices, and planned obsolescence have resulted in a fast-growing surplus of electronic waste around the globe. Technical solutions are available, but in most cases, a legal framework, a collection, logistics, and other services need to be implemented before a technical solution can be applied.
Display units (CRT, LCD, LED monitors), processors (CPU, GPU, or APU chips), memory (DRAM or SRAM), and audio components have different useful lives. Processors are most frequently out-dated (by software no longer being optimized) and are more likely to become "e-waste" while display units are most often replaced while working without repair attempts, due to changes in wealthy nation appetites for new display technology. This problem could potentially be solved with modular smartphones or Phonebloks. These types of phones are more durable and have the technology to change certain parts of the phone making them more environmentally friendly. Being able to simply replace the part of the phone that is broken will reduce e-waste.[7] An estimated 50 million tons of E-waste are produced each year.[2] The USA discards 30 million computers each year and 100 million phones are disposed of in Europe each year. The Environmental Protection Agency estimates that only 15–20% of e-waste is recycled, the rest of these electronics go directly into landfills and incinerators.[8][9]
In 2006, the United Nations estimated the amount of worldwide electronic waste discarded each year to be 50 million metric tons.[10] According to a report by UNEP titled, "Recycling – from E-Waste to Resources," the amount of e-waste being produced – including mobile phones and computers – could rise by as much as 500 percent over the next decade in some countries, such as India.[11] The United States is the world leader in producing electronic waste, tossing away about 3 million tons each year.[12] China already produces about 2.3 million tons (2010 estimate) domestically, second only to the United States. And, despite having banned e-waste imports, China remains a major e-waste dumping ground for developed countries.[12]
Society today revolves around technology and by the constant need for the newest and most high-tech products we are contributing to mass amount of e-waste.[13] Since the invention of the iPhone, cell phones have become the top source of e-waste products because they are not made to last more than two years. Electrical waste contains hazardous but also valuable and scarce materials. Up to 60 elements can be found in complex electronics.[14] As of 2013, Apple has sold over 796 million iDevices (iPod, iPhone, iPad). Cell phone companies make cell phones that are not made to last so that the consumer will purchase new phones. Companies give these products such short life spans because they know that the consumer will want a new product and will buy it if they make it.[15] In the United States, an estimated 70% of heavy metals in landfills comes from discarded electronics.[16][17]
While there is agreement that the number of discarded electronic devices is increasing, there is considerable disagreement about the relative risk (compared to automobile scrap, for example), and strong disagreement whether curtailing trade in used electronics will improve conditions, or make them worse. According to an article in Motherboard, attempts to restrict the trade have driven reputable companies out of the supply chain, with unintended consequences.[18]
Global trade issues[edit]
See also: Global Waste Trade and Electronic waste by country




Electronic waste is often exported to developing countries.






4.5-volt, D, C, AA, AAA, AAAA, A23, 9-volt, CR2032, and LR44 cells are all recyclable in most countries.






The E-waste centre of Agbogbloshie, Ghana, where electronic waste is burnt and disassembled with no safety or environmental considerations.


One theory is that increased regulation of electronic waste and concern over the environmental harm in nature economies creates an economic disincentive to remove residues prior to export. Critics of trade in used electronics maintain that it is still too easy for brokers calling themselves recyclers to export unscreened electronic waste to developing countries, such as China,[19] India and parts of Africa, thus avoiding the expense of removing items like bad cathode ray tubes (the processing of which is expensive and difficult). The developing countries have become toxic dump yards of e-waste. Proponents of international trade point to the success of fair trade programs in other industries, where cooperation has led to creation of sustainable jobs and can bring affordable technology in countries where repair and reuse rates are higher.
Defenders of the trade[who?] in used electronics say that extraction of metals from virgin mining has been shifted to developing countries. Recycling of copper, silver, gold, and other materials from discarded electronic devices is considered better for the environment than mining. They also state that repair and reuse of computers and televisions has become a "lost art" in wealthier nations and that refurbishing has traditionally been a path to development.
South Korea, Taiwan, and southern China all excelled in finding "retained value" in used goods, and in some cases have set up billion-dollar industries in refurbishing used ink cartridges, single-use cameras, and working CRTs. Refurbishing has traditionally been a threat to established manufacturing, and simple protectionism explains some criticism of the trade. Works like "The Waste Makers" by Vance Packard explain some of the criticism of exports of working product, for example, the ban on import of tested working Pentium 4 laptops to China, or the bans on export of used surplus working electronics by Japan.
Opponents of surplus electronics exports argue that lower environmental and labor standards, cheap labor, and the relatively high value of recovered raw materials leads to a transfer of pollution-generating activities, such as smelting of copper wire. In China, Malaysia, India, Kenya, and various African countries, electronic waste is being sent to these countries for processing, sometimes illegally. Many surplus laptops are routed to developing nations as "dumping grounds for e-waste".[20]
Because the United States has not ratified the Basel Convention or its Ban Amendment, and has few domestic federal laws forbidding the export of toxic waste, the Basel Action Network estimates that about 80% of the electronic waste directed to recycling in the U.S. does not get recycled there at all, but is put on container ships and sent to countries such as China.[21][22][23][24] This figure is disputed as an exaggeration by the EPA, the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, and the World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association.
Independent research by Arizona State University showed that 87–88% of imported used computers did not have a higher value than the best value of the constituent materials they contained, and that "the official trade in end-of-life computers is thus driven by reuse as opposed to recycling".[25]
Trade[edit]
Proponents of the trade say growth of internet access is a stronger correlation to trade than poverty. Haiti is poor and closer to the port of New York than southeast Asia, but far more electronic waste is exported from New York to Asia than to Haiti. Thousands of men, women, and children are employed in reuse, refurbishing, repair, and re-manufacturing, unsustainable industries in decline in developed countries. Denying developing nations access to used electronics may deny them sustainable employment, affordable products, and internet access, or force them to deal with even less scrupulous suppliers. In a series of seven articles for The Atlantic, Shanghai-based reporter Adam Minter describes many of these computer repair and scrap separation activities as objectively sustainable.[26]
Opponents of the trade argue that developing countries utilize methods that are more harmful and more wasteful. An expedient and prevalent method is simply to toss equipment onto an open fire, in order to melt plastics and to burn away non-valuable metals. This releases carcinogens and neurotoxins into the air, contributing to an acrid, lingering smog. These noxious fumes include dioxins and furans. Bonfire refuse can be disposed of quickly into drainage ditches or waterways feeding the ocean or local water supplies.[24]
In June 2008, a container of electronic waste, destined from the Port of Oakland in the U.S. to Sanshui District in mainland China, was intercepted in Hong Kong by Greenpeace.[27] Concern over exports of electronic waste were raised in press reports in India,[28][29] Ghana,[30][31][32] Côte d'Ivoire,[33] and Nigeria.[34]
Guiyu[edit]
Main article: Electronic waste in China
Guiyu in the Shantou region of China is a massive electronic waste processing community.[21][35][36] It is often referred to as the "e-waste capital of the world." Traditionally, Guiyu was an agricultural community; however, in the mid-1990s it transformed into an e-waste recycling center involving over 75% of the local households and an additional 100,000 migrant workers.[37] Thousands of individual workshops employ laborers to snip cables, pry chips from circuit boards, grind plastic computer cases into particles, and dip circuit boards in acid baths to dissolve the precious metals. Others work to strip insulation from all wiring in an attempt to salvage tiny amounts of copper wire.[38] Uncontrolled burning, disassembly, and disposal has led to a number of environmental problems such as groundwater contamination, atmospheric pollution, and water pollution either by immediate discharge or from surface runoff (especially near coastal areas), as well as health problems including occupational safety and health effects among those directly and indirectly involved, due to the methods of processing the waste.
A number of studies have been conducted to measure a number of chemicals associated with informal e-waste recycling in the populations. One study enrolled children from Guiyu and a control site 50 km away to measure blood lead levels (BLLs).[39] The average BLL in Guiyu was 15.3 ug/dL compared to 9.9 ug/dL in the control site. In the United States, the CDC has set a reference level for blood lead at 5 ug/dL.[40] High levels of lead in young children can impact IQ and the development of the central nervous system. The highest concentrations of lead were found in the children of parents whose workshop dealt with circuit boards and the lowest was among those who recycled plastic.[41]
Six of the many villages in Guiyu specialize in circuit-board disassembly, seven in plastics and metals reprocessing, and two in wire and cable disassembly. Greenpeace, an environmental group, sampled dust, soil, river sediment, and groundwater in Guiyu. They found very high levels of toxic heavy metals and organic contaminants in both places.[42] Lai Yun, a campaigner for the group found "over 10 poisonous metals, such as lead, mercury, and cadmium."
Guiyu is only one example of digital dumps but similar places can be found across the world in Nigeria, Ghana, and India.[43] With amounts of e-waste growing rapidly each year urgent solutions are required. While the waste continues to flow into digital dumps like Guiyu, there are measures that can help reduce the flow of e-waste.[44]
A suggested preventative step involves the major electronics firms removing the worst chemicals in their products in order to make them safer and easier to recycle.
Other informal e-waste recycling sites[edit]




A pile of discarded TVs and computer monitors.


Guiyu is likely one of the oldest and largest informal e-waste recycling sites in the world, however, there are many sites worldwide, including India, Ghana, Nigeria, and the Philippines. Most research involving informal e-waste recycling has been done in Guiyu, but there are a handful of studies that describe exposure levels in e-waste workers, the community, and the environment.[citation needed] Bangalore, located in southern India, is often referred as the "Silicon Valley of India" and has a growing informal e-waste recycling sector.[45][46] Hair samples were collected from workers at an e-waste recycling facility and an e-waste recycling slum community in Bangalore.[47] Levels of V, Cr, Mn, Mo, Sn, Tl, and Pb were significantly higher in the workers at the e-waste recycling facility compared to the e-waste workers in the slum community. However, Co, Ag, Cd, and Hg levels were significantly higher in the slum community workers compared to the facility workers. A study in Ghana found higher levels of urinary PAH-metabolites in e-waste workers compared to unexposed controls.[48] They also found a greater frequency of complaints of cough, chest pain, and vertigo from those exposed to emissions from the e-waste recycling processes.
Environmental impact[edit]




Old keyboards and one mouse.


The processes of dismantling and disposing of electronic waste in developing countries led to a number of environmental impacts as illustrated in the graphic. Liquid and atmospheric releases end up in bodies of water, groundwater, soil, and air and therefore in land and sea animals – both domesticated and wild, in crops eaten by both animals and human, and in drinking water.[49]
One study of environmental effects in Guiyu, China found the following:[50]

Airborne dioxins – one type found at 100 times levels previously measured
Levels of carcinogens in duck ponds and rice paddies exceeded international standards for agricultural areas and cadmium, copper, nickel, and lead levels in rice paddies were above international standards
Heavy metals found in road dust – lead over 300 times that of a control village's road dust and copper over 100 times

The environmental impact of the processing of different electronic waste components


E-Waste Component
Process Used
Potential Environmental Hazard


Cathode ray tubes (used in TVs, computer monitors, ATM, video cameras, and more)
Breaking and removal of yoke, then dumping
Lead, barium and other heavy metals leaching into the ground water and release of toxic phosphor


Printed circuit board (image behind table – a thin plate on which chips and other electronic components are placed)
De-soldering and removal of computer chips; open burning and acid baths to remove metals after chips are removed.
Air emissions and discharge into rivers of glass dust, tin, lead, brominated dioxin, beryllium cadmium, and mercury


Chips and other gold plated components
Chemical stripping using nitric and hydrochloric acid and burning of chips
PAHs, heavy metals, brominated flame retardants discharged directly into rivers acidifying fish and flora. Tin and lead contamination of surface and groundwater. Air emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and PAHs


Plastics from printers, keyboards, monitors, etc.
Shredding and low temp melting to be reused
Emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and hydrocarbons


Computer wires
Open burning and stripping to remove copper
PAHs released into air, water, and soil.


[51]
Information security[edit]
E-waste presents a potential security threat to individuals and exporting countries. Hard drives that are not properly erased before the computer is disposed of can be reopened, exposing sensitive information. Credit card numbers, private financial data, account information, and records of online transactions can be accessed by most willing individuals. Organized criminals in Ghana commonly search the drives for information to use in local scams.[52] Electronic files about government contracts have been discovered on hard drives found in Agbogbloshie. Multimillion-dollar agreements from United States security institutions such as the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), the Transportation Security Administration, and Homeland Security have all resurfaced in Agbogbloshie.[52][53]
E-waste management[edit]
Recycling[edit]




Computer monitors are typically packed into low stacks on wooden pallets for recycling and then shrink-wrapped.


See also: Computer recycling
Audiovisual components, televisions, VCRs, stereo equipment, mobile phones, other handheld devices, and computer components contain valuable elements and substances suitable for reclamation, including lead, copper, and gold.
Recycling[edit]
One of the major challenges is recycling the printed circuit boards from the electronic wastes. The circuit boards contain such precious metals as gold, silver, platinum, etc. and such base metals as copper, iron, aluminum, etc. One way e-waste is processed is by melting circuit boards, burning cable sheathing to recover copper wire and open- pit acid leaching for separating metals of value.[54] Conventional method employed is mechanical shredding and separation but the recycling efficiency is low. Alternative methods such as cryogenic decomposition have been studied for printed circuit board recycling,[55] and some other methods are still under investigation. Properly disposing of or reusing electronics can help prevent health problems, reduce greenhouse-gas emissions, and create jobs.[56] Reuse and refurbishing offer a more environmentally friendly and socially conscious alternative to downcycling processes.[citation needed]
Consumer awareness efforts[edit]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency encourages electronic recyclers to become certified by demonstrating to an accredited, independent third party auditor that they meet specific standards to safely recycle and manage electronics. This should work so as to ensure the highest environmental standards are being maintained. Two certifications for electronic recyclers currently exist and are endorsed by the EPA. Customers are encouraged to choose certified electronics recyclers. Responsible electronics recycling reduces environmental and human health impacts, increases the use of reusable and refurbished equipment and reduces energy use while conserving limited resources. The two EPA-endorsed certification programs are Responsible Recyclers Practices (R2) and E-Stewards. Certified companies ensure they are meeting strict environmental standards which maximize reuse and recycling, minimize exposure to human health or the environment, ensure safe management of materials and require destruction of all data used on electronics.[57] Certified electronics recyclers have demonstrated through audits and other means that they continually meet specific high environmental standards and safely manage used electronics. Once certified, the recycler is held to the particular standard by continual oversight by the independent accredited certifying body. A certification board accredits and oversees certifying bodies to ensure that they meet specific responsibilities and are competent to audit and provide certification.[58]
Some U.S. retailers offer opportunities for consumer recycling of discarded electronic devices.[59][60] In the US, the Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) urges consumers to dispose properly of end-of-life electronics through its recycling locator at www.GreenerGadgets.org. This list only includes manufacturer and retailer programs that use the strictest standards and third-party certified recycling locations, to provide consumers assurance that their products will be recycled safely and responsibly. CEA research has found that 58 percent of consumers know where to take their end-of-life electronics, and the electronics industry would very much like to see that level of awareness increase. Consumer electronics manufacturers and retailers sponsor or operate more than 5,000 recycling locations nationwide and have vowed to recycle one billion pounds annually by 2016,[61] a sharp increase from 300 million pounds industry recycled in 2010.
The Sustainable Materials Management Electronic Challenge was created by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). Participants of the Challenge are manufacturers of electronics and electronic retailers. These companies collect end-of-life (EOL) electronics at various locations and send them to a certified, third-party recycler. Program participants are then able publicly promote and report 100% responsible recycling for their companies.[62] The Electronics TakeBack Coalition[63] is a campaign aimed at protecting human health and limiting environmental effects where electronics are being produced, used, and discarded. The ETBC aims to place responsibility for disposal of technology products on electronic manufacturers and brand owners, primarily through community promotions and legal enforcement initiatives. It provides recommendations for consumer recycling and a list of recyclers judged environmentally responsible.[64]
The Certified Electronics Recycler program[65] for electronic recyclers is a comprehensive, integrated management system standard that incorporates key operational and continual improvement elements for quality, environmental and health and safety (QEH&S) performance. The grassroots Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition focuses on promoting human health and addresses environmental justice problems resulting from toxins in technologies. The World Reuse, Repair, and Recycling Association (wr3a.org) is an organization dedicated to improving the quality of exported electronics, encouraging better recycling standards in importing countries, and improving practices through "Fair Trade" principles. Take Back My TV[66] is a project of The Electronics TakeBack Coalition and grades television manufacturers to find out which are responsible and which are not.
The e-Waste Association of South Africa (eWASA)[67] has been instrumental in building a network of e-waste recyclers and refurbishers in the country. It continues to drive the sustainable, environmentally sound management of all e-waste in South Africa. E-Cycling Central is a website from the Electronic Industry Alliance which allows you to search for electronic recycling programs in your state. It lists different recyclers by state to find reuse, recycle, or find donation programs across the country.[68] Ewasteguide.info is a Switzerland-based website dedicated to improving the e-waste situation in developing and transitioning countries. The site contains news, events, case studies, and more.[69] StEP: Solving the E-Waste Problem This website of StEP, an initiative founded by various UN organizations to develop strategies to solve the e-waste problem, follows its activities and programs.[70][71]
Processing techniques[edit]




Recycling the lead from batteries.


In many developed countries, electronic waste processing usually first involves dismantling the equipment into various parts (metal frames, power supplies, circuit boards, plastics), often by hand, but increasingly by automated shredding equipment. A typical example is the NADIN electronic waste processing plant in Novi Iskar, Bulgaria—the largest facility of its kind in Eastern Europe.[72][73] The advantages of this process are the human's ability to recognize and save working and repairable parts, including chips, transistors, RAM, etc. The disadvantage is that the labor is cheapest in countries with the lowest health and safety standards.
In an alternative bulk system,[74] a hopper conveys material for shredding into an unsophisticated mechanical separator, with screening and granulating machines to separate constituent metal and plastic fractions, which are sold to smelters or plastics recyclers. Such recycling machinery is enclosed and employs a dust collection system. Some of the emissions are caught by scrubbers and screens. Magnets, eddy currents, and Trommel screens are employed to separate glass, plastic, and ferrous and nonferrous metals, which can then be further separated at a smelter.
Leaded glass from CRTs is reused in car batteries, ammunition, and lead wheel weights, or sold to foundries as a fluxing agent in processing raw lead ore. Copper, gold, palladium, silver and tin are valuable metals sold to smelters for recycling. Hazardous smoke and gases are captured, contained and treated to mitigate environmental threat. These methods allow for safe reclamation of all valuable computer construction materials. Hewlett-Packard product recycling solutions manager Renee St. Denis describes its process as: "We move them through giant shredders about 30 feet tall and it shreds everything into pieces about the size of a quarter. Once your disk drive is shredded into pieces about this big, it's hard to get the data off".[75] An ideal electronic waste recycling plant combines dismantling for component recovery with increased cost-effective processing of bulk electronic waste. Reuse is an alternative option to recycling because it extends the lifespan of a device. Devices still need eventual recycling, but by allowing others to purchase used electronics, recycling can be postponed and value gained from device use.
Benefits of recycling[edit]
Recycling raw materials from end-of-life electronics is the most effective solution to the growing e-waste problem. Most electronic devices contain a variety of materials, including metals that can be recovered for future uses. By dismantling and providing reuse possibilities, intact natural resources are conserved and air and water pollution caused by hazardous disposal is avoided. Additionally, recycling reduces the amount of greenhouse gas emissions caused by the manufacturing of new products.[76] Another benefit of recycling e-waste is that many of the materials can be recycled and re-used again. Materials that can be recycled include "ferrous (iron-based) and non-ferrous metals, glass, and various types of plastic." “Non-ferrous metals, mainly aluminum and copper can all be re-smelted and re-manufactured. Ferrous metals such as steel and iron can be also be re-used."[77] Due to the recent surge in popularity in 3D printing, certain 3D printers have been designed (FDM variety) to produce waste that can be easily recycled which decreases the amount of harmful pollutants in the atmosphere.[78] The excess plastic from these printers that comes out as a byproduct can also be reused to create new 3D printed creations.[79]
Benefits of recycling are extended when responsible recycling methods are used. In the U.S., responsible recycling aims to minimize the dangers to human health and the environment that disposed and dismantled electronics can create. Responsible recycling ensures best management practices of the electronics being recycled, worker health and safety, and consideration for the environment locally and abroad.[80] In Europe, metals that are recycled are returned to companies of origin at a reduced cost.[81] Through a committed recycling system, manufacturers in Japan have been pushed to make their products more sustainable. Since many companies were responsible for the recycling of their own products, this imposed responsibility on manufacturers requiring many to redesign their infrastructure. As a result, manufacturers in Japan have the added option to sell the recycled metals.[82]
Electronic waste substances[edit]




Several sizes of button and coin cell with 2 9v batteries as a size comparison. They are all recycled in many countries since they contain lead, mercury and cadmium.


Some computer components can be reused in assembling new computer products, while others are reduced to metals that can be reused in applications as varied as construction, flatware, and jewelry. Substances found in large quantities include epoxy resins, fiberglass, PCBs, PVC (polyvinyl chlorides), thermosetting plastics, lead, tin, copper, silicon, beryllium, carbon, iron, and aluminium. Elements found in small amounts include cadmium, mercury, and thallium.[83] Elements found in trace amounts include americium, antimony, arsenic, barium, bismuth, boron, cobalt, europium, gallium, germanium, gold, indium, lithium, manganese, nickel, niobium, palladium, platinum, rhodium, ruthenium, selenium, silver, tantalum, terbium, thorium, titanium, vanadium, and yttrium. Almost all electronics contain lead and tin (as solder) and copper (as wire and printed circuit board tracks), though the use of lead-free solder is now spreading rapidly. The following are ordinary applications:
Hazardous[edit]




Recyclers in the street in São Paulo, Brazil with old computers




E-Waste Component
Processed Used
Adverse Health Effects


Americium
The radioactive source in smoke alarms.
It is known to be carcinogenic.[84]


Lead
Solder, CRT monitor glass, lead-acid batteries, some formulations of PVC. A typical 15-inch cathode ray tube may contain 1.5 pounds of lead,[4] but other CRTs have been estimated as having up to 8 pounds of lead.
Adverse effects of lead exposure include impaired cognitive function, behavioral disturbances, attention deficits, hyperactivity, conduct problems, and lower IQ.[85] These effects are most damaging to children whose developing nervous systems are very susceptible to damage caused by lead, cadmium, and mercury.[86]


Mercury
Found in fluorescent tubes (numerous applications), tilt switches (mechanical doorbells, thermostats),[87] and flat screen monitors.
Health effects include sensory impairment, dermatitis, memory loss, and muscle weakness. Exposure in-utero causes fetal deficits in motor function, attention, and verbal domains.[85] Environmental effects in animals include death, reduced fertility, and slower growth and development.


Cadmium
Found in light-sensitive resistors, corrosion-resistant alloys for marine and aviation environments, and nickel-cadmium batteries. The most common form of cadmium is found in Nickel-cadmium rechargeable batteries. These batteries tend to contain between 6 and 18% cadmium. The sale of Nickel-Cadmium batteries has been banned in the European Union except for medical use. When not properly recycled it can leach into the soil, harming microorganisms and disrupting the soil ecosystem. Exposure is caused by proximity to hazardous waste sites and factories and workers in the metal refining industry.
The inhalation of cadmium can cause severe damage to the lungs and is also known to cause kidney damage.[88] Cadmium is also associated with deficits in cognition, learning, behavior, and neuromotor skills in children.[85]


Hexavalent chromium
Used in metal coatings to protect from corrosion.
A known carcinogen after occupational inhalation exposure.[85]
There is also evidence of cytotoxic and genotoxic effects of some chemicals, which have been shown to inhibit cell proliferation, cause cell membrane lesion, cause DNA single-strand breaks, and elevate Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels.[89]



Sulphur
Found in lead-acid batteries.
Health effects include liver damage, kidney damage, heart damage, eye and throat irritation. When released into the environment, it can create sulphuric acid through sulphur dioxide.


Brominated Flame Retardants (BFRs)
Used as flame retardants in plastics in most electronics. Includes PBBs, PBDE, DecaBDE, OctaBDE, PentaBDE.
Health effects include impaired development of the nervous system, thyroid problems, liver problems.[90] Environmental effects: similar effects as in animals as humans. PBBs were banned from 1973 to 1977 on. PCBs were banned during the 1980s.


Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)
Used as an antistatic additive in industrial applications and found in electronics, also found in non-stick cookware (PTFE). PFOAs are formed synthetically through environmental degradation.
Studies in mice have found the following health effects: Hepatotoxicity, developmental toxicity, immunotoxicity, hormonal effects and carcinogenic effects. Studies have found increased maternal PFOA levels to be associated with an increased risk of spontaneous abortion (miscarriage) and stillbirth. Increased maternal levels of PFOA are also associated with decreases in mean gestational age (preterm birth), mean birth weight (low birth weight), mean birth length (small for gestational age), and mean APGAR score.[91]


Beryllium oxide
Filler in some thermal interface materials such as thermal grease used on heatsinks for CPUs and power transistors,[92] magnetrons, X-ray-transparent ceramic windows, heat transfer fins in vacuum tubes, and gas lasers.
Occupational exposures associated with lung cancer, other common adverse health effects are beryllium sensitization, chronic beryllium disease, and acute beryllium disease.[93]


Other health effects

DNA breaks can increase the likelihood of developing cancer (if the damage is to a tumor suppressor gene)
DNA damages are a special problem in non-dividing or slowly dividing cells, where unrepaired damages will tend to accumulate over time. On the other hand, in rapidly dividing cells, unrepaired DNA damages that do not kill the cell by blocking replication will tend to cause replication errors and thus mutation
Elevated Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels can cause damage to cell structures (oxidative stress)[89]

Generally non-hazardous[edit]




An iMac G4 that has been repurposed into a lamp (photographed next to a Mac Classic and a flip phone).




E-Waste Component
Process Used


Aluminium
nearly all electronic goods using more than a few watts of power (heatsinks), electrolytic capacitors.


Copper
copper wire, printed circuit board tracks, component leads.


Germanium
1950s–1960s transistorized electronics (bipolar junction transistors).


Gold
connector plating, primarily in computer equipment.


Iron
steel chassis, cases, and fixings.


Lithium
lithium-ion batteries.


Nickel
nickel-cadmium batteries.


Silicon
glass, transistors, ICs, printed circuit boards.


Tin
solder, coatings on component leads.


Zinc
plating for steel parts.


See also[edit]


Environment portal
Electronics portal



2000s commodities boom
Computer Recycling
Digger gold
eDay
Electronic waste in Japan
Green computing
Mobile phone recycling
Material safety data sheet
Polychlorinated biphenyls
Retrocomputing
Radio Row

Policy and conventions:

Basel Action Network (BAN)
Basel Convention
China RoHS
e-Stewards
Restriction of Hazardous Substances Directive (RoHS)
Soesterberg Principles
Sustainable Electronics Initiative (SEI)
Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive


Organizations


Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance (ADISA)[94]
Empa
IFixit
International Network for Environmental Compliance and Enforcement
Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries (ISRI)
Solving the E-waste Problem
World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association

General:

Retail hazardous waste
Waste
Environmental racism in Europe#Romani settlements and e-waste (France)

References[edit]


^ Sakar, Anne. "Dad brought home lead, kids got sick". 
^ a b : Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ "WEEE CRT and Monitor Recycling". Executiveblueprints.com. 2 August 2009. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ a b Morgan, Russell (21 August 2006). "Tips and Tricks for Recycling Old Computers". SmartBiz. Retrieved 17 March 2009. 
^ "Defining & categorization of wastes via the regulations". ITGreen. 2 June 2013. Retrieved 21 June 2013. 
^ "Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment" (PDF). Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment. SBC e-Waste Africa Project. Retrieved 29 August 2011. 
^ Smedley, Tim. The Guardian, 2013. Web. 22 May 2015. <https://www.theguardian.com/sustainable-business/phonebloks-future-sustainable-smartphone
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics". US Environmental Protection Agency. Retrieved 13 March 2012. 
^ "Environment". ECD Mobile Recycling. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ Blau, J (November 2006). "UN Summit on e-waste: Nokia, Vodaphone and Others to Attend UN Summit on e-waste". CIO business magazine. 
^ Section, United Nations News Service (22 February 2010). "As e-waste mountains soar, UN urges smart technologies to protect health". United Nations-DPI/NMD – UN News Service Section. Retrieved 12 March 2012. 
^ a b "Urgent need to prepare developing countries for surges in E-Waste". 
^ Luthar, Breda. "Class, Cultural Capital, and the Mobile Phone." JSTOR. Web. 22 May 2015. .
^ "E-Waste: How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage." Science Space EWaste How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage Comments. 2014. Web. 22 May 2015.
^ http://www.electronicstakeback.com/wp-content/uploads/Facts_and_Figures_on_EWaste_and_Recycling.pdf
^ Kozlan, Melanie (2 November 2010). "What is 'E-Waste' & How Can I Get Rid of It?!". Four Green Steps. 
^ "Poison PCs and toxic TVs" (PDF). 
^ Ingenthron, Robin (31 March 2011). "Why We Should Ship Our Electronic "waste" to China and Africa". [Motherboard.tv]. 
^ Grossman, Elizabeth (10 April 2006). "Where computers go to die – and kill (4/10/2006)". Salon.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ Prashant, Nitya (20 August 2008). "Cash For Laptops Offers 'Green' Solution for Broken or Outdated Computers". Green Technology. Norwalk, Connecticut: Technology Marketing Corporation. Retrieved 17 March 2009.  In "CELL PHONE DISPOSAL AND STRATEGIC EVALUATION OF ELECTRONIC WASTE MANAGEMENT IN KENYA, A CASE OF MOBILE PHONE DEALERS IN KISUMU COUNTY" (PDF). European Centre for Research, Training and Development UK. December 2013. 
^ a b Basel Action Network; Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition (25 February 2002). "Exporting Harm: The High-Tech Trashing of Asia" (PDF). Seattle and San Jose. 
^ Chea, Terence (18 November 2007). "America Ships Electronic Waste Overseas". Associated Press. 
^ Slade, Giles (2006). "Made To Break: Technology and Obsolescence in America". Harvard University Press. 
^ a b Carroll (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Magazine Online. 
^ "Product or Waste? Importation and End-of-Life Processing of Computers in Peru", Ramzy Kahhat and Eric Williams, Center for Earth Systems Engineering and Management, Arizona State University, published Environmental Science and Technology June 2009.
^ Minter, Adam. "Shanghai Scrap". Wasted 7/7. The Atlantic. Retrieved 7 March 2011. 
^ "Illegal e-waste exposed". Greenpeace International. 
^ "E-Trash Industry Poses Hazards to Workers". 
^ Simmons, Dan (14 October 2005). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste in Ghana". YouTube. 
^ "Poisoning the poor – Electronic Waste in Ghana". Greenpeace International. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 5 August 2008. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 27 November 2006. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ Carney, Liz (19 December 2006). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste: High-impact Strategies". 
^ Slade, Giles. "Computer age leftovers". Denver Post. Retrieved 13 November 2006. 
^ "Export of toxic chemicals - A review of the case of uncontrolled electronic-waste recycling" (PDF). Environmental Pollution. 149. 2007. 
^ "Electronic Waste Dump of the World". Sometimes-interesting.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Persepectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "Lead". Centers of Disease Control and Prevention. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood lead levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "E-Waste Dump of the World". Seattletimes.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ "Where does e-waste end up?". Greenpeace. 
^ "STEP". STEP: Solving The E-waste Problem. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ Needhidasan, S; Samuel, M; Chidambaram, R (2014). "Electronic waste- an emerging threat to the environment of urban India" (PDF). Journal of Environmental Health Science & Engineering. 12: 36. PMC 3908467 . PMID 24444377. doi:10.1186/2052-336X-12-36. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ "High levels of PAH-metabolites in urine of e-waste recycling workers from Agbogbloshie, Ghana" (PDF). Science of the Total Environment. 2014. 
^ Frazzoli, C. &. (2010). Diagnostic health risk assessment of electronic waste on the general population in developing countries' scenarios. Environmental Impact Assessment Review , 388–399
^ Sthiannopkao, S. &. (2012). Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Inititatives, practices and consequences. Science of the Total Environment
^ Wath, S. B., Dutt, P. S., & Chakrabarti, T. (2011). E-Waste scenario in India, its management and implications. Environmental Monitoring and Assessment, pp. 172, 249–262.
^ a b "Africa’s Agbogbloshie Market Is a Computer Graveyard" NewsBreakingOnline.com. Web. 20 February 2011.
^ Doctorow, Cory. "Illegal E-waste Dumped in Ghana Includes Unencrypted Hard Drives Full of US Security Secrets." Boing Boing. 25 June 2009. Web. 15 March 2011.
^ Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ Yuan, C.; Zhang, H. C.; McKenna, G.; Korzeniewski, C.; Li, J. (2007). "Experimental Studies on Cryogenic Recycling of Printed Circuit Board". International Journal of Advanced Manufacturing Technology. 34: 657–666. doi:10.1007/s00170-006-0634-z. 
^ Fela, Jen (April 2010). "Developing countries face e-waste crisis". Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 8 (3): 117. JSTOR 20696446. doi:10.1890/1540-9295-8.3.116. 
^ "Data Destruction". www.pureplanetrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 
^ "E-cycling certification". Environmental Protection Agency. 2013. 
^ "Best Buy Recycles". Bestbuy.com. 2013. 
^ "Staples recycling and eco-stapling". Staples.com. 2013. 
^ "CEA – eCycle". http://www.ce.org. Retrieved 6 January 2015.  External link in |publisher= (help)
^ United States Environmental Protection Agency, Sustainable Materials Management Electronics Challenge. Retrieved from http://www.epa.gov/wastes/conserve/smm/electronics/index.htm
^ "Home – Electronics TakeBack Coalition". Electronicstakeback.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "How to Find a Responsible Recycler". Electronics TakeBack Coalition. 
^ "Default Parallels Plesk Panel Page". Certifiedelectronicsrecycler.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "Take Back My TV". 
^ "eWASA". 
^ "ecyclingcentral.com". ecyclingcentral.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "ewasteguide.info". ewasteguide.info. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics | eCycling | US EPA". Epa.gov. 28 June 2006. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "step-initiative.org". step-initiative.org. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "40 Million BGN Invested in Bulgaria's 1st Appliances Recycle Plant". Sofia News Agency. 28 June 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "Bulgaria Opens Largest WEEE Recycling Factory in Eastern Europe". Ask-eu.com. 12 July 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "WEEE recycling resources". Simsrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "Kwiat_Environmental Educatioin". Learning Ace. 
^ "Benefits of Recycling". hardrawgathering.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "What can be recycled from e-waste?". zerowaste.sa.gov.au. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "How to Print 3D Parts Better". sustainabilityworkshop.autodesk.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Zero or close to zero waste". plasticscribbler.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ Interagency Task Force on Electronics Stewardship. (20 July 2011). National Strategy for Electronics Stewardship
^ "THE FUTURE OF ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLING IN THE UNITED STATES: Obstacles and Domestic Solution" (PDF). sea.columbia.edu/. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Characteristics of E-waste Recycling System in Japan and China" (PDF). workspace.unpan.org. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Chemical fact sheet: Thallium". Spectrum Laboratories. Retrieved 2 February 2008. 
^ "Americium, Radioactive". TOXNET Toxicology Data Network. 
^ a b c d Chen, A., Dietrich, K. N., Huo, X., & Ho, S.-m. (2011). Developmental Neurotoxicants in E-Waste: An Emerging Health Concern. Environmental Health Perspectives , 119 (4), 431–438.
^ Chen, Aimin; Dietrich, Kim N.; Huo, Xia; Ho, Shuk-mei (2011-04-01). "Developmental neurotoxicants in e-waste: an emerging health concern". Environmental Health Perspectives. 119 (4): 431–438. ISSN 1552-9924. PMC 3080922 . PMID 21081302. doi:10.1289/ehp.1002452. 
^ "Question 8" (PDF). 
^ "Cadmium (Cd) – Chemical properties, Health and Environmental effects". Lenntech.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ a b Liulin, W., Meiling, H., Jing, A., Yufang, Z., Xuetong, W., Yangjun, W., et al. (2011). The cytotoxic and genetoxic effects of dust and soil samples from E-waste recycling area on L02 cells. Toxicology and Industrial Health , 27 (9), 831–839.
^ Birnbaum, LS; Staskal, DF (2004). "Brominated flame retardants: Cause for concern?" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 112: 9–17. PMC 1241790 . PMID 14698924. doi:10.1289/ehp.6559. 
^ Wu, K., Xu, X., Peng, L., Liu, J., Guo, Y., & Huo, X. (2012). Association between maternal exposure to perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) from electronic waste recycling and neonatal health outcomes. Environment International , 41, 1–8.
^ Becker, Greg; Lee, Chris; Lin, Zuchen (July 2005). "Thermal conductivity in advanced chips: Emerging generation of thermal greases offers advantages". Advanced Packaging: 2–4. Archived from the original on 21 June 2000. Retrieved 4 March 2008. 
^ "Health Effects". United States Department of Labor. Retrieved October 30, 2016. 
^ "ADISA website". Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 


Further reading[edit]

Hicks, C.; Dietmara, R.; Eugsterb, M. (2005). "The recycling and disposal of electrical and electronic waste in China—legislative and market responses". Environmental Impact Assessment Review. 25 (5): 459–471. ISSN 0195-9255. doi:10.1016/j.eiar.2005.04.007. 
Ogunseitan, O.A.; Schoenung, J.M.; Saphores, J-D.M.; Shapiro, A.A. (2009). "The Electronics Revolution: From E-Wonderland to E-Wasteland". Science. 326: 670–671. PMID 19900918. doi:10.1126/science.1176929. 
Toxics Link (February 2003). "Scrapping the Hi-tech Myth: Computer waste in India". India. Retrieved 25 March 2011. 
Cheng, I-Hwa, E-waste Trafficking: From Your Home to China 
United Nations University: THE GLOBAL E-WASTE MONITOR 2014 – Quantities, flows and resources, 2015
Li, J.; Zeng, X.; Chen, M.; Ogunseitan, O.A.; Stevels, A. (2015). ""Control-Alt-Delete": Rebooting Solutions for the E-Waste Problem". Environmental Science & Technology. 49 (12): 7095–7108. doi:10.1021/acs.est.5b00449. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Electronic waste.



Carroll, Chris (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Society. 
E-waste management: Scientific Recycling, Green E-products, Stringent Legislation Need of Hour
Sustainable Management of Electronics







v
t
e


Biosolids, waste and waste management



Major types



Agricultural wastewater
Biodegradable waste
Brown waste
Chemical waste
Construction waste
Demolition waste
Electronic waste

by country


Food waste
Green waste
Hazardous waste
Heat waste
Industrial waste
Litter
Marine debris
Biomedical waste
Mining waste
Municipal solid waste
Open defecation
Post-consumer waste
Radioactive waste
Scrap metal
Sewage
Toxic waste
Wastewater








Processes



Anaerobic digestion
Biodegradation
Composting
Garden waste dumping
Illegal dumping
Incineration
Landfill
Landfill mining
Mechanical biological treatment
Mechanical sorting
Open dump
Photodegradation
Recycling
Resource recovery
Sewage treatment
Waste collection
Waste picking
Waste sorting
Waste trade
Waste treatment
Waste-to-energy





Countries



Armenia
Bangladesh
Brazil
Hong Kong
India
Kazakhstan
New Zealand
Russia
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
UK
US





Agreements



Bamako Convention
Basel Convention
EU directives

batteries
landfills
RoHS
framework
incineration
waste water
WEEE


London Convention
Oslo Convention
OSPAR Convention





Other topics



Blue Ribbon Commission on America's Nuclear Future
Cleaner production
Downcycling
Eco-industrial park
Extended producer responsibility
High-level radioactive waste management
History of waste management
Landfill fire
Sewage regulation and administration
Upcycling
Waste hierarchy
Waste legislation
Waste minimisation
Zero waste








 Environment portal
 Category
 Commons
Concepts
Index
Journals
Lists
Organizations









Authority control



GND: 4324135-9










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Electronic_waste&oldid=791607037"					
Categories: Electronic wasteHidden categories: CS1 errors: external linksUse dmy dates from March 2016Articles needing cleanup from May 2013All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from May 2013Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from May 2013Articles needing additional references from May 2013All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from February 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2016Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡമലയാളംमराठीNederlands日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусскийසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenščinaSvenskaதமிழ்ไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 10:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Electronic waste - Wikipedia






















 






Electronic waste

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"WEEE" redirects here. For the EU directive, see Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive.






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: fix References Please help improve this article if you can. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Defective and obsolete electronic equipment


Electronic waste or e-waste describes discarded electrical or electronic devices. Used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal are also considered e-waste. Informal processing of e-waste in developing countries can lead to adverse human health effects and environmental pollution.
Electronic scrap components, such as CPUs, contain potentially harmful components such as lead, cadmium, beryllium, or brominated flame retardants. Recycling and disposal of e-waste may involve significant risk to health of workers and communities in developed countries[1] and great care must be taken to avoid unsafe exposure in recycling operations and leaking of materials such as heavy metals from landfills and incinerator ashes.[2]



Contents


1 Definition
2 Amount of electronic waste worldwide
3 Global trade issues

3.1 Trade
3.2 Guiyu
3.3 Other informal e-waste recycling sites


4 Environmental impact
5 Information security
6 E-waste management

6.1 Recycling


7 Recycling

7.1 Consumer awareness efforts
7.2 Processing techniques
7.3 Benefits of recycling


8 Electronic waste substances

8.1 Hazardous
8.2 Generally non-hazardous


9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Definition[edit]












Hoarding (left), disassembling (center) and collecting (right) electronic waste in Bengaluru, India


"Electronic waste" or "E-Waste" may be defined as discarded computers, office electronic equipment, entertainment device electronics, mobile phones, television sets, and refrigerators. This includes used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal. Others are re-usables (working and repairable electronics) and secondary scrap (copper, steel, plastic, etc.) to be "commodities", and reserve the term "waste" for residue or material which is dumped by the buyer rather than recycled, including residue from reuse and recycling operations, because loads of surplus electronics are frequently commingled (good, recyclable, and non-recyclable), several public policy advocates apply the term "e-waste" broadly to all surplus electronics. Cathode ray tubes (CRTs) are considered one of the hardest types to recycle.[3]
CRTs have relatively high concentration of lead and phosphors (not to be confused with phosphorus), both of which are necessary for the display. The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) includes discarded CRT monitors in its category of "hazardous household waste"[4] but considers CRTs that have been set aside for testing to be commodities if they are not discarded, speculatively accumulated, or left unprotected from weather and other damage.
The EU and its member states operate a system via the European Waste Catalogue (EWC)- a European Council Directive, which is interpreted into "member state law". In the UK, this is in the form of the List of Wastes Directive. However, the list (and EWC) gives broad definition (EWC Code 16 02 13*) of Hazardous Electronic wastes, requiring "waste operators" to employ the Hazardous Waste Regulations (Annex 1A, Annex 1B) for refined definition. Constituent materials in the waste also require assessment via the combination of Annex II and Annex III, again allowing operators to further determine whether a waste is hazardous.[5]
Debate continues over the distinction between "commodity" and "waste" electronics definitions. Some exporters are accused of deliberately leaving difficult-to-recycle, obsolete, or non-repairable equipment mixed in loads of working equipment (though this may also come through ignorance, or to avoid more costly treatment processes). Protectionists may broaden the definition of "waste" electronics in order to protect domestic markets from working secondary equipment.
The high value of the computer recycling subset of electronic waste (working and reusable laptops, desktops, and components like RAM) can help pay the cost of transportation for a larger number of worthless pieces than can be achieved with display devices, which have less (or negative) scrap value. In A 2011 report, "Ghana E-Waste Country Assessment",[6] found that of 215,000 tons of electronics imported to Ghana, 30% were brand new and 70% were used. Of the used product, the study concluded that 15% was not reused and was scrapped or discarded. This contrasts with published but uncredited claims that 80% of the imports into Ghana were being burned in primitive conditions.
Amount of electronic waste worldwide[edit]




A fragment of discarded circuit board.


Rapid changes in technology, changes in media (tapes, software, MP3), falling prices, and planned obsolescence have resulted in a fast-growing surplus of electronic waste around the globe. Technical solutions are available, but in most cases, a legal framework, a collection, logistics, and other services need to be implemented before a technical solution can be applied.
Display units (CRT, LCD, LED monitors), processors (CPU, GPU, or APU chips), memory (DRAM or SRAM), and audio components have different useful lives. Processors are most frequently out-dated (by software no longer being optimized) and are more likely to become "e-waste" while display units are most often replaced while working without repair attempts, due to changes in wealthy nation appetites for new display technology. This problem could potentially be solved with modular smartphones or Phonebloks. These types of phones are more durable and have the technology to change certain parts of the phone making them more environmentally friendly. Being able to simply replace the part of the phone that is broken will reduce e-waste.[7] An estimated 50 million tons of E-waste are produced each year.[2] The USA discards 30 million computers each year and 100 million phones are disposed of in Europe each year. The Environmental Protection Agency estimates that only 15–20% of e-waste is recycled, the rest of these electronics go directly into landfills and incinerators.[8][9]
In 2006, the United Nations estimated the amount of worldwide electronic waste discarded each year to be 50 million metric tons.[10] According to a report by UNEP titled, "Recycling – from E-Waste to Resources," the amount of e-waste being produced – including mobile phones and computers – could rise by as much as 500 percent over the next decade in some countries, such as India.[11] The United States is the world leader in producing electronic waste, tossing away about 3 million tons each year.[12] China already produces about 2.3 million tons (2010 estimate) domestically, second only to the United States. And, despite having banned e-waste imports, China remains a major e-waste dumping ground for developed countries.[12]
Society today revolves around technology and by the constant need for the newest and most high-tech products we are contributing to mass amount of e-waste.[13] Since the invention of the iPhone, cell phones have become the top source of e-waste products because they are not made to last more than two years. Electrical waste contains hazardous but also valuable and scarce materials. Up to 60 elements can be found in complex electronics.[14] As of 2013, Apple has sold over 796 million iDevices (iPod, iPhone, iPad). Cell phone companies make cell phones that are not made to last so that the consumer will purchase new phones. Companies give these products such short life spans because they know that the consumer will want a new product and will buy it if they make it.[15] In the United States, an estimated 70% of heavy metals in landfills comes from discarded electronics.[16][17]
While there is agreement that the number of discarded electronic devices is increasing, there is considerable disagreement about the relative risk (compared to automobile scrap, for example), and strong disagreement whether curtailing trade in used electronics will improve conditions, or make them worse. According to an article in Motherboard, attempts to restrict the trade have driven reputable companies out of the supply chain, with unintended consequences.[18]
Global trade issues[edit]
See also: Global Waste Trade and Electronic waste by country




Electronic waste is often exported to developing countries.






4.5-volt, D, C, AA, AAA, AAAA, A23, 9-volt, CR2032, and LR44 cells are all recyclable in most countries.






The E-waste centre of Agbogbloshie, Ghana, where electronic waste is burnt and disassembled with no safety or environmental considerations.


One theory is that increased regulation of electronic waste and concern over the environmental harm in nature economies creates an economic disincentive to remove residues prior to export. Critics of trade in used electronics maintain that it is still too easy for brokers calling themselves recyclers to export unscreened electronic waste to developing countries, such as China,[19] India and parts of Africa, thus avoiding the expense of removing items like bad cathode ray tubes (the processing of which is expensive and difficult). The developing countries have become toxic dump yards of e-waste. Proponents of international trade point to the success of fair trade programs in other industries, where cooperation has led to creation of sustainable jobs and can bring affordable technology in countries where repair and reuse rates are higher.
Defenders of the trade[who?] in used electronics say that extraction of metals from virgin mining has been shifted to developing countries. Recycling of copper, silver, gold, and other materials from discarded electronic devices is considered better for the environment than mining. They also state that repair and reuse of computers and televisions has become a "lost art" in wealthier nations and that refurbishing has traditionally been a path to development.
South Korea, Taiwan, and southern China all excelled in finding "retained value" in used goods, and in some cases have set up billion-dollar industries in refurbishing used ink cartridges, single-use cameras, and working CRTs. Refurbishing has traditionally been a threat to established manufacturing, and simple protectionism explains some criticism of the trade. Works like "The Waste Makers" by Vance Packard explain some of the criticism of exports of working product, for example, the ban on import of tested working Pentium 4 laptops to China, or the bans on export of used surplus working electronics by Japan.
Opponents of surplus electronics exports argue that lower environmental and labor standards, cheap labor, and the relatively high value of recovered raw materials leads to a transfer of pollution-generating activities, such as smelting of copper wire. In China, Malaysia, India, Kenya, and various African countries, electronic waste is being sent to these countries for processing, sometimes illegally. Many surplus laptops are routed to developing nations as "dumping grounds for e-waste".[20]
Because the United States has not ratified the Basel Convention or its Ban Amendment, and has few domestic federal laws forbidding the export of toxic waste, the Basel Action Network estimates that about 80% of the electronic waste directed to recycling in the U.S. does not get recycled there at all, but is put on container ships and sent to countries such as China.[21][22][23][24] This figure is disputed as an exaggeration by the EPA, the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, and the World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association.
Independent research by Arizona State University showed that 87–88% of imported used computers did not have a higher value than the best value of the constituent materials they contained, and that "the official trade in end-of-life computers is thus driven by reuse as opposed to recycling".[25]
Trade[edit]
Proponents of the trade say growth of internet access is a stronger correlation to trade than poverty. Haiti is poor and closer to the port of New York than southeast Asia, but far more electronic waste is exported from New York to Asia than to Haiti. Thousands of men, women, and children are employed in reuse, refurbishing, repair, and re-manufacturing, unsustainable industries in decline in developed countries. Denying developing nations access to used electronics may deny them sustainable employment, affordable products, and internet access, or force them to deal with even less scrupulous suppliers. In a series of seven articles for The Atlantic, Shanghai-based reporter Adam Minter describes many of these computer repair and scrap separation activities as objectively sustainable.[26]
Opponents of the trade argue that developing countries utilize methods that are more harmful and more wasteful. An expedient and prevalent method is simply to toss equipment onto an open fire, in order to melt plastics and to burn away non-valuable metals. This releases carcinogens and neurotoxins into the air, contributing to an acrid, lingering smog. These noxious fumes include dioxins and furans. Bonfire refuse can be disposed of quickly into drainage ditches or waterways feeding the ocean or local water supplies.[24]
In June 2008, a container of electronic waste, destined from the Port of Oakland in the U.S. to Sanshui District in mainland China, was intercepted in Hong Kong by Greenpeace.[27] Concern over exports of electronic waste were raised in press reports in India,[28][29] Ghana,[30][31][32] Côte d'Ivoire,[33] and Nigeria.[34]
Guiyu[edit]
Main article: Electronic waste in China
Guiyu in the Shantou region of China is a massive electronic waste processing community.[21][35][36] It is often referred to as the "e-waste capital of the world." Traditionally, Guiyu was an agricultural community; however, in the mid-1990s it transformed into an e-waste recycling center involving over 75% of the local households and an additional 100,000 migrant workers.[37] Thousands of individual workshops employ laborers to snip cables, pry chips from circuit boards, grind plastic computer cases into particles, and dip circuit boards in acid baths to dissolve the precious metals. Others work to strip insulation from all wiring in an attempt to salvage tiny amounts of copper wire.[38] Uncontrolled burning, disassembly, and disposal has led to a number of environmental problems such as groundwater contamination, atmospheric pollution, and water pollution either by immediate discharge or from surface runoff (especially near coastal areas), as well as health problems including occupational safety and health effects among those directly and indirectly involved, due to the methods of processing the waste.
A number of studies have been conducted to measure a number of chemicals associated with informal e-waste recycling in the populations. One study enrolled children from Guiyu and a control site 50 km away to measure blood lead levels (BLLs).[39] The average BLL in Guiyu was 15.3 ug/dL compared to 9.9 ug/dL in the control site. In the United States, the CDC has set a reference level for blood lead at 5 ug/dL.[40] High levels of lead in young children can impact IQ and the development of the central nervous system. The highest concentrations of lead were found in the children of parents whose workshop dealt with circuit boards and the lowest was among those who recycled plastic.[41]
Six of the many villages in Guiyu specialize in circuit-board disassembly, seven in plastics and metals reprocessing, and two in wire and cable disassembly. Greenpeace, an environmental group, sampled dust, soil, river sediment, and groundwater in Guiyu. They found very high levels of toxic heavy metals and organic contaminants in both places.[42] Lai Yun, a campaigner for the group found "over 10 poisonous metals, such as lead, mercury, and cadmium."
Guiyu is only one example of digital dumps but similar places can be found across the world in Nigeria, Ghana, and India.[43] With amounts of e-waste growing rapidly each year urgent solutions are required. While the waste continues to flow into digital dumps like Guiyu, there are measures that can help reduce the flow of e-waste.[44]
A suggested preventative step involves the major electronics firms removing the worst chemicals in their products in order to make them safer and easier to recycle.
Other informal e-waste recycling sites[edit]




A pile of discarded TVs and computer monitors.


Guiyu is likely one of the oldest and largest informal e-waste recycling sites in the world, however, there are many sites worldwide, including India, Ghana, Nigeria, and the Philippines. Most research involving informal e-waste recycling has been done in Guiyu, but there are a handful of studies that describe exposure levels in e-waste workers, the community, and the environment.[citation needed] Bangalore, located in southern India, is often referred as the "Silicon Valley of India" and has a growing informal e-waste recycling sector.[45][46] Hair samples were collected from workers at an e-waste recycling facility and an e-waste recycling slum community in Bangalore.[47] Levels of V, Cr, Mn, Mo, Sn, Tl, and Pb were significantly higher in the workers at the e-waste recycling facility compared to the e-waste workers in the slum community. However, Co, Ag, Cd, and Hg levels were significantly higher in the slum community workers compared to the facility workers. A study in Ghana found higher levels of urinary PAH-metabolites in e-waste workers compared to unexposed controls.[48] They also found a greater frequency of complaints of cough, chest pain, and vertigo from those exposed to emissions from the e-waste recycling processes.
Environmental impact[edit]




Old keyboards and one mouse.


The processes of dismantling and disposing of electronic waste in developing countries led to a number of environmental impacts as illustrated in the graphic. Liquid and atmospheric releases end up in bodies of water, groundwater, soil, and air and therefore in land and sea animals – both domesticated and wild, in crops eaten by both animals and human, and in drinking water.[49]
One study of environmental effects in Guiyu, China found the following:[50]

Airborne dioxins – one type found at 100 times levels previously measured
Levels of carcinogens in duck ponds and rice paddies exceeded international standards for agricultural areas and cadmium, copper, nickel, and lead levels in rice paddies were above international standards
Heavy metals found in road dust – lead over 300 times that of a control village's road dust and copper over 100 times

The environmental impact of the processing of different electronic waste components


E-Waste Component
Process Used
Potential Environmental Hazard


Cathode ray tubes (used in TVs, computer monitors, ATM, video cameras, and more)
Breaking and removal of yoke, then dumping
Lead, barium and other heavy metals leaching into the ground water and release of toxic phosphor


Printed circuit board (image behind table – a thin plate on which chips and other electronic components are placed)
De-soldering and removal of computer chips; open burning and acid baths to remove metals after chips are removed.
Air emissions and discharge into rivers of glass dust, tin, lead, brominated dioxin, beryllium cadmium, and mercury


Chips and other gold plated components
Chemical stripping using nitric and hydrochloric acid and burning of chips
PAHs, heavy metals, brominated flame retardants discharged directly into rivers acidifying fish and flora. Tin and lead contamination of surface and groundwater. Air emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and PAHs


Plastics from printers, keyboards, monitors, etc.
Shredding and low temp melting to be reused
Emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and hydrocarbons


Computer wires
Open burning and stripping to remove copper
PAHs released into air, water, and soil.


[51]
Information security[edit]
E-waste presents a potential security threat to individuals and exporting countries. Hard drives that are not properly erased before the computer is disposed of can be reopened, exposing sensitive information. Credit card numbers, private financial data, account information, and records of online transactions can be accessed by most willing individuals. Organized criminals in Ghana commonly search the drives for information to use in local scams.[52] Electronic files about government contracts have been discovered on hard drives found in Agbogbloshie. Multimillion-dollar agreements from United States security institutions such as the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), the Transportation Security Administration, and Homeland Security have all resurfaced in Agbogbloshie.[52][53]
E-waste management[edit]
Recycling[edit]




Computer monitors are typically packed into low stacks on wooden pallets for recycling and then shrink-wrapped.


See also: Computer recycling
Audiovisual components, televisions, VCRs, stereo equipment, mobile phones, other handheld devices, and computer components contain valuable elements and substances suitable for reclamation, including lead, copper, and gold.
Recycling[edit]
One of the major challenges is recycling the printed circuit boards from the electronic wastes. The circuit boards contain such precious metals as gold, silver, platinum, etc. and such base metals as copper, iron, aluminum, etc. One way e-waste is processed is by melting circuit boards, burning cable sheathing to recover copper wire and open- pit acid leaching for separating metals of value.[54] Conventional method employed is mechanical shredding and separation but the recycling efficiency is low. Alternative methods such as cryogenic decomposition have been studied for printed circuit board recycling,[55] and some other methods are still under investigation. Properly disposing of or reusing electronics can help prevent health problems, reduce greenhouse-gas emissions, and create jobs.[56] Reuse and refurbishing offer a more environmentally friendly and socially conscious alternative to downcycling processes.[citation needed]
Consumer awareness efforts[edit]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency encourages electronic recyclers to become certified by demonstrating to an accredited, independent third party auditor that they meet specific standards to safely recycle and manage electronics. This should work so as to ensure the highest environmental standards are being maintained. Two certifications for electronic recyclers currently exist and are endorsed by the EPA. Customers are encouraged to choose certified electronics recyclers. Responsible electronics recycling reduces environmental and human health impacts, increases the use of reusable and refurbished equipment and reduces energy use while conserving limited resources. The two EPA-endorsed certification programs are Responsible Recyclers Practices (R2) and E-Stewards. Certified companies ensure they are meeting strict environmental standards which maximize reuse and recycling, minimize exposure to human health or the environment, ensure safe management of materials and require destruction of all data used on electronics.[57] Certified electronics recyclers have demonstrated through audits and other means that they continually meet specific high environmental standards and safely manage used electronics. Once certified, the recycler is held to the particular standard by continual oversight by the independent accredited certifying body. A certification board accredits and oversees certifying bodies to ensure that they meet specific responsibilities and are competent to audit and provide certification.[58]
Some U.S. retailers offer opportunities for consumer recycling of discarded electronic devices.[59][60] In the US, the Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) urges consumers to dispose properly of end-of-life electronics through its recycling locator at www.GreenerGadgets.org. This list only includes manufacturer and retailer programs that use the strictest standards and third-party certified recycling locations, to provide consumers assurance that their products will be recycled safely and responsibly. CEA research has found that 58 percent of consumers know where to take their end-of-life electronics, and the electronics industry would very much like to see that level of awareness increase. Consumer electronics manufacturers and retailers sponsor or operate more than 5,000 recycling locations nationwide and have vowed to recycle one billion pounds annually by 2016,[61] a sharp increase from 300 million pounds industry recycled in 2010.
The Sustainable Materials Management Electronic Challenge was created by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). Participants of the Challenge are manufacturers of electronics and electronic retailers. These companies collect end-of-life (EOL) electronics at various locations and send them to a certified, third-party recycler. Program participants are then able publicly promote and report 100% responsible recycling for their companies.[62] The Electronics TakeBack Coalition[63] is a campaign aimed at protecting human health and limiting environmental effects where electronics are being produced, used, and discarded. The ETBC aims to place responsibility for disposal of technology products on electronic manufacturers and brand owners, primarily through community promotions and legal enforcement initiatives. It provides recommendations for consumer recycling and a list of recyclers judged environmentally responsible.[64]
The Certified Electronics Recycler program[65] for electronic recyclers is a comprehensive, integrated management system standard that incorporates key operational and continual improvement elements for quality, environmental and health and safety (QEH&S) performance. The grassroots Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition focuses on promoting human health and addresses environmental justice problems resulting from toxins in technologies. The World Reuse, Repair, and Recycling Association (wr3a.org) is an organization dedicated to improving the quality of exported electronics, encouraging better recycling standards in importing countries, and improving practices through "Fair Trade" principles. Take Back My TV[66] is a project of The Electronics TakeBack Coalition and grades television manufacturers to find out which are responsible and which are not.
The e-Waste Association of South Africa (eWASA)[67] has been instrumental in building a network of e-waste recyclers and refurbishers in the country. It continues to drive the sustainable, environmentally sound management of all e-waste in South Africa. E-Cycling Central is a website from the Electronic Industry Alliance which allows you to search for electronic recycling programs in your state. It lists different recyclers by state to find reuse, recycle, or find donation programs across the country.[68] Ewasteguide.info is a Switzerland-based website dedicated to improving the e-waste situation in developing and transitioning countries. The site contains news, events, case studies, and more.[69] StEP: Solving the E-Waste Problem This website of StEP, an initiative founded by various UN organizations to develop strategies to solve the e-waste problem, follows its activities and programs.[70][71]
Processing techniques[edit]




Recycling the lead from batteries.


In many developed countries, electronic waste processing usually first involves dismantling the equipment into various parts (metal frames, power supplies, circuit boards, plastics), often by hand, but increasingly by automated shredding equipment. A typical example is the NADIN electronic waste processing plant in Novi Iskar, Bulgaria—the largest facility of its kind in Eastern Europe.[72][73] The advantages of this process are the human's ability to recognize and save working and repairable parts, including chips, transistors, RAM, etc. The disadvantage is that the labor is cheapest in countries with the lowest health and safety standards.
In an alternative bulk system,[74] a hopper conveys material for shredding into an unsophisticated mechanical separator, with screening and granulating machines to separate constituent metal and plastic fractions, which are sold to smelters or plastics recyclers. Such recycling machinery is enclosed and employs a dust collection system. Some of the emissions are caught by scrubbers and screens. Magnets, eddy currents, and Trommel screens are employed to separate glass, plastic, and ferrous and nonferrous metals, which can then be further separated at a smelter.
Leaded glass from CRTs is reused in car batteries, ammunition, and lead wheel weights, or sold to foundries as a fluxing agent in processing raw lead ore. Copper, gold, palladium, silver and tin are valuable metals sold to smelters for recycling. Hazardous smoke and gases are captured, contained and treated to mitigate environmental threat. These methods allow for safe reclamation of all valuable computer construction materials. Hewlett-Packard product recycling solutions manager Renee St. Denis describes its process as: "We move them through giant shredders about 30 feet tall and it shreds everything into pieces about the size of a quarter. Once your disk drive is shredded into pieces about this big, it's hard to get the data off".[75] An ideal electronic waste recycling plant combines dismantling for component recovery with increased cost-effective processing of bulk electronic waste. Reuse is an alternative option to recycling because it extends the lifespan of a device. Devices still need eventual recycling, but by allowing others to purchase used electronics, recycling can be postponed and value gained from device use.
Benefits of recycling[edit]
Recycling raw materials from end-of-life electronics is the most effective solution to the growing e-waste problem. Most electronic devices contain a variety of materials, including metals that can be recovered for future uses. By dismantling and providing reuse possibilities, intact natural resources are conserved and air and water pollution caused by hazardous disposal is avoided. Additionally, recycling reduces the amount of greenhouse gas emissions caused by the manufacturing of new products.[76] Another benefit of recycling e-waste is that many of the materials can be recycled and re-used again. Materials that can be recycled include "ferrous (iron-based) and non-ferrous metals, glass, and various types of plastic." “Non-ferrous metals, mainly aluminum and copper can all be re-smelted and re-manufactured. Ferrous metals such as steel and iron can be also be re-used."[77] Due to the recent surge in popularity in 3D printing, certain 3D printers have been designed (FDM variety) to produce waste that can be easily recycled which decreases the amount of harmful pollutants in the atmosphere.[78] The excess plastic from these printers that comes out as a byproduct can also be reused to create new 3D printed creations.[79]
Benefits of recycling are extended when responsible recycling methods are used. In the U.S., responsible recycling aims to minimize the dangers to human health and the environment that disposed and dismantled electronics can create. Responsible recycling ensures best management practices of the electronics being recycled, worker health and safety, and consideration for the environment locally and abroad.[80] In Europe, metals that are recycled are returned to companies of origin at a reduced cost.[81] Through a committed recycling system, manufacturers in Japan have been pushed to make their products more sustainable. Since many companies were responsible for the recycling of their own products, this imposed responsibility on manufacturers requiring many to redesign their infrastructure. As a result, manufacturers in Japan have the added option to sell the recycled metals.[82]
Electronic waste substances[edit]




Several sizes of button and coin cell with 2 9v batteries as a size comparison. They are all recycled in many countries since they contain lead, mercury and cadmium.


Some computer components can be reused in assembling new computer products, while others are reduced to metals that can be reused in applications as varied as construction, flatware, and jewelry. Substances found in large quantities include epoxy resins, fiberglass, PCBs, PVC (polyvinyl chlorides), thermosetting plastics, lead, tin, copper, silicon, beryllium, carbon, iron, and aluminium. Elements found in small amounts include cadmium, mercury, and thallium.[83] Elements found in trace amounts include americium, antimony, arsenic, barium, bismuth, boron, cobalt, europium, gallium, germanium, gold, indium, lithium, manganese, nickel, niobium, palladium, platinum, rhodium, ruthenium, selenium, silver, tantalum, terbium, thorium, titanium, vanadium, and yttrium. Almost all electronics contain lead and tin (as solder) and copper (as wire and printed circuit board tracks), though the use of lead-free solder is now spreading rapidly. The following are ordinary applications:
Hazardous[edit]




Recyclers in the street in São Paulo, Brazil with old computers




E-Waste Component
Processed Used
Adverse Health Effects


Americium
The radioactive source in smoke alarms.
It is known to be carcinogenic.[84]


Lead
Solder, CRT monitor glass, lead-acid batteries, some formulations of PVC. A typical 15-inch cathode ray tube may contain 1.5 pounds of lead,[4] but other CRTs have been estimated as having up to 8 pounds of lead.
Adverse effects of lead exposure include impaired cognitive function, behavioral disturbances, attention deficits, hyperactivity, conduct problems, and lower IQ.[85] These effects are most damaging to children whose developing nervous systems are very susceptible to damage caused by lead, cadmium, and mercury.[86]


Mercury
Found in fluorescent tubes (numerous applications), tilt switches (mechanical doorbells, thermostats),[87] and flat screen monitors.
Health effects include sensory impairment, dermatitis, memory loss, and muscle weakness. Exposure in-utero causes fetal deficits in motor function, attention, and verbal domains.[85] Environmental effects in animals include death, reduced fertility, and slower growth and development.


Cadmium
Found in light-sensitive resistors, corrosion-resistant alloys for marine and aviation environments, and nickel-cadmium batteries. The most common form of cadmium is found in Nickel-cadmium rechargeable batteries. These batteries tend to contain between 6 and 18% cadmium. The sale of Nickel-Cadmium batteries has been banned in the European Union except for medical use. When not properly recycled it can leach into the soil, harming microorganisms and disrupting the soil ecosystem. Exposure is caused by proximity to hazardous waste sites and factories and workers in the metal refining industry.
The inhalation of cadmium can cause severe damage to the lungs and is also known to cause kidney damage.[88] Cadmium is also associated with deficits in cognition, learning, behavior, and neuromotor skills in children.[85]


Hexavalent chromium
Used in metal coatings to protect from corrosion.
A known carcinogen after occupational inhalation exposure.[85]
There is also evidence of cytotoxic and genotoxic effects of some chemicals, which have been shown to inhibit cell proliferation, cause cell membrane lesion, cause DNA single-strand breaks, and elevate Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels.[89]



Sulphur
Found in lead-acid batteries.
Health effects include liver damage, kidney damage, heart damage, eye and throat irritation. When released into the environment, it can create sulphuric acid through sulphur dioxide.


Brominated Flame Retardants (BFRs)
Used as flame retardants in plastics in most electronics. Includes PBBs, PBDE, DecaBDE, OctaBDE, PentaBDE.
Health effects include impaired development of the nervous system, thyroid problems, liver problems.[90] Environmental effects: similar effects as in animals as humans. PBBs were banned from 1973 to 1977 on. PCBs were banned during the 1980s.


Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)
Used as an antistatic additive in industrial applications and found in electronics, also found in non-stick cookware (PTFE). PFOAs are formed synthetically through environmental degradation.
Studies in mice have found the following health effects: Hepatotoxicity, developmental toxicity, immunotoxicity, hormonal effects and carcinogenic effects. Studies have found increased maternal PFOA levels to be associated with an increased risk of spontaneous abortion (miscarriage) and stillbirth. Increased maternal levels of PFOA are also associated with decreases in mean gestational age (preterm birth), mean birth weight (low birth weight), mean birth length (small for gestational age), and mean APGAR score.[91]


Beryllium oxide
Filler in some thermal interface materials such as thermal grease used on heatsinks for CPUs and power transistors,[92] magnetrons, X-ray-transparent ceramic windows, heat transfer fins in vacuum tubes, and gas lasers.
Occupational exposures associated with lung cancer, other common adverse health effects are beryllium sensitization, chronic beryllium disease, and acute beryllium disease.[93]


Other health effects

DNA breaks can increase the likelihood of developing cancer (if the damage is to a tumor suppressor gene)
DNA damages are a special problem in non-dividing or slowly dividing cells, where unrepaired damages will tend to accumulate over time. On the other hand, in rapidly dividing cells, unrepaired DNA damages that do not kill the cell by blocking replication will tend to cause replication errors and thus mutation
Elevated Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels can cause damage to cell structures (oxidative stress)[89]

Generally non-hazardous[edit]




An iMac G4 that has been repurposed into a lamp (photographed next to a Mac Classic and a flip phone).




E-Waste Component
Process Used


Aluminium
nearly all electronic goods using more than a few watts of power (heatsinks), electrolytic capacitors.


Copper
copper wire, printed circuit board tracks, component leads.


Germanium
1950s–1960s transistorized electronics (bipolar junction transistors).


Gold
connector plating, primarily in computer equipment.


Iron
steel chassis, cases, and fixings.


Lithium
lithium-ion batteries.


Nickel
nickel-cadmium batteries.


Silicon
glass, transistors, ICs, printed circuit boards.


Tin
solder, coatings on component leads.


Zinc
plating for steel parts.


See also[edit]


Environment portal
Electronics portal



2000s commodities boom
Computer Recycling
Digger gold
eDay
Electronic waste in Japan
Green computing
Mobile phone recycling
Material safety data sheet
Polychlorinated biphenyls
Retrocomputing
Radio Row

Policy and conventions:

Basel Action Network (BAN)
Basel Convention
China RoHS
e-Stewards
Restriction of Hazardous Substances Directive (RoHS)
Soesterberg Principles
Sustainable Electronics Initiative (SEI)
Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive


Organizations


Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance (ADISA)[94]
Empa
IFixit
International Network for Environmental Compliance and Enforcement
Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries (ISRI)
Solving the E-waste Problem
World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association

General:

Retail hazardous waste
Waste
Environmental racism in Europe#Romani settlements and e-waste (France)

References[edit]


^ Sakar, Anne. "Dad brought home lead, kids got sick". 
^ a b : Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ "WEEE CRT and Monitor Recycling". Executiveblueprints.com. 2 August 2009. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ a b Morgan, Russell (21 August 2006). "Tips and Tricks for Recycling Old Computers". SmartBiz. Retrieved 17 March 2009. 
^ "Defining & categorization of wastes via the regulations". ITGreen. 2 June 2013. Retrieved 21 June 2013. 
^ "Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment" (PDF). Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment. SBC e-Waste Africa Project. Retrieved 29 August 2011. 
^ Smedley, Tim. The Guardian, 2013. Web. 22 May 2015. <https://www.theguardian.com/sustainable-business/phonebloks-future-sustainable-smartphone
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics". US Environmental Protection Agency. Retrieved 13 March 2012. 
^ "Environment". ECD Mobile Recycling. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ Blau, J (November 2006). "UN Summit on e-waste: Nokia, Vodaphone and Others to Attend UN Summit on e-waste". CIO business magazine. 
^ Section, United Nations News Service (22 February 2010). "As e-waste mountains soar, UN urges smart technologies to protect health". United Nations-DPI/NMD – UN News Service Section. Retrieved 12 March 2012. 
^ a b "Urgent need to prepare developing countries for surges in E-Waste". 
^ Luthar, Breda. "Class, Cultural Capital, and the Mobile Phone." JSTOR. Web. 22 May 2015. .
^ "E-Waste: How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage." Science Space EWaste How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage Comments. 2014. Web. 22 May 2015.
^ http://www.electronicstakeback.com/wp-content/uploads/Facts_and_Figures_on_EWaste_and_Recycling.pdf
^ Kozlan, Melanie (2 November 2010). "What is 'E-Waste' & How Can I Get Rid of It?!". Four Green Steps. 
^ "Poison PCs and toxic TVs" (PDF). 
^ Ingenthron, Robin (31 March 2011). "Why We Should Ship Our Electronic "waste" to China and Africa". [Motherboard.tv]. 
^ Grossman, Elizabeth (10 April 2006). "Where computers go to die – and kill (4/10/2006)". Salon.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ Prashant, Nitya (20 August 2008). "Cash For Laptops Offers 'Green' Solution for Broken or Outdated Computers". Green Technology. Norwalk, Connecticut: Technology Marketing Corporation. Retrieved 17 March 2009.  In "CELL PHONE DISPOSAL AND STRATEGIC EVALUATION OF ELECTRONIC WASTE MANAGEMENT IN KENYA, A CASE OF MOBILE PHONE DEALERS IN KISUMU COUNTY" (PDF). European Centre for Research, Training and Development UK. December 2013. 
^ a b Basel Action Network; Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition (25 February 2002). "Exporting Harm: The High-Tech Trashing of Asia" (PDF). Seattle and San Jose. 
^ Chea, Terence (18 November 2007). "America Ships Electronic Waste Overseas". Associated Press. 
^ Slade, Giles (2006). "Made To Break: Technology and Obsolescence in America". Harvard University Press. 
^ a b Carroll (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Magazine Online. 
^ "Product or Waste? Importation and End-of-Life Processing of Computers in Peru", Ramzy Kahhat and Eric Williams, Center for Earth Systems Engineering and Management, Arizona State University, published Environmental Science and Technology June 2009.
^ Minter, Adam. "Shanghai Scrap". Wasted 7/7. The Atlantic. Retrieved 7 March 2011. 
^ "Illegal e-waste exposed". Greenpeace International. 
^ "E-Trash Industry Poses Hazards to Workers". 
^ Simmons, Dan (14 October 2005). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste in Ghana". YouTube. 
^ "Poisoning the poor – Electronic Waste in Ghana". Greenpeace International. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 5 August 2008. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 27 November 2006. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ Carney, Liz (19 December 2006). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste: High-impact Strategies". 
^ Slade, Giles. "Computer age leftovers". Denver Post. Retrieved 13 November 2006. 
^ "Export of toxic chemicals - A review of the case of uncontrolled electronic-waste recycling" (PDF). Environmental Pollution. 149. 2007. 
^ "Electronic Waste Dump of the World". Sometimes-interesting.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Persepectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "Lead". Centers of Disease Control and Prevention. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood lead levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "E-Waste Dump of the World". Seattletimes.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ "Where does e-waste end up?". Greenpeace. 
^ "STEP". STEP: Solving The E-waste Problem. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ Needhidasan, S; Samuel, M; Chidambaram, R (2014). "Electronic waste- an emerging threat to the environment of urban India" (PDF). Journal of Environmental Health Science & Engineering. 12: 36. PMC 3908467 . PMID 24444377. doi:10.1186/2052-336X-12-36. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ "High levels of PAH-metabolites in urine of e-waste recycling workers from Agbogbloshie, Ghana" (PDF). Science of the Total Environment. 2014. 
^ Frazzoli, C. &. (2010). Diagnostic health risk assessment of electronic waste on the general population in developing countries' scenarios. Environmental Impact Assessment Review , 388–399
^ Sthiannopkao, S. &. (2012). Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Inititatives, practices and consequences. Science of the Total Environment
^ Wath, S. B., Dutt, P. S., & Chakrabarti, T. (2011). E-Waste scenario in India, its management and implications. Environmental Monitoring and Assessment, pp. 172, 249–262.
^ a b "Africa’s Agbogbloshie Market Is a Computer Graveyard" NewsBreakingOnline.com. Web. 20 February 2011.
^ Doctorow, Cory. "Illegal E-waste Dumped in Ghana Includes Unencrypted Hard Drives Full of US Security Secrets." Boing Boing. 25 June 2009. Web. 15 March 2011.
^ Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ Yuan, C.; Zhang, H. C.; McKenna, G.; Korzeniewski, C.; Li, J. (2007). "Experimental Studies on Cryogenic Recycling of Printed Circuit Board". International Journal of Advanced Manufacturing Technology. 34: 657–666. doi:10.1007/s00170-006-0634-z. 
^ Fela, Jen (April 2010). "Developing countries face e-waste crisis". Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 8 (3): 117. JSTOR 20696446. doi:10.1890/1540-9295-8.3.116. 
^ "Data Destruction". www.pureplanetrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 
^ "E-cycling certification". Environmental Protection Agency. 2013. 
^ "Best Buy Recycles". Bestbuy.com. 2013. 
^ "Staples recycling and eco-stapling". Staples.com. 2013. 
^ "CEA – eCycle". http://www.ce.org. Retrieved 6 January 2015.  External link in |publisher= (help)
^ United States Environmental Protection Agency, Sustainable Materials Management Electronics Challenge. Retrieved from http://www.epa.gov/wastes/conserve/smm/electronics/index.htm
^ "Home – Electronics TakeBack Coalition". Electronicstakeback.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "How to Find a Responsible Recycler". Electronics TakeBack Coalition. 
^ "Default Parallels Plesk Panel Page". Certifiedelectronicsrecycler.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "Take Back My TV". 
^ "eWASA". 
^ "ecyclingcentral.com". ecyclingcentral.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "ewasteguide.info". ewasteguide.info. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics | eCycling | US EPA". Epa.gov. 28 June 2006. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "step-initiative.org". step-initiative.org. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "40 Million BGN Invested in Bulgaria's 1st Appliances Recycle Plant". Sofia News Agency. 28 June 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "Bulgaria Opens Largest WEEE Recycling Factory in Eastern Europe". Ask-eu.com. 12 July 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "WEEE recycling resources". Simsrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "Kwiat_Environmental Educatioin". Learning Ace. 
^ "Benefits of Recycling". hardrawgathering.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "What can be recycled from e-waste?". zerowaste.sa.gov.au. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "How to Print 3D Parts Better". sustainabilityworkshop.autodesk.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Zero or close to zero waste". plasticscribbler.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ Interagency Task Force on Electronics Stewardship. (20 July 2011). National Strategy for Electronics Stewardship
^ "THE FUTURE OF ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLING IN THE UNITED STATES: Obstacles and Domestic Solution" (PDF). sea.columbia.edu/. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Characteristics of E-waste Recycling System in Japan and China" (PDF). workspace.unpan.org. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Chemical fact sheet: Thallium". Spectrum Laboratories. Retrieved 2 February 2008. 
^ "Americium, Radioactive". TOXNET Toxicology Data Network. 
^ a b c d Chen, A., Dietrich, K. N., Huo, X., & Ho, S.-m. (2011). Developmental Neurotoxicants in E-Waste: An Emerging Health Concern. Environmental Health Perspectives , 119 (4), 431–438.
^ Chen, Aimin; Dietrich, Kim N.; Huo, Xia; Ho, Shuk-mei (2011-04-01). "Developmental neurotoxicants in e-waste: an emerging health concern". Environmental Health Perspectives. 119 (4): 431–438. ISSN 1552-9924. PMC 3080922 . PMID 21081302. doi:10.1289/ehp.1002452. 
^ "Question 8" (PDF). 
^ "Cadmium (Cd) – Chemical properties, Health and Environmental effects". Lenntech.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ a b Liulin, W., Meiling, H., Jing, A., Yufang, Z., Xuetong, W., Yangjun, W., et al. (2011). The cytotoxic and genetoxic effects of dust and soil samples from E-waste recycling area on L02 cells. Toxicology and Industrial Health , 27 (9), 831–839.
^ Birnbaum, LS; Staskal, DF (2004). "Brominated flame retardants: Cause for concern?" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 112: 9–17. PMC 1241790 . PMID 14698924. doi:10.1289/ehp.6559. 
^ Wu, K., Xu, X., Peng, L., Liu, J., Guo, Y., & Huo, X. (2012). Association between maternal exposure to perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) from electronic waste recycling and neonatal health outcomes. Environment International , 41, 1–8.
^ Becker, Greg; Lee, Chris; Lin, Zuchen (July 2005). "Thermal conductivity in advanced chips: Emerging generation of thermal greases offers advantages". Advanced Packaging: 2–4. Archived from the original on 21 June 2000. Retrieved 4 March 2008. 
^ "Health Effects". United States Department of Labor. Retrieved October 30, 2016. 
^ "ADISA website". Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 


Further reading[edit]

Hicks, C.; Dietmara, R.; Eugsterb, M. (2005). "The recycling and disposal of electrical and electronic waste in China—legislative and market responses". Environmental Impact Assessment Review. 25 (5): 459–471. ISSN 0195-9255. doi:10.1016/j.eiar.2005.04.007. 
Ogunseitan, O.A.; Schoenung, J.M.; Saphores, J-D.M.; Shapiro, A.A. (2009). "The Electronics Revolution: From E-Wonderland to E-Wasteland". Science. 326: 670–671. PMID 19900918. doi:10.1126/science.1176929. 
Toxics Link (February 2003). "Scrapping the Hi-tech Myth: Computer waste in India". India. Retrieved 25 March 2011. 
Cheng, I-Hwa, E-waste Trafficking: From Your Home to China 
United Nations University: THE GLOBAL E-WASTE MONITOR 2014 – Quantities, flows and resources, 2015
Li, J.; Zeng, X.; Chen, M.; Ogunseitan, O.A.; Stevels, A. (2015). ""Control-Alt-Delete": Rebooting Solutions for the E-Waste Problem". Environmental Science & Technology. 49 (12): 7095–7108. doi:10.1021/acs.est.5b00449. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Electronic waste.



Carroll, Chris (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Society. 
E-waste management: Scientific Recycling, Green E-products, Stringent Legislation Need of Hour
Sustainable Management of Electronics







v
t
e


Biosolids, waste and waste management



Major types



Agricultural wastewater
Biodegradable waste
Brown waste
Chemical waste
Construction waste
Demolition waste
Electronic waste

by country


Food waste
Green waste
Hazardous waste
Heat waste
Industrial waste
Litter
Marine debris
Biomedical waste
Mining waste
Municipal solid waste
Open defecation
Post-consumer waste
Radioactive waste
Scrap metal
Sewage
Toxic waste
Wastewater








Processes



Anaerobic digestion
Biodegradation
Composting
Garden waste dumping
Illegal dumping
Incineration
Landfill
Landfill mining
Mechanical biological treatment
Mechanical sorting
Open dump
Photodegradation
Recycling
Resource recovery
Sewage treatment
Waste collection
Waste picking
Waste sorting
Waste trade
Waste treatment
Waste-to-energy





Countries



Armenia
Bangladesh
Brazil
Hong Kong
India
Kazakhstan
New Zealand
Russia
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
UK
US





Agreements



Bamako Convention
Basel Convention
EU directives

batteries
landfills
RoHS
framework
incineration
waste water
WEEE


London Convention
Oslo Convention
OSPAR Convention





Other topics



Blue Ribbon Commission on America's Nuclear Future
Cleaner production
Downcycling
Eco-industrial park
Extended producer responsibility
High-level radioactive waste management
History of waste management
Landfill fire
Sewage regulation and administration
Upcycling
Waste hierarchy
Waste legislation
Waste minimisation
Zero waste








 Environment portal
 Category
 Commons
Concepts
Index
Journals
Lists
Organizations









Authority control



GND: 4324135-9










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Electronic_waste&oldid=791607037"					
Categories: Electronic wasteHidden categories: CS1 errors: external linksUse dmy dates from March 2016Articles needing cleanup from May 2013All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from May 2013Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from May 2013Articles needing additional references from May 2013All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from February 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2016Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡമലയാളംमराठीNederlands日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусскийසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenščinaSvenskaதமிழ்ไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 10:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Home | EWASTE+




























ServicesCompanyBlogContactCareers


pick updrop off









You've Come To The Right Place.
Electronics Recycling | Certified Data Destruction | Value Recovery









Electronics RecyclingEWASTE+ guarantees that our electronics recycling process is done safely, securely, and responsibly. Data DestructionAT EWASTE+ we’re certified and licensed to handle your data destruction requirements, and we will help you choose the custom solution most suitable for your business needs. Value RecoveryYour retired IT assets may have residual market value. Our ITAD process provides an opportunity to recover this value and reduce your overall expense. 


New York EPR LawUniversal WasteSpecialized Electronics RecyclingProduct DestructionMaterials Reporting & TrackingCommodity ManagementResidential Recycling





Our FacilityDedicated to our people and the environment we work in... 
Committed to our customers and the environment we live in.Tour
                            Our Facility
                            




7.32017HOLIDAY HOURS




888.563.1340


7318 Victor- Mendon RoadVictor, NY 14564







+

ServicesCompanyBlogContactResidential Recycling Careers

©2017 Ewaste+















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











About Us | EWASTE+





























ServicesCompanyBlogContactCareers


pick updrop off






Why Us?Our CertificationsOur QEH&S PolicyExecutive LeadershipOur TeamCommercial Pick Up





About Us





Expert recycling and management  of electronic waste is critical. 
Welcome to our world.
 
We are EWASTE+, a custom electronics recycler serving over 10,000 customers across the country. Formerly Regional Computer Recycling & Recovery; our service, responsiveness, and compliance expertise has made us the partner of choice for a wide range of businesses, government, medical, and educational organizations.
Since 1995, our purpose has been the same: to utilize environmentally sound processing methods that maximize value and recovery while eliminating the disposal of hazardous electronics and components into landfills—all while rigorously adhering to federal and state regulatory compliance. We operate large-scale processing, consolidating, sorting, product testing, and demanufacturing centers throughout New York State and - with our innovative logistics solutions - our reach extends nationwide.




Dedicated to our people and the environment we work in... Committed to our customers and the environment we live in.

EXPLORE OUR FACILITY!






Detailed and dedicated?

Join our team!








+

ServicesCompanyBlogContactResidential Recycling Careers

©2017 Ewaste+












 


Wastecorp Pumps - Pump Manufacturer 























Wastecorp


			United States/Canada (Change) | Contact Us



Products By



Industry


Wastewater


Water Treatment


Agriculture Pumps


Biodiesel Industry


Chemicals


Construction Pumps


Federal / Military


Food Processing Pumps


Marine Pumps


Mining Pumps


Oil & Gas Pumps


Power Generation


Pulp and Paper


Railway Industry




							| 
							Name


Diaphragm Pumps


Plunger Pumps


Double Disc Pumps


Trash Pumps


Waste containment


Water Trailers


Centrifugal Pumps


Manual Pumps


Grout Pumps


Marine Pumps


Vacuum Pumps


Dry Prime Pump


High Head Pumps











Plunger Pumps


All Products


PE Series


HPE Series


EHPE Series


Space Saver Sewage Pumps


Engine Driven Plunger Pumps


Plunger Pump Parts


Brochures


Case Studies


 Plunger Pump Movies


Advantages vs Others


Request Quote




Diaphragm Pumps


All Products


FA Series 


B Series Professional


Double Diaphragm Pumps


 BW Series


Honey Wagons - Waste Containment


Manual Diaphragm Pumps


Water Trailer Systems


Marine Pump Out


Diaphragm Pump Movies

Mud Sucker Case Studies


Request Quote




Double Disc Pumps


All Products


3" Single Disc


4" Single Disc


6" Single Disc


3" Double Disc


4" Double Disc


6" Double Disc


New! Engine Driven


Video


Compare Manufacturers


Sludge Pro Case Studies


Parts


Request Quote




Trash Pumps


All Products


TFCC-2


TFCC-3


TFCC-4


TFCC-6


TFCC-8


TFCC-10


TFCC-12


Engine Driven Trash Pumps


High Head Trash Pumps


Sewage Lift Stations


Municipal Bypass Pumps


Dry Prime Pumps


Request Quote


Brochures




Vacuum Pumps


All Products


TVP-65


TVP-200


TVP-300


TVP-450


TVP-600


TVP-800


TVP-1000


Video


Request Quote




Pump Parts


All Pump Parts


Diaphragm Pump Parts


Plunger Pump Parts


Trash Pump Parts


Centrifugal Pump Parts


Accessories


Request Quote



































Quick Menu
Find what you're looking for.

By Job Category



What's Your Job?
All
Wastewater
Water
Agricultural
Biodiesel Industry
Chemicals
Federal/Military
Food and Metals
Marine
Oil and Gas
Power Generation
Pulp and paper
Railway Industry
Construction Pumps



 
By Product Category




 Looking For? 
ANSI/ISO Process Pumps
Centrifugal Pumps
Circulation Pumps
Diaphragm Pumps
Double Disc Pumps
Double Diaphragm Pumps
End Suction Pumps
Grout Pumps
Honey Wagons
Manual Pumps
Marine Pumps
Plunger Pumps
Split Case Pumps
Trash Pumps
Vertical Sewage
Water Trailers
Parts











Find the Wastecorp Pump that's right for you

Wastewater Pumps
Industrial Pumps
Commercial Pumps
Marine Pumps






WASTEWATER

						Wastecorp is a manufacturer of sewage, sludge, dirty water and wastewater pumps for wastewater treatment facilities and public works applications. Our wide range of innovative equipment for WAS and RAS transfer will keep your facility pumping productively.
					

						Explore  the Wastecorp Pump equipment designed specifically with your application in mind.





Sludge Master® Plunger Pumps
Severe Duty Sludge Pumps Since 1928
View Plunger Pumps »








Mud Sucker®
Advanced Diaphragm Pumps
View Mud Sucker® Pumps »








Trash Flow® Trash Pumps
3"-12" Sizes. Max 6300 GPM
View Trash Flow® Pumps »








Sewage Lift Stations
Pre-engineered Lift Stations for Sewage Treatment
View Lift Stations »








Double Diaphragm Pumps
Professional Double Diaphragm Pumps for Solids
View Double Diaphragm Pumps »








Sludge Pro® Disc Pumps
A New Solution in The Market for Double Disc Pumps
View Disc Pump Options »



















INDUSTRIAL

						Wastecorp manufactures industrial pumps for over 450 industries including: chemical, pulp & paper, mining, mineral processing, oil & gas, power, water, wastewater and more. We specialize in custom pump designs for your specific application.
					





Mud Sucker® Diaphragm Pumps
Heavy Duty Industrial Diaphragm Pumps
View Diaphragm Pumps »








Trash Flow®
Mobile Trash Pumps Up to 6300 GPM
View Trash Pumps »








Mud Sucker DD Series™
Double Diaphragm Pumps to Transfer up to 280 GPM
View DD Series™ »








Waste Oil Collector Pro™
Grease Trap and Septic Waste Collection Systems
View Waste Oil Pump Outs »








Split Case Pumps
High Volume Water Transfer Up to 61,000 GPM
View Split Case Pumps »








Split Case Pumps
High Volume Water Transfer Up to 61,000 GPM
View Split Case Pumps »


















COMMERCIAL

						Wastecorp commercial pumps are designed for heavy duty contractor, construction, grounds keeping, hotels and resort management and much more. From our high performance water trailers, honey wagon septic pumps, and trash pumps to our Sludge Sucker manual diaphragm pump series, you'll get custom pump engineering that you can't find anywhere else.
					

						Explore all the Wastecorp Pump equipment designed specifically with your application in mind.
					





Mud Sucker® Diaphragm Pumps
Heavy Duty Electric Diaphragm Pumps or Optional Gas, Diesel, Hydraulic or Air.
View 2FA™ Series »








Wastecorp® Water Trailers
Fresh Water Delivery Systems
View Water Trailers »








Trash Flow® TFX™ Series
Contractor Style Trash Pumps Up to 460 GPM
View TFX™ Pumps »








Sludge Sucker® Pro Grout Pumps
Manual Grout Pumps for Contractor and Public Works Applications
View Sludge Sucker® »








Sludge Sucker® Manual Diaphragm Pumps
Heavy Duty Manual Pumps for Wastewater and Public Utility Applications
View Manual Diaphragm Pumps »








Honey Wagon Septic Pumps
Septic Waste Pump Outs
View Honey Wagons »



















MARINE

						Pumps for marine applications must be able to withstand the punishment of high use and changing weather. Wastecorp manufactures a wide change of pumps and sanitation systems for marine and marina applications. Select from dock side pump out stations, portable pump outs and emergency bilge pumps.
					

						Explore all the Wastecorp Pump equipment designed specifically with your application in mind.
					





Pedestal Pump Out
Compact Pump Out for Vessels of All Sizes
View Pedestal Pump Outs »








Marina Pump Out Stations
Fixed Dock Pump Out Stations
View Pump Outs»








Marina Septic Pump Out
Mobile Pump Out Systems That Maneuver Easily
View Mobile Septic Pumps »








Gas or Electric Diaphragm Pumps
The Only Pump Out to Use Mud Sucker Technology
View Pump Outs »








Sludge Sucker Manual Pump
Hand Operated Professional Bilge Pumps
View Hand Pumps »








Double Pump Out
Heavy Duty Double Diaphragm Pumps for Dredging and Septic Waste
View Double Pump Outs»























Quick Links



Connect with Wastecorp:
Facebook
YouTube
Twitter




Register Your Pump
Register your Wastecorp Pump product quickly and easily.
Go




Maintenance Tips & How-To's
Get tips and see video on how to keep your Wastecorp brand pump operating like new.
Go




Find Parts
Get original equipment parts to keep your pump working great.Go




2017 Brochures
See the latest Wastecorp brochures for the current model year. Download or request your copy to be mailed.
Go







Wastecorp


Products

Diaphragm Pumps
Plunger Pumps
Trash Pumps
Double Disc Pumps
Vacuum Pumps
Pumps Parts
Remediation Pumps
Water Trailers



General Information

Pump Financing
About Wastecorp Pumps
Markets
Training & Installation
Distributors
Other Wastecorp Products
Blog



Get a Quote

Online Pump RFQ
Online Parts RFQ
Request for Information

Share This

 










© 2017 Wastecorp. All Rights Reserved. Use of this site is subject to certain Terms of Use which constitute a legal agreement between you and Wastecorp Pumps.


Sitemap | Privacy Policy














E-Waste-Product, Process, Company Profiles, Patent, Project, Market, 
Management, Report, Consultants










                          
       
      
E -Waste                                                                                     
      Product, Process, Company Profiles, Patent, Project, Market, 
      Management, Report, Consultants 
                                             
      Primary Information 
      Services                                                                     
Home. 
		Cell Phone Recycling .Ordering Information. 
		Contact

 

 









		Information @ a Glance


Contents on the CD Rom 
           



Electronic waste 
        includes computers, entertainment electronics, mobile phones and other 
        items that have been discarded by their original users. While there is 
        no generally accepted definition of electronic waste, in most cases 
        electronic waste consists of electronic products that were used for data 
        processing, telecommunications, or entertainment in private households 
        and businesses that are now considered obsolete, broken, or irreparable.
        
Despite its common 
        classification as a waste, disposed electronics are a considerable 
        category of secondary resource due to their significant suitability for 
        direct reuse (for example, many fully functional computers and 
        components are discarded during upgrades), refurbishing, and material 
        recycling of its constituent raw materials (listed below). Re 
        conceptualization of electronic waste as a resource thus preempts its 
        potentially hazardous qualities.
Electronic waste 
        processing systems have matured in recent years following increased 
        regulatory, public, and commercial scrutiny, and a commensurate increase 
        in entrepreneurial interest. Part of this evolution has involved greater 
        diversion of electronic waste from energy intensive, down-cycling 
        processes (eg. conventional recycling) where equipment is reverted to a 
        raw material form. 
This diversion is 
        achieved through reuse and refurbishing. The environmental and social 
        benefits of reuse are several: diminished demand for new products and 
        their commensurate requirement for virgin raw materials (with their own 
        environmental externalities not factored into the cost of the raw 
        materials) and larger quantities of pure water and electricity for 
        associated manufacturing, less packaging per unit, availability of 
        technology to wider swaths of society due to greater affordability of 
        products, and diminished use of landfills.
Some states in the US 
        developed policies banning CRTs from landfills. Some e-waste processing 
        is carried out within the US. The processing may be dismantling into 
        metals, plastics and circuit boards or shredding of whole appliances. 
        From  the state of California introduced a Electronic Waste 
        Recycling Fee on all new monitors and televisions sold to cover the cost 
        of recycling.
 The amount of 
        the fee depends on the size of the monitor. Canada has also begun to 
        take responsibility for electronics recycling. For example, in 
        California was added to the cost of purchasing new televisions, 
        computers, and computer components in British Columbia. The new 
        legislation made recycling mandatory for all of those products.
The world is set to 
        generate 40 million metric tons of electronic waste (e waste) this year, 
        enough to fill a line of trucks stretching halfway around the world. E 
        waste is rising three times faster than other forms of waste. 



Waste Management Inc., 
        which has several facilities around the country dedicated to the de 
        manufacturing of collected end-of-life electronic equipment, likewise 
        believes that price can not be a factor in cities' decisions about how 
        to handle their collected materials, particularly at this point in the 
        development of the e-waste market.


E-waste is consumer and 
        business electronic equipment that is near or at the end of its useful 
        life. Certain components of electronic products contain materials that 
        render them hazardous, and include heavy metals such as lead, cadmium, 
        mercury and arsenic. Many of these elements are extremely valuable, such 
        as gold and platinum, while the majority of them are non-renewable.



General

E-Waste

Electronic Waste

Electronic Product Management

Solid Waste Fact 
    Sheet

Frequently Asked Questions

Free Computer Recycling  

Electronic Waste 
    FAQ

Commonly Asked Questions

Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment

Video clip

Process


Recycling Process

Recycling E-waste in Chile

Our Recycle Process

Process Of Recycle

Recycling Debate

Electronic Waste - Recycling Services

The Electronics Recycling Process

E-waste 
    processing in the informal sector

Electronic Waste Recycling

A True Closed Loop Recycling Process

E Tech Recycling

Business Model & Process

Cell Phone

Cell Phone Recycling

Computers

Company Profile


Australian Recycling 
		company

Company In USA

Company In 
    Austin

Company In 
    New York

Company In India

Company In Scotland

Company In North America

Company In Levittown

Company In UK

Company In Penang

Company In India

Company In Atlanta

Consultants


Consultants In America

Consultants In Canada

Consultants In India

Consultants In Indiana

Consultants In US

Market


Apple And The Environment

Status Of E Waste Management

E-Waste  
    The Worlds Fastest Growing Waste Problem

China Becomes Prime 
    Global Victim of "E-waste"

Ict Sector

E waste & Trade

EU Ban Opens E-Waste Market

E waste

E-Waste 
    Problem

Tapping e-waste 
    business  

The cost of e-waste

E Waste Trade Value Chain

Management


Integrated Waste Management Board

Electronic 
    Waste  Management Activities

E-waste Management Policy

E-waste Management and Pollution Prevention

IT Waste Management In Canada

E Waste Policy Issues

E-Waste Policy for India

Creation 
    Of Optimum Knowledge Bank For efficient E Waste

Hazards


E-waste hazards

E-waste hazards in China

E-waste Report

Electronic Hazardous Waste

Recycling Of Electronic Waste

Electronic Waste Is A Social & 
    Global Issue.

E Waste Solutions

Toxic Tech

WEEE  
Hazards

China's E waste



Technology


CRT Recycling system 

CRT Monitor Processing 

CRT Recycling system & 
		Equipments 

CRT Recycling Machine 

Innovation in 
    e-waste from beginning to end of life

Momentum builds for revolution to 
    recycle electronic waste

Reuse and 
    Green Your Network

States 
    Adopt E-Waste Legislation

There is a new 
    trend in trash - e-waste

New Material Development Key to Successful 
    Electronic Waste Recovery

Product


Supreme Computer & Recycling

E Waste Products

Trishyiraya Recycling

Patent


Continuous adiabatic process

Methods for Deployment & Recycling

Streams Of E waste

Thermionic Reactor

Method and apparatus for striping a tire sidewall

Project


An Indian 
    Perspective

Project Coverage : 
		required details

Cell Phone recycling - 
		Feasibility 

E-Waste - India Report 

India - Sweden : 
		Comparison 

E Waste Inventory

E-Waste Recycling 
    Assessment

E Waste Product Life Cycle

Project - Case Study 

E-Waste, Project

Conceptual Business Plan
		For an Electronic Product Stewardship 

E-Waste 
    Channels

E-waste Projects 
    Under the Basel Convention

Electronic Waste Management

Report


The mechanics of e-waste recycling  

Electronic Waste 
    Recycling Collection

Environmental Technology Council

Recycling E-Waste

New E-Waste 
    Recycling Laws

Dumping ground for e-waste

E-waste crisis

The Issues 
    Surrounding this Hot Recycling Topic

Electronic Waste 
    Recycling Rules Go Into Effect
Electronic Waste recycling 
    development

Computer Recycling

Electronic Waste 
    Recycling Trial  

The E-Waste Tsunami

Rules & Regulations
E-waste rules driving change in 
    United States

Electronic Waste 
    Recycling Promotion
E-Waste 
    Regulations
 Addition Of 
    Rules
Indian rules

Connecticut 
    Recyclers Coalition Supports Shared Responsibility for  E-Waste 
    Recycling

Waste rules affect global market

Electronics Waste
Recycling for 
    the Next Generation

New 
    rules target dangerous e-waste

Pollution Control
Perspectives 
    of Electronic Waste Management  

E Waste 
    Management

Draft Guidelines for 
    Environmentally Sound 
    Management of Electronic Waste  

E-waste, a major threat to 
    environment  

Air 
    Pollution Control Board
Electronic waste

Guidelines


Consumer's Guide To Electronics Recycle

Electronic Waste Guide

Guidelines

International activities on E-waste and guidelines for future work

E Waste 
    Guidelines

Guidelines 
    for Developing Activities

Electronic Waste


Order the CD ROM Today







Primary 
      Information Services 21 Murugappan St, SwamyNagar 
      Ext2, Ullagaram, Chennai - 600091, India.
       Phone: 
      91 44 22421080  Email :
      informer@eth.net

Mobile 
      numbers:9940043898, 9444008898  Fax : 91 44 
      22423753



Electronic waste - Wikipedia






















 






Electronic waste

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"WEEE" redirects here. For the EU directive, see Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive.






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: fix References Please help improve this article if you can. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Defective and obsolete electronic equipment


Electronic waste or e-waste describes discarded electrical or electronic devices. Used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal are also considered e-waste. Informal processing of e-waste in developing countries can lead to adverse human health effects and environmental pollution.
Electronic scrap components, such as CPUs, contain potentially harmful components such as lead, cadmium, beryllium, or brominated flame retardants. Recycling and disposal of e-waste may involve significant risk to health of workers and communities in developed countries[1] and great care must be taken to avoid unsafe exposure in recycling operations and leaking of materials such as heavy metals from landfills and incinerator ashes.[2]



Contents


1 Definition
2 Amount of electronic waste worldwide
3 Global trade issues

3.1 Trade
3.2 Guiyu
3.3 Other informal e-waste recycling sites


4 Environmental impact
5 Information security
6 E-waste management

6.1 Recycling


7 Recycling

7.1 Consumer awareness efforts
7.2 Processing techniques
7.3 Benefits of recycling


8 Electronic waste substances

8.1 Hazardous
8.2 Generally non-hazardous


9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Definition[edit]












Hoarding (left), disassembling (center) and collecting (right) electronic waste in Bengaluru, India


"Electronic waste" or "E-Waste" may be defined as discarded computers, office electronic equipment, entertainment device electronics, mobile phones, television sets, and refrigerators. This includes used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal. Others are re-usables (working and repairable electronics) and secondary scrap (copper, steel, plastic, etc.) to be "commodities", and reserve the term "waste" for residue or material which is dumped by the buyer rather than recycled, including residue from reuse and recycling operations, because loads of surplus electronics are frequently commingled (good, recyclable, and non-recyclable), several public policy advocates apply the term "e-waste" broadly to all surplus electronics. Cathode ray tubes (CRTs) are considered one of the hardest types to recycle.[3]
CRTs have relatively high concentration of lead and phosphors (not to be confused with phosphorus), both of which are necessary for the display. The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) includes discarded CRT monitors in its category of "hazardous household waste"[4] but considers CRTs that have been set aside for testing to be commodities if they are not discarded, speculatively accumulated, or left unprotected from weather and other damage.
The EU and its member states operate a system via the European Waste Catalogue (EWC)- a European Council Directive, which is interpreted into "member state law". In the UK, this is in the form of the List of Wastes Directive. However, the list (and EWC) gives broad definition (EWC Code 16 02 13*) of Hazardous Electronic wastes, requiring "waste operators" to employ the Hazardous Waste Regulations (Annex 1A, Annex 1B) for refined definition. Constituent materials in the waste also require assessment via the combination of Annex II and Annex III, again allowing operators to further determine whether a waste is hazardous.[5]
Debate continues over the distinction between "commodity" and "waste" electronics definitions. Some exporters are accused of deliberately leaving difficult-to-recycle, obsolete, or non-repairable equipment mixed in loads of working equipment (though this may also come through ignorance, or to avoid more costly treatment processes). Protectionists may broaden the definition of "waste" electronics in order to protect domestic markets from working secondary equipment.
The high value of the computer recycling subset of electronic waste (working and reusable laptops, desktops, and components like RAM) can help pay the cost of transportation for a larger number of worthless pieces than can be achieved with display devices, which have less (or negative) scrap value. In A 2011 report, "Ghana E-Waste Country Assessment",[6] found that of 215,000 tons of electronics imported to Ghana, 30% were brand new and 70% were used. Of the used product, the study concluded that 15% was not reused and was scrapped or discarded. This contrasts with published but uncredited claims that 80% of the imports into Ghana were being burned in primitive conditions.
Amount of electronic waste worldwide[edit]




A fragment of discarded circuit board.


Rapid changes in technology, changes in media (tapes, software, MP3), falling prices, and planned obsolescence have resulted in a fast-growing surplus of electronic waste around the globe. Technical solutions are available, but in most cases, a legal framework, a collection, logistics, and other services need to be implemented before a technical solution can be applied.
Display units (CRT, LCD, LED monitors), processors (CPU, GPU, or APU chips), memory (DRAM or SRAM), and audio components have different useful lives. Processors are most frequently out-dated (by software no longer being optimized) and are more likely to become "e-waste" while display units are most often replaced while working without repair attempts, due to changes in wealthy nation appetites for new display technology. This problem could potentially be solved with modular smartphones or Phonebloks. These types of phones are more durable and have the technology to change certain parts of the phone making them more environmentally friendly. Being able to simply replace the part of the phone that is broken will reduce e-waste.[7] An estimated 50 million tons of E-waste are produced each year.[2] The USA discards 30 million computers each year and 100 million phones are disposed of in Europe each year. The Environmental Protection Agency estimates that only 15–20% of e-waste is recycled, the rest of these electronics go directly into landfills and incinerators.[8][9]
In 2006, the United Nations estimated the amount of worldwide electronic waste discarded each year to be 50 million metric tons.[10] According to a report by UNEP titled, "Recycling – from E-Waste to Resources," the amount of e-waste being produced – including mobile phones and computers – could rise by as much as 500 percent over the next decade in some countries, such as India.[11] The United States is the world leader in producing electronic waste, tossing away about 3 million tons each year.[12] China already produces about 2.3 million tons (2010 estimate) domestically, second only to the United States. And, despite having banned e-waste imports, China remains a major e-waste dumping ground for developed countries.[12]
Society today revolves around technology and by the constant need for the newest and most high-tech products we are contributing to mass amount of e-waste.[13] Since the invention of the iPhone, cell phones have become the top source of e-waste products because they are not made to last more than two years. Electrical waste contains hazardous but also valuable and scarce materials. Up to 60 elements can be found in complex electronics.[14] As of 2013, Apple has sold over 796 million iDevices (iPod, iPhone, iPad). Cell phone companies make cell phones that are not made to last so that the consumer will purchase new phones. Companies give these products such short life spans because they know that the consumer will want a new product and will buy it if they make it.[15] In the United States, an estimated 70% of heavy metals in landfills comes from discarded electronics.[16][17]
While there is agreement that the number of discarded electronic devices is increasing, there is considerable disagreement about the relative risk (compared to automobile scrap, for example), and strong disagreement whether curtailing trade in used electronics will improve conditions, or make them worse. According to an article in Motherboard, attempts to restrict the trade have driven reputable companies out of the supply chain, with unintended consequences.[18]
Global trade issues[edit]
See also: Global Waste Trade and Electronic waste by country




Electronic waste is often exported to developing countries.






4.5-volt, D, C, AA, AAA, AAAA, A23, 9-volt, CR2032, and LR44 cells are all recyclable in most countries.






The E-waste centre of Agbogbloshie, Ghana, where electronic waste is burnt and disassembled with no safety or environmental considerations.


One theory is that increased regulation of electronic waste and concern over the environmental harm in nature economies creates an economic disincentive to remove residues prior to export. Critics of trade in used electronics maintain that it is still too easy for brokers calling themselves recyclers to export unscreened electronic waste to developing countries, such as China,[19] India and parts of Africa, thus avoiding the expense of removing items like bad cathode ray tubes (the processing of which is expensive and difficult). The developing countries have become toxic dump yards of e-waste. Proponents of international trade point to the success of fair trade programs in other industries, where cooperation has led to creation of sustainable jobs and can bring affordable technology in countries where repair and reuse rates are higher.
Defenders of the trade[who?] in used electronics say that extraction of metals from virgin mining has been shifted to developing countries. Recycling of copper, silver, gold, and other materials from discarded electronic devices is considered better for the environment than mining. They also state that repair and reuse of computers and televisions has become a "lost art" in wealthier nations and that refurbishing has traditionally been a path to development.
South Korea, Taiwan, and southern China all excelled in finding "retained value" in used goods, and in some cases have set up billion-dollar industries in refurbishing used ink cartridges, single-use cameras, and working CRTs. Refurbishing has traditionally been a threat to established manufacturing, and simple protectionism explains some criticism of the trade. Works like "The Waste Makers" by Vance Packard explain some of the criticism of exports of working product, for example, the ban on import of tested working Pentium 4 laptops to China, or the bans on export of used surplus working electronics by Japan.
Opponents of surplus electronics exports argue that lower environmental and labor standards, cheap labor, and the relatively high value of recovered raw materials leads to a transfer of pollution-generating activities, such as smelting of copper wire. In China, Malaysia, India, Kenya, and various African countries, electronic waste is being sent to these countries for processing, sometimes illegally. Many surplus laptops are routed to developing nations as "dumping grounds for e-waste".[20]
Because the United States has not ratified the Basel Convention or its Ban Amendment, and has few domestic federal laws forbidding the export of toxic waste, the Basel Action Network estimates that about 80% of the electronic waste directed to recycling in the U.S. does not get recycled there at all, but is put on container ships and sent to countries such as China.[21][22][23][24] This figure is disputed as an exaggeration by the EPA, the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, and the World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association.
Independent research by Arizona State University showed that 87–88% of imported used computers did not have a higher value than the best value of the constituent materials they contained, and that "the official trade in end-of-life computers is thus driven by reuse as opposed to recycling".[25]
Trade[edit]
Proponents of the trade say growth of internet access is a stronger correlation to trade than poverty. Haiti is poor and closer to the port of New York than southeast Asia, but far more electronic waste is exported from New York to Asia than to Haiti. Thousands of men, women, and children are employed in reuse, refurbishing, repair, and re-manufacturing, unsustainable industries in decline in developed countries. Denying developing nations access to used electronics may deny them sustainable employment, affordable products, and internet access, or force them to deal with even less scrupulous suppliers. In a series of seven articles for The Atlantic, Shanghai-based reporter Adam Minter describes many of these computer repair and scrap separation activities as objectively sustainable.[26]
Opponents of the trade argue that developing countries utilize methods that are more harmful and more wasteful. An expedient and prevalent method is simply to toss equipment onto an open fire, in order to melt plastics and to burn away non-valuable metals. This releases carcinogens and neurotoxins into the air, contributing to an acrid, lingering smog. These noxious fumes include dioxins and furans. Bonfire refuse can be disposed of quickly into drainage ditches or waterways feeding the ocean or local water supplies.[24]
In June 2008, a container of electronic waste, destined from the Port of Oakland in the U.S. to Sanshui District in mainland China, was intercepted in Hong Kong by Greenpeace.[27] Concern over exports of electronic waste were raised in press reports in India,[28][29] Ghana,[30][31][32] Côte d'Ivoire,[33] and Nigeria.[34]
Guiyu[edit]
Main article: Electronic waste in China
Guiyu in the Shantou region of China is a massive electronic waste processing community.[21][35][36] It is often referred to as the "e-waste capital of the world." Traditionally, Guiyu was an agricultural community; however, in the mid-1990s it transformed into an e-waste recycling center involving over 75% of the local households and an additional 100,000 migrant workers.[37] Thousands of individual workshops employ laborers to snip cables, pry chips from circuit boards, grind plastic computer cases into particles, and dip circuit boards in acid baths to dissolve the precious metals. Others work to strip insulation from all wiring in an attempt to salvage tiny amounts of copper wire.[38] Uncontrolled burning, disassembly, and disposal has led to a number of environmental problems such as groundwater contamination, atmospheric pollution, and water pollution either by immediate discharge or from surface runoff (especially near coastal areas), as well as health problems including occupational safety and health effects among those directly and indirectly involved, due to the methods of processing the waste.
A number of studies have been conducted to measure a number of chemicals associated with informal e-waste recycling in the populations. One study enrolled children from Guiyu and a control site 50 km away to measure blood lead levels (BLLs).[39] The average BLL in Guiyu was 15.3 ug/dL compared to 9.9 ug/dL in the control site. In the United States, the CDC has set a reference level for blood lead at 5 ug/dL.[40] High levels of lead in young children can impact IQ and the development of the central nervous system. The highest concentrations of lead were found in the children of parents whose workshop dealt with circuit boards and the lowest was among those who recycled plastic.[41]
Six of the many villages in Guiyu specialize in circuit-board disassembly, seven in plastics and metals reprocessing, and two in wire and cable disassembly. Greenpeace, an environmental group, sampled dust, soil, river sediment, and groundwater in Guiyu. They found very high levels of toxic heavy metals and organic contaminants in both places.[42] Lai Yun, a campaigner for the group found "over 10 poisonous metals, such as lead, mercury, and cadmium."
Guiyu is only one example of digital dumps but similar places can be found across the world in Nigeria, Ghana, and India.[43] With amounts of e-waste growing rapidly each year urgent solutions are required. While the waste continues to flow into digital dumps like Guiyu, there are measures that can help reduce the flow of e-waste.[44]
A suggested preventative step involves the major electronics firms removing the worst chemicals in their products in order to make them safer and easier to recycle.
Other informal e-waste recycling sites[edit]




A pile of discarded TVs and computer monitors.


Guiyu is likely one of the oldest and largest informal e-waste recycling sites in the world, however, there are many sites worldwide, including India, Ghana, Nigeria, and the Philippines. Most research involving informal e-waste recycling has been done in Guiyu, but there are a handful of studies that describe exposure levels in e-waste workers, the community, and the environment.[citation needed] Bangalore, located in southern India, is often referred as the "Silicon Valley of India" and has a growing informal e-waste recycling sector.[45][46] Hair samples were collected from workers at an e-waste recycling facility and an e-waste recycling slum community in Bangalore.[47] Levels of V, Cr, Mn, Mo, Sn, Tl, and Pb were significantly higher in the workers at the e-waste recycling facility compared to the e-waste workers in the slum community. However, Co, Ag, Cd, and Hg levels were significantly higher in the slum community workers compared to the facility workers. A study in Ghana found higher levels of urinary PAH-metabolites in e-waste workers compared to unexposed controls.[48] They also found a greater frequency of complaints of cough, chest pain, and vertigo from those exposed to emissions from the e-waste recycling processes.
Environmental impact[edit]




Old keyboards and one mouse.


The processes of dismantling and disposing of electronic waste in developing countries led to a number of environmental impacts as illustrated in the graphic. Liquid and atmospheric releases end up in bodies of water, groundwater, soil, and air and therefore in land and sea animals – both domesticated and wild, in crops eaten by both animals and human, and in drinking water.[49]
One study of environmental effects in Guiyu, China found the following:[50]

Airborne dioxins – one type found at 100 times levels previously measured
Levels of carcinogens in duck ponds and rice paddies exceeded international standards for agricultural areas and cadmium, copper, nickel, and lead levels in rice paddies were above international standards
Heavy metals found in road dust – lead over 300 times that of a control village's road dust and copper over 100 times

The environmental impact of the processing of different electronic waste components


E-Waste Component
Process Used
Potential Environmental Hazard


Cathode ray tubes (used in TVs, computer monitors, ATM, video cameras, and more)
Breaking and removal of yoke, then dumping
Lead, barium and other heavy metals leaching into the ground water and release of toxic phosphor


Printed circuit board (image behind table – a thin plate on which chips and other electronic components are placed)
De-soldering and removal of computer chips; open burning and acid baths to remove metals after chips are removed.
Air emissions and discharge into rivers of glass dust, tin, lead, brominated dioxin, beryllium cadmium, and mercury


Chips and other gold plated components
Chemical stripping using nitric and hydrochloric acid and burning of chips
PAHs, heavy metals, brominated flame retardants discharged directly into rivers acidifying fish and flora. Tin and lead contamination of surface and groundwater. Air emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and PAHs


Plastics from printers, keyboards, monitors, etc.
Shredding and low temp melting to be reused
Emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and hydrocarbons


Computer wires
Open burning and stripping to remove copper
PAHs released into air, water, and soil.


[51]
Information security[edit]
E-waste presents a potential security threat to individuals and exporting countries. Hard drives that are not properly erased before the computer is disposed of can be reopened, exposing sensitive information. Credit card numbers, private financial data, account information, and records of online transactions can be accessed by most willing individuals. Organized criminals in Ghana commonly search the drives for information to use in local scams.[52] Electronic files about government contracts have been discovered on hard drives found in Agbogbloshie. Multimillion-dollar agreements from United States security institutions such as the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), the Transportation Security Administration, and Homeland Security have all resurfaced in Agbogbloshie.[52][53]
E-waste management[edit]
Recycling[edit]




Computer monitors are typically packed into low stacks on wooden pallets for recycling and then shrink-wrapped.


See also: Computer recycling
Audiovisual components, televisions, VCRs, stereo equipment, mobile phones, other handheld devices, and computer components contain valuable elements and substances suitable for reclamation, including lead, copper, and gold.
Recycling[edit]
One of the major challenges is recycling the printed circuit boards from the electronic wastes. The circuit boards contain such precious metals as gold, silver, platinum, etc. and such base metals as copper, iron, aluminum, etc. One way e-waste is processed is by melting circuit boards, burning cable sheathing to recover copper wire and open- pit acid leaching for separating metals of value.[54] Conventional method employed is mechanical shredding and separation but the recycling efficiency is low. Alternative methods such as cryogenic decomposition have been studied for printed circuit board recycling,[55] and some other methods are still under investigation. Properly disposing of or reusing electronics can help prevent health problems, reduce greenhouse-gas emissions, and create jobs.[56] Reuse and refurbishing offer a more environmentally friendly and socially conscious alternative to downcycling processes.[citation needed]
Consumer awareness efforts[edit]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency encourages electronic recyclers to become certified by demonstrating to an accredited, independent third party auditor that they meet specific standards to safely recycle and manage electronics. This should work so as to ensure the highest environmental standards are being maintained. Two certifications for electronic recyclers currently exist and are endorsed by the EPA. Customers are encouraged to choose certified electronics recyclers. Responsible electronics recycling reduces environmental and human health impacts, increases the use of reusable and refurbished equipment and reduces energy use while conserving limited resources. The two EPA-endorsed certification programs are Responsible Recyclers Practices (R2) and E-Stewards. Certified companies ensure they are meeting strict environmental standards which maximize reuse and recycling, minimize exposure to human health or the environment, ensure safe management of materials and require destruction of all data used on electronics.[57] Certified electronics recyclers have demonstrated through audits and other means that they continually meet specific high environmental standards and safely manage used electronics. Once certified, the recycler is held to the particular standard by continual oversight by the independent accredited certifying body. A certification board accredits and oversees certifying bodies to ensure that they meet specific responsibilities and are competent to audit and provide certification.[58]
Some U.S. retailers offer opportunities for consumer recycling of discarded electronic devices.[59][60] In the US, the Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) urges consumers to dispose properly of end-of-life electronics through its recycling locator at www.GreenerGadgets.org. This list only includes manufacturer and retailer programs that use the strictest standards and third-party certified recycling locations, to provide consumers assurance that their products will be recycled safely and responsibly. CEA research has found that 58 percent of consumers know where to take their end-of-life electronics, and the electronics industry would very much like to see that level of awareness increase. Consumer electronics manufacturers and retailers sponsor or operate more than 5,000 recycling locations nationwide and have vowed to recycle one billion pounds annually by 2016,[61] a sharp increase from 300 million pounds industry recycled in 2010.
The Sustainable Materials Management Electronic Challenge was created by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). Participants of the Challenge are manufacturers of electronics and electronic retailers. These companies collect end-of-life (EOL) electronics at various locations and send them to a certified, third-party recycler. Program participants are then able publicly promote and report 100% responsible recycling for their companies.[62] The Electronics TakeBack Coalition[63] is a campaign aimed at protecting human health and limiting environmental effects where electronics are being produced, used, and discarded. The ETBC aims to place responsibility for disposal of technology products on electronic manufacturers and brand owners, primarily through community promotions and legal enforcement initiatives. It provides recommendations for consumer recycling and a list of recyclers judged environmentally responsible.[64]
The Certified Electronics Recycler program[65] for electronic recyclers is a comprehensive, integrated management system standard that incorporates key operational and continual improvement elements for quality, environmental and health and safety (QEH&S) performance. The grassroots Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition focuses on promoting human health and addresses environmental justice problems resulting from toxins in technologies. The World Reuse, Repair, and Recycling Association (wr3a.org) is an organization dedicated to improving the quality of exported electronics, encouraging better recycling standards in importing countries, and improving practices through "Fair Trade" principles. Take Back My TV[66] is a project of The Electronics TakeBack Coalition and grades television manufacturers to find out which are responsible and which are not.
The e-Waste Association of South Africa (eWASA)[67] has been instrumental in building a network of e-waste recyclers and refurbishers in the country. It continues to drive the sustainable, environmentally sound management of all e-waste in South Africa. E-Cycling Central is a website from the Electronic Industry Alliance which allows you to search for electronic recycling programs in your state. It lists different recyclers by state to find reuse, recycle, or find donation programs across the country.[68] Ewasteguide.info is a Switzerland-based website dedicated to improving the e-waste situation in developing and transitioning countries. The site contains news, events, case studies, and more.[69] StEP: Solving the E-Waste Problem This website of StEP, an initiative founded by various UN organizations to develop strategies to solve the e-waste problem, follows its activities and programs.[70][71]
Processing techniques[edit]




Recycling the lead from batteries.


In many developed countries, electronic waste processing usually first involves dismantling the equipment into various parts (metal frames, power supplies, circuit boards, plastics), often by hand, but increasingly by automated shredding equipment. A typical example is the NADIN electronic waste processing plant in Novi Iskar, Bulgaria—the largest facility of its kind in Eastern Europe.[72][73] The advantages of this process are the human's ability to recognize and save working and repairable parts, including chips, transistors, RAM, etc. The disadvantage is that the labor is cheapest in countries with the lowest health and safety standards.
In an alternative bulk system,[74] a hopper conveys material for shredding into an unsophisticated mechanical separator, with screening and granulating machines to separate constituent metal and plastic fractions, which are sold to smelters or plastics recyclers. Such recycling machinery is enclosed and employs a dust collection system. Some of the emissions are caught by scrubbers and screens. Magnets, eddy currents, and Trommel screens are employed to separate glass, plastic, and ferrous and nonferrous metals, which can then be further separated at a smelter.
Leaded glass from CRTs is reused in car batteries, ammunition, and lead wheel weights, or sold to foundries as a fluxing agent in processing raw lead ore. Copper, gold, palladium, silver and tin are valuable metals sold to smelters for recycling. Hazardous smoke and gases are captured, contained and treated to mitigate environmental threat. These methods allow for safe reclamation of all valuable computer construction materials. Hewlett-Packard product recycling solutions manager Renee St. Denis describes its process as: "We move them through giant shredders about 30 feet tall and it shreds everything into pieces about the size of a quarter. Once your disk drive is shredded into pieces about this big, it's hard to get the data off".[75] An ideal electronic waste recycling plant combines dismantling for component recovery with increased cost-effective processing of bulk electronic waste. Reuse is an alternative option to recycling because it extends the lifespan of a device. Devices still need eventual recycling, but by allowing others to purchase used electronics, recycling can be postponed and value gained from device use.
Benefits of recycling[edit]
Recycling raw materials from end-of-life electronics is the most effective solution to the growing e-waste problem. Most electronic devices contain a variety of materials, including metals that can be recovered for future uses. By dismantling and providing reuse possibilities, intact natural resources are conserved and air and water pollution caused by hazardous disposal is avoided. Additionally, recycling reduces the amount of greenhouse gas emissions caused by the manufacturing of new products.[76] Another benefit of recycling e-waste is that many of the materials can be recycled and re-used again. Materials that can be recycled include "ferrous (iron-based) and non-ferrous metals, glass, and various types of plastic." “Non-ferrous metals, mainly aluminum and copper can all be re-smelted and re-manufactured. Ferrous metals such as steel and iron can be also be re-used."[77] Due to the recent surge in popularity in 3D printing, certain 3D printers have been designed (FDM variety) to produce waste that can be easily recycled which decreases the amount of harmful pollutants in the atmosphere.[78] The excess plastic from these printers that comes out as a byproduct can also be reused to create new 3D printed creations.[79]
Benefits of recycling are extended when responsible recycling methods are used. In the U.S., responsible recycling aims to minimize the dangers to human health and the environment that disposed and dismantled electronics can create. Responsible recycling ensures best management practices of the electronics being recycled, worker health and safety, and consideration for the environment locally and abroad.[80] In Europe, metals that are recycled are returned to companies of origin at a reduced cost.[81] Through a committed recycling system, manufacturers in Japan have been pushed to make their products more sustainable. Since many companies were responsible for the recycling of their own products, this imposed responsibility on manufacturers requiring many to redesign their infrastructure. As a result, manufacturers in Japan have the added option to sell the recycled metals.[82]
Electronic waste substances[edit]




Several sizes of button and coin cell with 2 9v batteries as a size comparison. They are all recycled in many countries since they contain lead, mercury and cadmium.


Some computer components can be reused in assembling new computer products, while others are reduced to metals that can be reused in applications as varied as construction, flatware, and jewelry. Substances found in large quantities include epoxy resins, fiberglass, PCBs, PVC (polyvinyl chlorides), thermosetting plastics, lead, tin, copper, silicon, beryllium, carbon, iron, and aluminium. Elements found in small amounts include cadmium, mercury, and thallium.[83] Elements found in trace amounts include americium, antimony, arsenic, barium, bismuth, boron, cobalt, europium, gallium, germanium, gold, indium, lithium, manganese, nickel, niobium, palladium, platinum, rhodium, ruthenium, selenium, silver, tantalum, terbium, thorium, titanium, vanadium, and yttrium. Almost all electronics contain lead and tin (as solder) and copper (as wire and printed circuit board tracks), though the use of lead-free solder is now spreading rapidly. The following are ordinary applications:
Hazardous[edit]




Recyclers in the street in São Paulo, Brazil with old computers




E-Waste Component
Processed Used
Adverse Health Effects


Americium
The radioactive source in smoke alarms.
It is known to be carcinogenic.[84]


Lead
Solder, CRT monitor glass, lead-acid batteries, some formulations of PVC. A typical 15-inch cathode ray tube may contain 1.5 pounds of lead,[4] but other CRTs have been estimated as having up to 8 pounds of lead.
Adverse effects of lead exposure include impaired cognitive function, behavioral disturbances, attention deficits, hyperactivity, conduct problems, and lower IQ.[85] These effects are most damaging to children whose developing nervous systems are very susceptible to damage caused by lead, cadmium, and mercury.[86]


Mercury
Found in fluorescent tubes (numerous applications), tilt switches (mechanical doorbells, thermostats),[87] and flat screen monitors.
Health effects include sensory impairment, dermatitis, memory loss, and muscle weakness. Exposure in-utero causes fetal deficits in motor function, attention, and verbal domains.[85] Environmental effects in animals include death, reduced fertility, and slower growth and development.


Cadmium
Found in light-sensitive resistors, corrosion-resistant alloys for marine and aviation environments, and nickel-cadmium batteries. The most common form of cadmium is found in Nickel-cadmium rechargeable batteries. These batteries tend to contain between 6 and 18% cadmium. The sale of Nickel-Cadmium batteries has been banned in the European Union except for medical use. When not properly recycled it can leach into the soil, harming microorganisms and disrupting the soil ecosystem. Exposure is caused by proximity to hazardous waste sites and factories and workers in the metal refining industry.
The inhalation of cadmium can cause severe damage to the lungs and is also known to cause kidney damage.[88] Cadmium is also associated with deficits in cognition, learning, behavior, and neuromotor skills in children.[85]


Hexavalent chromium
Used in metal coatings to protect from corrosion.
A known carcinogen after occupational inhalation exposure.[85]
There is also evidence of cytotoxic and genotoxic effects of some chemicals, which have been shown to inhibit cell proliferation, cause cell membrane lesion, cause DNA single-strand breaks, and elevate Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels.[89]



Sulphur
Found in lead-acid batteries.
Health effects include liver damage, kidney damage, heart damage, eye and throat irritation. When released into the environment, it can create sulphuric acid through sulphur dioxide.


Brominated Flame Retardants (BFRs)
Used as flame retardants in plastics in most electronics. Includes PBBs, PBDE, DecaBDE, OctaBDE, PentaBDE.
Health effects include impaired development of the nervous system, thyroid problems, liver problems.[90] Environmental effects: similar effects as in animals as humans. PBBs were banned from 1973 to 1977 on. PCBs were banned during the 1980s.


Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)
Used as an antistatic additive in industrial applications and found in electronics, also found in non-stick cookware (PTFE). PFOAs are formed synthetically through environmental degradation.
Studies in mice have found the following health effects: Hepatotoxicity, developmental toxicity, immunotoxicity, hormonal effects and carcinogenic effects. Studies have found increased maternal PFOA levels to be associated with an increased risk of spontaneous abortion (miscarriage) and stillbirth. Increased maternal levels of PFOA are also associated with decreases in mean gestational age (preterm birth), mean birth weight (low birth weight), mean birth length (small for gestational age), and mean APGAR score.[91]


Beryllium oxide
Filler in some thermal interface materials such as thermal grease used on heatsinks for CPUs and power transistors,[92] magnetrons, X-ray-transparent ceramic windows, heat transfer fins in vacuum tubes, and gas lasers.
Occupational exposures associated with lung cancer, other common adverse health effects are beryllium sensitization, chronic beryllium disease, and acute beryllium disease.[93]


Other health effects

DNA breaks can increase the likelihood of developing cancer (if the damage is to a tumor suppressor gene)
DNA damages are a special problem in non-dividing or slowly dividing cells, where unrepaired damages will tend to accumulate over time. On the other hand, in rapidly dividing cells, unrepaired DNA damages that do not kill the cell by blocking replication will tend to cause replication errors and thus mutation
Elevated Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels can cause damage to cell structures (oxidative stress)[89]

Generally non-hazardous[edit]




An iMac G4 that has been repurposed into a lamp (photographed next to a Mac Classic and a flip phone).




E-Waste Component
Process Used


Aluminium
nearly all electronic goods using more than a few watts of power (heatsinks), electrolytic capacitors.


Copper
copper wire, printed circuit board tracks, component leads.


Germanium
1950s–1960s transistorized electronics (bipolar junction transistors).


Gold
connector plating, primarily in computer equipment.


Iron
steel chassis, cases, and fixings.


Lithium
lithium-ion batteries.


Nickel
nickel-cadmium batteries.


Silicon
glass, transistors, ICs, printed circuit boards.


Tin
solder, coatings on component leads.


Zinc
plating for steel parts.


See also[edit]


Environment portal
Electronics portal



2000s commodities boom
Computer Recycling
Digger gold
eDay
Electronic waste in Japan
Green computing
Mobile phone recycling
Material safety data sheet
Polychlorinated biphenyls
Retrocomputing
Radio Row

Policy and conventions:

Basel Action Network (BAN)
Basel Convention
China RoHS
e-Stewards
Restriction of Hazardous Substances Directive (RoHS)
Soesterberg Principles
Sustainable Electronics Initiative (SEI)
Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive


Organizations


Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance (ADISA)[94]
Empa
IFixit
International Network for Environmental Compliance and Enforcement
Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries (ISRI)
Solving the E-waste Problem
World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association

General:

Retail hazardous waste
Waste
Environmental racism in Europe#Romani settlements and e-waste (France)

References[edit]


^ Sakar, Anne. "Dad brought home lead, kids got sick". 
^ a b : Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ "WEEE CRT and Monitor Recycling". Executiveblueprints.com. 2 August 2009. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ a b Morgan, Russell (21 August 2006). "Tips and Tricks for Recycling Old Computers". SmartBiz. Retrieved 17 March 2009. 
^ "Defining & categorization of wastes via the regulations". ITGreen. 2 June 2013. Retrieved 21 June 2013. 
^ "Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment" (PDF). Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment. SBC e-Waste Africa Project. Retrieved 29 August 2011. 
^ Smedley, Tim. The Guardian, 2013. Web. 22 May 2015. <https://www.theguardian.com/sustainable-business/phonebloks-future-sustainable-smartphone
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics". US Environmental Protection Agency. Retrieved 13 March 2012. 
^ "Environment". ECD Mobile Recycling. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ Blau, J (November 2006). "UN Summit on e-waste: Nokia, Vodaphone and Others to Attend UN Summit on e-waste". CIO business magazine. 
^ Section, United Nations News Service (22 February 2010). "As e-waste mountains soar, UN urges smart technologies to protect health". United Nations-DPI/NMD – UN News Service Section. Retrieved 12 March 2012. 
^ a b "Urgent need to prepare developing countries for surges in E-Waste". 
^ Luthar, Breda. "Class, Cultural Capital, and the Mobile Phone." JSTOR. Web. 22 May 2015. .
^ "E-Waste: How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage." Science Space EWaste How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage Comments. 2014. Web. 22 May 2015.
^ http://www.electronicstakeback.com/wp-content/uploads/Facts_and_Figures_on_EWaste_and_Recycling.pdf
^ Kozlan, Melanie (2 November 2010). "What is 'E-Waste' & How Can I Get Rid of It?!". Four Green Steps. 
^ "Poison PCs and toxic TVs" (PDF). 
^ Ingenthron, Robin (31 March 2011). "Why We Should Ship Our Electronic "waste" to China and Africa". [Motherboard.tv]. 
^ Grossman, Elizabeth (10 April 2006). "Where computers go to die – and kill (4/10/2006)". Salon.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ Prashant, Nitya (20 August 2008). "Cash For Laptops Offers 'Green' Solution for Broken or Outdated Computers". Green Technology. Norwalk, Connecticut: Technology Marketing Corporation. Retrieved 17 March 2009.  In "CELL PHONE DISPOSAL AND STRATEGIC EVALUATION OF ELECTRONIC WASTE MANAGEMENT IN KENYA, A CASE OF MOBILE PHONE DEALERS IN KISUMU COUNTY" (PDF). European Centre for Research, Training and Development UK. December 2013. 
^ a b Basel Action Network; Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition (25 February 2002). "Exporting Harm: The High-Tech Trashing of Asia" (PDF). Seattle and San Jose. 
^ Chea, Terence (18 November 2007). "America Ships Electronic Waste Overseas". Associated Press. 
^ Slade, Giles (2006). "Made To Break: Technology and Obsolescence in America". Harvard University Press. 
^ a b Carroll (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Magazine Online. 
^ "Product or Waste? Importation and End-of-Life Processing of Computers in Peru", Ramzy Kahhat and Eric Williams, Center for Earth Systems Engineering and Management, Arizona State University, published Environmental Science and Technology June 2009.
^ Minter, Adam. "Shanghai Scrap". Wasted 7/7. The Atlantic. Retrieved 7 March 2011. 
^ "Illegal e-waste exposed". Greenpeace International. 
^ "E-Trash Industry Poses Hazards to Workers". 
^ Simmons, Dan (14 October 2005). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste in Ghana". YouTube. 
^ "Poisoning the poor – Electronic Waste in Ghana". Greenpeace International. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 5 August 2008. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 27 November 2006. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ Carney, Liz (19 December 2006). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste: High-impact Strategies". 
^ Slade, Giles. "Computer age leftovers". Denver Post. Retrieved 13 November 2006. 
^ "Export of toxic chemicals - A review of the case of uncontrolled electronic-waste recycling" (PDF). Environmental Pollution. 149. 2007. 
^ "Electronic Waste Dump of the World". Sometimes-interesting.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Persepectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "Lead". Centers of Disease Control and Prevention. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood lead levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "E-Waste Dump of the World". Seattletimes.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ "Where does e-waste end up?". Greenpeace. 
^ "STEP". STEP: Solving The E-waste Problem. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ Needhidasan, S; Samuel, M; Chidambaram, R (2014). "Electronic waste- an emerging threat to the environment of urban India" (PDF). Journal of Environmental Health Science & Engineering. 12: 36. PMC 3908467 . PMID 24444377. doi:10.1186/2052-336X-12-36. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ "High levels of PAH-metabolites in urine of e-waste recycling workers from Agbogbloshie, Ghana" (PDF). Science of the Total Environment. 2014. 
^ Frazzoli, C. &. (2010). Diagnostic health risk assessment of electronic waste on the general population in developing countries' scenarios. Environmental Impact Assessment Review , 388–399
^ Sthiannopkao, S. &. (2012). Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Inititatives, practices and consequences. Science of the Total Environment
^ Wath, S. B., Dutt, P. S., & Chakrabarti, T. (2011). E-Waste scenario in India, its management and implications. Environmental Monitoring and Assessment, pp. 172, 249–262.
^ a b "Africa’s Agbogbloshie Market Is a Computer Graveyard" NewsBreakingOnline.com. Web. 20 February 2011.
^ Doctorow, Cory. "Illegal E-waste Dumped in Ghana Includes Unencrypted Hard Drives Full of US Security Secrets." Boing Boing. 25 June 2009. Web. 15 March 2011.
^ Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ Yuan, C.; Zhang, H. C.; McKenna, G.; Korzeniewski, C.; Li, J. (2007). "Experimental Studies on Cryogenic Recycling of Printed Circuit Board". International Journal of Advanced Manufacturing Technology. 34: 657–666. doi:10.1007/s00170-006-0634-z. 
^ Fela, Jen (April 2010). "Developing countries face e-waste crisis". Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 8 (3): 117. JSTOR 20696446. doi:10.1890/1540-9295-8.3.116. 
^ "Data Destruction". www.pureplanetrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 
^ "E-cycling certification". Environmental Protection Agency. 2013. 
^ "Best Buy Recycles". Bestbuy.com. 2013. 
^ "Staples recycling and eco-stapling". Staples.com. 2013. 
^ "CEA – eCycle". http://www.ce.org. Retrieved 6 January 2015.  External link in |publisher= (help)
^ United States Environmental Protection Agency, Sustainable Materials Management Electronics Challenge. Retrieved from http://www.epa.gov/wastes/conserve/smm/electronics/index.htm
^ "Home – Electronics TakeBack Coalition". Electronicstakeback.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "How to Find a Responsible Recycler". Electronics TakeBack Coalition. 
^ "Default Parallels Plesk Panel Page". Certifiedelectronicsrecycler.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "Take Back My TV". 
^ "eWASA". 
^ "ecyclingcentral.com". ecyclingcentral.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "ewasteguide.info". ewasteguide.info. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics | eCycling | US EPA". Epa.gov. 28 June 2006. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "step-initiative.org". step-initiative.org. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "40 Million BGN Invested in Bulgaria's 1st Appliances Recycle Plant". Sofia News Agency. 28 June 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "Bulgaria Opens Largest WEEE Recycling Factory in Eastern Europe". Ask-eu.com. 12 July 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "WEEE recycling resources". Simsrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "Kwiat_Environmental Educatioin". Learning Ace. 
^ "Benefits of Recycling". hardrawgathering.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "What can be recycled from e-waste?". zerowaste.sa.gov.au. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "How to Print 3D Parts Better". sustainabilityworkshop.autodesk.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Zero or close to zero waste". plasticscribbler.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ Interagency Task Force on Electronics Stewardship. (20 July 2011). National Strategy for Electronics Stewardship
^ "THE FUTURE OF ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLING IN THE UNITED STATES: Obstacles and Domestic Solution" (PDF). sea.columbia.edu/. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Characteristics of E-waste Recycling System in Japan and China" (PDF). workspace.unpan.org. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Chemical fact sheet: Thallium". Spectrum Laboratories. Retrieved 2 February 2008. 
^ "Americium, Radioactive". TOXNET Toxicology Data Network. 
^ a b c d Chen, A., Dietrich, K. N., Huo, X., & Ho, S.-m. (2011). Developmental Neurotoxicants in E-Waste: An Emerging Health Concern. Environmental Health Perspectives , 119 (4), 431–438.
^ Chen, Aimin; Dietrich, Kim N.; Huo, Xia; Ho, Shuk-mei (2011-04-01). "Developmental neurotoxicants in e-waste: an emerging health concern". Environmental Health Perspectives. 119 (4): 431–438. ISSN 1552-9924. PMC 3080922 . PMID 21081302. doi:10.1289/ehp.1002452. 
^ "Question 8" (PDF). 
^ "Cadmium (Cd) – Chemical properties, Health and Environmental effects". Lenntech.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ a b Liulin, W., Meiling, H., Jing, A., Yufang, Z., Xuetong, W., Yangjun, W., et al. (2011). The cytotoxic and genetoxic effects of dust and soil samples from E-waste recycling area on L02 cells. Toxicology and Industrial Health , 27 (9), 831–839.
^ Birnbaum, LS; Staskal, DF (2004). "Brominated flame retardants: Cause for concern?" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 112: 9–17. PMC 1241790 . PMID 14698924. doi:10.1289/ehp.6559. 
^ Wu, K., Xu, X., Peng, L., Liu, J., Guo, Y., & Huo, X. (2012). Association between maternal exposure to perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) from electronic waste recycling and neonatal health outcomes. Environment International , 41, 1–8.
^ Becker, Greg; Lee, Chris; Lin, Zuchen (July 2005). "Thermal conductivity in advanced chips: Emerging generation of thermal greases offers advantages". Advanced Packaging: 2–4. Archived from the original on 21 June 2000. Retrieved 4 March 2008. 
^ "Health Effects". United States Department of Labor. Retrieved October 30, 2016. 
^ "ADISA website". Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 


Further reading[edit]

Hicks, C.; Dietmara, R.; Eugsterb, M. (2005). "The recycling and disposal of electrical and electronic waste in China—legislative and market responses". Environmental Impact Assessment Review. 25 (5): 459–471. ISSN 0195-9255. doi:10.1016/j.eiar.2005.04.007. 
Ogunseitan, O.A.; Schoenung, J.M.; Saphores, J-D.M.; Shapiro, A.A. (2009). "The Electronics Revolution: From E-Wonderland to E-Wasteland". Science. 326: 670–671. PMID 19900918. doi:10.1126/science.1176929. 
Toxics Link (February 2003). "Scrapping the Hi-tech Myth: Computer waste in India". India. Retrieved 25 March 2011. 
Cheng, I-Hwa, E-waste Trafficking: From Your Home to China 
United Nations University: THE GLOBAL E-WASTE MONITOR 2014 – Quantities, flows and resources, 2015
Li, J.; Zeng, X.; Chen, M.; Ogunseitan, O.A.; Stevels, A. (2015). ""Control-Alt-Delete": Rebooting Solutions for the E-Waste Problem". Environmental Science & Technology. 49 (12): 7095–7108. doi:10.1021/acs.est.5b00449. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Electronic waste.



Carroll, Chris (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Society. 
E-waste management: Scientific Recycling, Green E-products, Stringent Legislation Need of Hour
Sustainable Management of Electronics







v
t
e


Biosolids, waste and waste management



Major types



Agricultural wastewater
Biodegradable waste
Brown waste
Chemical waste
Construction waste
Demolition waste
Electronic waste

by country


Food waste
Green waste
Hazardous waste
Heat waste
Industrial waste
Litter
Marine debris
Biomedical waste
Mining waste
Municipal solid waste
Open defecation
Post-consumer waste
Radioactive waste
Scrap metal
Sewage
Toxic waste
Wastewater








Processes



Anaerobic digestion
Biodegradation
Composting
Garden waste dumping
Illegal dumping
Incineration
Landfill
Landfill mining
Mechanical biological treatment
Mechanical sorting
Open dump
Photodegradation
Recycling
Resource recovery
Sewage treatment
Waste collection
Waste picking
Waste sorting
Waste trade
Waste treatment
Waste-to-energy





Countries



Armenia
Bangladesh
Brazil
Hong Kong
India
Kazakhstan
New Zealand
Russia
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
UK
US





Agreements



Bamako Convention
Basel Convention
EU directives

batteries
landfills
RoHS
framework
incineration
waste water
WEEE


London Convention
Oslo Convention
OSPAR Convention





Other topics



Blue Ribbon Commission on America's Nuclear Future
Cleaner production
Downcycling
Eco-industrial park
Extended producer responsibility
High-level radioactive waste management
History of waste management
Landfill fire
Sewage regulation and administration
Upcycling
Waste hierarchy
Waste legislation
Waste minimisation
Zero waste








 Environment portal
 Category
 Commons
Concepts
Index
Journals
Lists
Organizations









Authority control



GND: 4324135-9










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Electronic_waste&oldid=791607037"					
Categories: Electronic wasteHidden categories: CS1 errors: external linksUse dmy dates from March 2016Articles needing cleanup from May 2013All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from May 2013Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from May 2013Articles needing additional references from May 2013All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from February 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2016Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡമലയാളംमराठीNederlands日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусскийසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenščinaSvenskaதமிழ்ไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 10:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Electronic waste - Wikipedia






















 






Electronic waste

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"WEEE" redirects here. For the EU directive, see Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive.






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: fix References Please help improve this article if you can. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (May 2013) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Defective and obsolete electronic equipment


Electronic waste or e-waste describes discarded electrical or electronic devices. Used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal are also considered e-waste. Informal processing of e-waste in developing countries can lead to adverse human health effects and environmental pollution.
Electronic scrap components, such as CPUs, contain potentially harmful components such as lead, cadmium, beryllium, or brominated flame retardants. Recycling and disposal of e-waste may involve significant risk to health of workers and communities in developed countries[1] and great care must be taken to avoid unsafe exposure in recycling operations and leaking of materials such as heavy metals from landfills and incinerator ashes.[2]



Contents


1 Definition
2 Amount of electronic waste worldwide
3 Global trade issues

3.1 Trade
3.2 Guiyu
3.3 Other informal e-waste recycling sites


4 Environmental impact
5 Information security
6 E-waste management

6.1 Recycling


7 Recycling

7.1 Consumer awareness efforts
7.2 Processing techniques
7.3 Benefits of recycling


8 Electronic waste substances

8.1 Hazardous
8.2 Generally non-hazardous


9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading
12 External links



Definition[edit]












Hoarding (left), disassembling (center) and collecting (right) electronic waste in Bengaluru, India


"Electronic waste" or "E-Waste" may be defined as discarded computers, office electronic equipment, entertainment device electronics, mobile phones, television sets, and refrigerators. This includes used electronics which are destined for reuse, resale, salvage, recycling, or disposal. Others are re-usables (working and repairable electronics) and secondary scrap (copper, steel, plastic, etc.) to be "commodities", and reserve the term "waste" for residue or material which is dumped by the buyer rather than recycled, including residue from reuse and recycling operations, because loads of surplus electronics are frequently commingled (good, recyclable, and non-recyclable), several public policy advocates apply the term "e-waste" broadly to all surplus electronics. Cathode ray tubes (CRTs) are considered one of the hardest types to recycle.[3]
CRTs have relatively high concentration of lead and phosphors (not to be confused with phosphorus), both of which are necessary for the display. The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) includes discarded CRT monitors in its category of "hazardous household waste"[4] but considers CRTs that have been set aside for testing to be commodities if they are not discarded, speculatively accumulated, or left unprotected from weather and other damage.
The EU and its member states operate a system via the European Waste Catalogue (EWC)- a European Council Directive, which is interpreted into "member state law". In the UK, this is in the form of the List of Wastes Directive. However, the list (and EWC) gives broad definition (EWC Code 16 02 13*) of Hazardous Electronic wastes, requiring "waste operators" to employ the Hazardous Waste Regulations (Annex 1A, Annex 1B) for refined definition. Constituent materials in the waste also require assessment via the combination of Annex II and Annex III, again allowing operators to further determine whether a waste is hazardous.[5]
Debate continues over the distinction between "commodity" and "waste" electronics definitions. Some exporters are accused of deliberately leaving difficult-to-recycle, obsolete, or non-repairable equipment mixed in loads of working equipment (though this may also come through ignorance, or to avoid more costly treatment processes). Protectionists may broaden the definition of "waste" electronics in order to protect domestic markets from working secondary equipment.
The high value of the computer recycling subset of electronic waste (working and reusable laptops, desktops, and components like RAM) can help pay the cost of transportation for a larger number of worthless pieces than can be achieved with display devices, which have less (or negative) scrap value. In A 2011 report, "Ghana E-Waste Country Assessment",[6] found that of 215,000 tons of electronics imported to Ghana, 30% were brand new and 70% were used. Of the used product, the study concluded that 15% was not reused and was scrapped or discarded. This contrasts with published but uncredited claims that 80% of the imports into Ghana were being burned in primitive conditions.
Amount of electronic waste worldwide[edit]




A fragment of discarded circuit board.


Rapid changes in technology, changes in media (tapes, software, MP3), falling prices, and planned obsolescence have resulted in a fast-growing surplus of electronic waste around the globe. Technical solutions are available, but in most cases, a legal framework, a collection, logistics, and other services need to be implemented before a technical solution can be applied.
Display units (CRT, LCD, LED monitors), processors (CPU, GPU, or APU chips), memory (DRAM or SRAM), and audio components have different useful lives. Processors are most frequently out-dated (by software no longer being optimized) and are more likely to become "e-waste" while display units are most often replaced while working without repair attempts, due to changes in wealthy nation appetites for new display technology. This problem could potentially be solved with modular smartphones or Phonebloks. These types of phones are more durable and have the technology to change certain parts of the phone making them more environmentally friendly. Being able to simply replace the part of the phone that is broken will reduce e-waste.[7] An estimated 50 million tons of E-waste are produced each year.[2] The USA discards 30 million computers each year and 100 million phones are disposed of in Europe each year. The Environmental Protection Agency estimates that only 15–20% of e-waste is recycled, the rest of these electronics go directly into landfills and incinerators.[8][9]
In 2006, the United Nations estimated the amount of worldwide electronic waste discarded each year to be 50 million metric tons.[10] According to a report by UNEP titled, "Recycling – from E-Waste to Resources," the amount of e-waste being produced – including mobile phones and computers – could rise by as much as 500 percent over the next decade in some countries, such as India.[11] The United States is the world leader in producing electronic waste, tossing away about 3 million tons each year.[12] China already produces about 2.3 million tons (2010 estimate) domestically, second only to the United States. And, despite having banned e-waste imports, China remains a major e-waste dumping ground for developed countries.[12]
Society today revolves around technology and by the constant need for the newest and most high-tech products we are contributing to mass amount of e-waste.[13] Since the invention of the iPhone, cell phones have become the top source of e-waste products because they are not made to last more than two years. Electrical waste contains hazardous but also valuable and scarce materials. Up to 60 elements can be found in complex electronics.[14] As of 2013, Apple has sold over 796 million iDevices (iPod, iPhone, iPad). Cell phone companies make cell phones that are not made to last so that the consumer will purchase new phones. Companies give these products such short life spans because they know that the consumer will want a new product and will buy it if they make it.[15] In the United States, an estimated 70% of heavy metals in landfills comes from discarded electronics.[16][17]
While there is agreement that the number of discarded electronic devices is increasing, there is considerable disagreement about the relative risk (compared to automobile scrap, for example), and strong disagreement whether curtailing trade in used electronics will improve conditions, or make them worse. According to an article in Motherboard, attempts to restrict the trade have driven reputable companies out of the supply chain, with unintended consequences.[18]
Global trade issues[edit]
See also: Global Waste Trade and Electronic waste by country




Electronic waste is often exported to developing countries.






4.5-volt, D, C, AA, AAA, AAAA, A23, 9-volt, CR2032, and LR44 cells are all recyclable in most countries.






The E-waste centre of Agbogbloshie, Ghana, where electronic waste is burnt and disassembled with no safety or environmental considerations.


One theory is that increased regulation of electronic waste and concern over the environmental harm in nature economies creates an economic disincentive to remove residues prior to export. Critics of trade in used electronics maintain that it is still too easy for brokers calling themselves recyclers to export unscreened electronic waste to developing countries, such as China,[19] India and parts of Africa, thus avoiding the expense of removing items like bad cathode ray tubes (the processing of which is expensive and difficult). The developing countries have become toxic dump yards of e-waste. Proponents of international trade point to the success of fair trade programs in other industries, where cooperation has led to creation of sustainable jobs and can bring affordable technology in countries where repair and reuse rates are higher.
Defenders of the trade[who?] in used electronics say that extraction of metals from virgin mining has been shifted to developing countries. Recycling of copper, silver, gold, and other materials from discarded electronic devices is considered better for the environment than mining. They also state that repair and reuse of computers and televisions has become a "lost art" in wealthier nations and that refurbishing has traditionally been a path to development.
South Korea, Taiwan, and southern China all excelled in finding "retained value" in used goods, and in some cases have set up billion-dollar industries in refurbishing used ink cartridges, single-use cameras, and working CRTs. Refurbishing has traditionally been a threat to established manufacturing, and simple protectionism explains some criticism of the trade. Works like "The Waste Makers" by Vance Packard explain some of the criticism of exports of working product, for example, the ban on import of tested working Pentium 4 laptops to China, or the bans on export of used surplus working electronics by Japan.
Opponents of surplus electronics exports argue that lower environmental and labor standards, cheap labor, and the relatively high value of recovered raw materials leads to a transfer of pollution-generating activities, such as smelting of copper wire. In China, Malaysia, India, Kenya, and various African countries, electronic waste is being sent to these countries for processing, sometimes illegally. Many surplus laptops are routed to developing nations as "dumping grounds for e-waste".[20]
Because the United States has not ratified the Basel Convention or its Ban Amendment, and has few domestic federal laws forbidding the export of toxic waste, the Basel Action Network estimates that about 80% of the electronic waste directed to recycling in the U.S. does not get recycled there at all, but is put on container ships and sent to countries such as China.[21][22][23][24] This figure is disputed as an exaggeration by the EPA, the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, and the World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association.
Independent research by Arizona State University showed that 87–88% of imported used computers did not have a higher value than the best value of the constituent materials they contained, and that "the official trade in end-of-life computers is thus driven by reuse as opposed to recycling".[25]
Trade[edit]
Proponents of the trade say growth of internet access is a stronger correlation to trade than poverty. Haiti is poor and closer to the port of New York than southeast Asia, but far more electronic waste is exported from New York to Asia than to Haiti. Thousands of men, women, and children are employed in reuse, refurbishing, repair, and re-manufacturing, unsustainable industries in decline in developed countries. Denying developing nations access to used electronics may deny them sustainable employment, affordable products, and internet access, or force them to deal with even less scrupulous suppliers. In a series of seven articles for The Atlantic, Shanghai-based reporter Adam Minter describes many of these computer repair and scrap separation activities as objectively sustainable.[26]
Opponents of the trade argue that developing countries utilize methods that are more harmful and more wasteful. An expedient and prevalent method is simply to toss equipment onto an open fire, in order to melt plastics and to burn away non-valuable metals. This releases carcinogens and neurotoxins into the air, contributing to an acrid, lingering smog. These noxious fumes include dioxins and furans. Bonfire refuse can be disposed of quickly into drainage ditches or waterways feeding the ocean or local water supplies.[24]
In June 2008, a container of electronic waste, destined from the Port of Oakland in the U.S. to Sanshui District in mainland China, was intercepted in Hong Kong by Greenpeace.[27] Concern over exports of electronic waste were raised in press reports in India,[28][29] Ghana,[30][31][32] Côte d'Ivoire,[33] and Nigeria.[34]
Guiyu[edit]
Main article: Electronic waste in China
Guiyu in the Shantou region of China is a massive electronic waste processing community.[21][35][36] It is often referred to as the "e-waste capital of the world." Traditionally, Guiyu was an agricultural community; however, in the mid-1990s it transformed into an e-waste recycling center involving over 75% of the local households and an additional 100,000 migrant workers.[37] Thousands of individual workshops employ laborers to snip cables, pry chips from circuit boards, grind plastic computer cases into particles, and dip circuit boards in acid baths to dissolve the precious metals. Others work to strip insulation from all wiring in an attempt to salvage tiny amounts of copper wire.[38] Uncontrolled burning, disassembly, and disposal has led to a number of environmental problems such as groundwater contamination, atmospheric pollution, and water pollution either by immediate discharge or from surface runoff (especially near coastal areas), as well as health problems including occupational safety and health effects among those directly and indirectly involved, due to the methods of processing the waste.
A number of studies have been conducted to measure a number of chemicals associated with informal e-waste recycling in the populations. One study enrolled children from Guiyu and a control site 50 km away to measure blood lead levels (BLLs).[39] The average BLL in Guiyu was 15.3 ug/dL compared to 9.9 ug/dL in the control site. In the United States, the CDC has set a reference level for blood lead at 5 ug/dL.[40] High levels of lead in young children can impact IQ and the development of the central nervous system. The highest concentrations of lead were found in the children of parents whose workshop dealt with circuit boards and the lowest was among those who recycled plastic.[41]
Six of the many villages in Guiyu specialize in circuit-board disassembly, seven in plastics and metals reprocessing, and two in wire and cable disassembly. Greenpeace, an environmental group, sampled dust, soil, river sediment, and groundwater in Guiyu. They found very high levels of toxic heavy metals and organic contaminants in both places.[42] Lai Yun, a campaigner for the group found "over 10 poisonous metals, such as lead, mercury, and cadmium."
Guiyu is only one example of digital dumps but similar places can be found across the world in Nigeria, Ghana, and India.[43] With amounts of e-waste growing rapidly each year urgent solutions are required. While the waste continues to flow into digital dumps like Guiyu, there are measures that can help reduce the flow of e-waste.[44]
A suggested preventative step involves the major electronics firms removing the worst chemicals in their products in order to make them safer and easier to recycle.
Other informal e-waste recycling sites[edit]




A pile of discarded TVs and computer monitors.


Guiyu is likely one of the oldest and largest informal e-waste recycling sites in the world, however, there are many sites worldwide, including India, Ghana, Nigeria, and the Philippines. Most research involving informal e-waste recycling has been done in Guiyu, but there are a handful of studies that describe exposure levels in e-waste workers, the community, and the environment.[citation needed] Bangalore, located in southern India, is often referred as the "Silicon Valley of India" and has a growing informal e-waste recycling sector.[45][46] Hair samples were collected from workers at an e-waste recycling facility and an e-waste recycling slum community in Bangalore.[47] Levels of V, Cr, Mn, Mo, Sn, Tl, and Pb were significantly higher in the workers at the e-waste recycling facility compared to the e-waste workers in the slum community. However, Co, Ag, Cd, and Hg levels were significantly higher in the slum community workers compared to the facility workers. A study in Ghana found higher levels of urinary PAH-metabolites in e-waste workers compared to unexposed controls.[48] They also found a greater frequency of complaints of cough, chest pain, and vertigo from those exposed to emissions from the e-waste recycling processes.
Environmental impact[edit]




Old keyboards and one mouse.


The processes of dismantling and disposing of electronic waste in developing countries led to a number of environmental impacts as illustrated in the graphic. Liquid and atmospheric releases end up in bodies of water, groundwater, soil, and air and therefore in land and sea animals – both domesticated and wild, in crops eaten by both animals and human, and in drinking water.[49]
One study of environmental effects in Guiyu, China found the following:[50]

Airborne dioxins – one type found at 100 times levels previously measured
Levels of carcinogens in duck ponds and rice paddies exceeded international standards for agricultural areas and cadmium, copper, nickel, and lead levels in rice paddies were above international standards
Heavy metals found in road dust – lead over 300 times that of a control village's road dust and copper over 100 times

The environmental impact of the processing of different electronic waste components


E-Waste Component
Process Used
Potential Environmental Hazard


Cathode ray tubes (used in TVs, computer monitors, ATM, video cameras, and more)
Breaking and removal of yoke, then dumping
Lead, barium and other heavy metals leaching into the ground water and release of toxic phosphor


Printed circuit board (image behind table – a thin plate on which chips and other electronic components are placed)
De-soldering and removal of computer chips; open burning and acid baths to remove metals after chips are removed.
Air emissions and discharge into rivers of glass dust, tin, lead, brominated dioxin, beryllium cadmium, and mercury


Chips and other gold plated components
Chemical stripping using nitric and hydrochloric acid and burning of chips
PAHs, heavy metals, brominated flame retardants discharged directly into rivers acidifying fish and flora. Tin and lead contamination of surface and groundwater. Air emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and PAHs


Plastics from printers, keyboards, monitors, etc.
Shredding and low temp melting to be reused
Emissions of brominated dioxins, heavy metals, and hydrocarbons


Computer wires
Open burning and stripping to remove copper
PAHs released into air, water, and soil.


[51]
Information security[edit]
E-waste presents a potential security threat to individuals and exporting countries. Hard drives that are not properly erased before the computer is disposed of can be reopened, exposing sensitive information. Credit card numbers, private financial data, account information, and records of online transactions can be accessed by most willing individuals. Organized criminals in Ghana commonly search the drives for information to use in local scams.[52] Electronic files about government contracts have been discovered on hard drives found in Agbogbloshie. Multimillion-dollar agreements from United States security institutions such as the Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), the Transportation Security Administration, and Homeland Security have all resurfaced in Agbogbloshie.[52][53]
E-waste management[edit]
Recycling[edit]




Computer monitors are typically packed into low stacks on wooden pallets for recycling and then shrink-wrapped.


See also: Computer recycling
Audiovisual components, televisions, VCRs, stereo equipment, mobile phones, other handheld devices, and computer components contain valuable elements and substances suitable for reclamation, including lead, copper, and gold.
Recycling[edit]
One of the major challenges is recycling the printed circuit boards from the electronic wastes. The circuit boards contain such precious metals as gold, silver, platinum, etc. and such base metals as copper, iron, aluminum, etc. One way e-waste is processed is by melting circuit boards, burning cable sheathing to recover copper wire and open- pit acid leaching for separating metals of value.[54] Conventional method employed is mechanical shredding and separation but the recycling efficiency is low. Alternative methods such as cryogenic decomposition have been studied for printed circuit board recycling,[55] and some other methods are still under investigation. Properly disposing of or reusing electronics can help prevent health problems, reduce greenhouse-gas emissions, and create jobs.[56] Reuse and refurbishing offer a more environmentally friendly and socially conscious alternative to downcycling processes.[citation needed]
Consumer awareness efforts[edit]
The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency encourages electronic recyclers to become certified by demonstrating to an accredited, independent third party auditor that they meet specific standards to safely recycle and manage electronics. This should work so as to ensure the highest environmental standards are being maintained. Two certifications for electronic recyclers currently exist and are endorsed by the EPA. Customers are encouraged to choose certified electronics recyclers. Responsible electronics recycling reduces environmental and human health impacts, increases the use of reusable and refurbished equipment and reduces energy use while conserving limited resources. The two EPA-endorsed certification programs are Responsible Recyclers Practices (R2) and E-Stewards. Certified companies ensure they are meeting strict environmental standards which maximize reuse and recycling, minimize exposure to human health or the environment, ensure safe management of materials and require destruction of all data used on electronics.[57] Certified electronics recyclers have demonstrated through audits and other means that they continually meet specific high environmental standards and safely manage used electronics. Once certified, the recycler is held to the particular standard by continual oversight by the independent accredited certifying body. A certification board accredits and oversees certifying bodies to ensure that they meet specific responsibilities and are competent to audit and provide certification.[58]
Some U.S. retailers offer opportunities for consumer recycling of discarded electronic devices.[59][60] In the US, the Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) urges consumers to dispose properly of end-of-life electronics through its recycling locator at www.GreenerGadgets.org. This list only includes manufacturer and retailer programs that use the strictest standards and third-party certified recycling locations, to provide consumers assurance that their products will be recycled safely and responsibly. CEA research has found that 58 percent of consumers know where to take their end-of-life electronics, and the electronics industry would very much like to see that level of awareness increase. Consumer electronics manufacturers and retailers sponsor or operate more than 5,000 recycling locations nationwide and have vowed to recycle one billion pounds annually by 2016,[61] a sharp increase from 300 million pounds industry recycled in 2010.
The Sustainable Materials Management Electronic Challenge was created by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). Participants of the Challenge are manufacturers of electronics and electronic retailers. These companies collect end-of-life (EOL) electronics at various locations and send them to a certified, third-party recycler. Program participants are then able publicly promote and report 100% responsible recycling for their companies.[62] The Electronics TakeBack Coalition[63] is a campaign aimed at protecting human health and limiting environmental effects where electronics are being produced, used, and discarded. The ETBC aims to place responsibility for disposal of technology products on electronic manufacturers and brand owners, primarily through community promotions and legal enforcement initiatives. It provides recommendations for consumer recycling and a list of recyclers judged environmentally responsible.[64]
The Certified Electronics Recycler program[65] for electronic recyclers is a comprehensive, integrated management system standard that incorporates key operational and continual improvement elements for quality, environmental and health and safety (QEH&S) performance. The grassroots Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition focuses on promoting human health and addresses environmental justice problems resulting from toxins in technologies. The World Reuse, Repair, and Recycling Association (wr3a.org) is an organization dedicated to improving the quality of exported electronics, encouraging better recycling standards in importing countries, and improving practices through "Fair Trade" principles. Take Back My TV[66] is a project of The Electronics TakeBack Coalition and grades television manufacturers to find out which are responsible and which are not.
The e-Waste Association of South Africa (eWASA)[67] has been instrumental in building a network of e-waste recyclers and refurbishers in the country. It continues to drive the sustainable, environmentally sound management of all e-waste in South Africa. E-Cycling Central is a website from the Electronic Industry Alliance which allows you to search for electronic recycling programs in your state. It lists different recyclers by state to find reuse, recycle, or find donation programs across the country.[68] Ewasteguide.info is a Switzerland-based website dedicated to improving the e-waste situation in developing and transitioning countries. The site contains news, events, case studies, and more.[69] StEP: Solving the E-Waste Problem This website of StEP, an initiative founded by various UN organizations to develop strategies to solve the e-waste problem, follows its activities and programs.[70][71]
Processing techniques[edit]




Recycling the lead from batteries.


In many developed countries, electronic waste processing usually first involves dismantling the equipment into various parts (metal frames, power supplies, circuit boards, plastics), often by hand, but increasingly by automated shredding equipment. A typical example is the NADIN electronic waste processing plant in Novi Iskar, Bulgaria—the largest facility of its kind in Eastern Europe.[72][73] The advantages of this process are the human's ability to recognize and save working and repairable parts, including chips, transistors, RAM, etc. The disadvantage is that the labor is cheapest in countries with the lowest health and safety standards.
In an alternative bulk system,[74] a hopper conveys material for shredding into an unsophisticated mechanical separator, with screening and granulating machines to separate constituent metal and plastic fractions, which are sold to smelters or plastics recyclers. Such recycling machinery is enclosed and employs a dust collection system. Some of the emissions are caught by scrubbers and screens. Magnets, eddy currents, and Trommel screens are employed to separate glass, plastic, and ferrous and nonferrous metals, which can then be further separated at a smelter.
Leaded glass from CRTs is reused in car batteries, ammunition, and lead wheel weights, or sold to foundries as a fluxing agent in processing raw lead ore. Copper, gold, palladium, silver and tin are valuable metals sold to smelters for recycling. Hazardous smoke and gases are captured, contained and treated to mitigate environmental threat. These methods allow for safe reclamation of all valuable computer construction materials. Hewlett-Packard product recycling solutions manager Renee St. Denis describes its process as: "We move them through giant shredders about 30 feet tall and it shreds everything into pieces about the size of a quarter. Once your disk drive is shredded into pieces about this big, it's hard to get the data off".[75] An ideal electronic waste recycling plant combines dismantling for component recovery with increased cost-effective processing of bulk electronic waste. Reuse is an alternative option to recycling because it extends the lifespan of a device. Devices still need eventual recycling, but by allowing others to purchase used electronics, recycling can be postponed and value gained from device use.
Benefits of recycling[edit]
Recycling raw materials from end-of-life electronics is the most effective solution to the growing e-waste problem. Most electronic devices contain a variety of materials, including metals that can be recovered for future uses. By dismantling and providing reuse possibilities, intact natural resources are conserved and air and water pollution caused by hazardous disposal is avoided. Additionally, recycling reduces the amount of greenhouse gas emissions caused by the manufacturing of new products.[76] Another benefit of recycling e-waste is that many of the materials can be recycled and re-used again. Materials that can be recycled include "ferrous (iron-based) and non-ferrous metals, glass, and various types of plastic." “Non-ferrous metals, mainly aluminum and copper can all be re-smelted and re-manufactured. Ferrous metals such as steel and iron can be also be re-used."[77] Due to the recent surge in popularity in 3D printing, certain 3D printers have been designed (FDM variety) to produce waste that can be easily recycled which decreases the amount of harmful pollutants in the atmosphere.[78] The excess plastic from these printers that comes out as a byproduct can also be reused to create new 3D printed creations.[79]
Benefits of recycling are extended when responsible recycling methods are used. In the U.S., responsible recycling aims to minimize the dangers to human health and the environment that disposed and dismantled electronics can create. Responsible recycling ensures best management practices of the electronics being recycled, worker health and safety, and consideration for the environment locally and abroad.[80] In Europe, metals that are recycled are returned to companies of origin at a reduced cost.[81] Through a committed recycling system, manufacturers in Japan have been pushed to make their products more sustainable. Since many companies were responsible for the recycling of their own products, this imposed responsibility on manufacturers requiring many to redesign their infrastructure. As a result, manufacturers in Japan have the added option to sell the recycled metals.[82]
Electronic waste substances[edit]




Several sizes of button and coin cell with 2 9v batteries as a size comparison. They are all recycled in many countries since they contain lead, mercury and cadmium.


Some computer components can be reused in assembling new computer products, while others are reduced to metals that can be reused in applications as varied as construction, flatware, and jewelry. Substances found in large quantities include epoxy resins, fiberglass, PCBs, PVC (polyvinyl chlorides), thermosetting plastics, lead, tin, copper, silicon, beryllium, carbon, iron, and aluminium. Elements found in small amounts include cadmium, mercury, and thallium.[83] Elements found in trace amounts include americium, antimony, arsenic, barium, bismuth, boron, cobalt, europium, gallium, germanium, gold, indium, lithium, manganese, nickel, niobium, palladium, platinum, rhodium, ruthenium, selenium, silver, tantalum, terbium, thorium, titanium, vanadium, and yttrium. Almost all electronics contain lead and tin (as solder) and copper (as wire and printed circuit board tracks), though the use of lead-free solder is now spreading rapidly. The following are ordinary applications:
Hazardous[edit]




Recyclers in the street in São Paulo, Brazil with old computers




E-Waste Component
Processed Used
Adverse Health Effects


Americium
The radioactive source in smoke alarms.
It is known to be carcinogenic.[84]


Lead
Solder, CRT monitor glass, lead-acid batteries, some formulations of PVC. A typical 15-inch cathode ray tube may contain 1.5 pounds of lead,[4] but other CRTs have been estimated as having up to 8 pounds of lead.
Adverse effects of lead exposure include impaired cognitive function, behavioral disturbances, attention deficits, hyperactivity, conduct problems, and lower IQ.[85] These effects are most damaging to children whose developing nervous systems are very susceptible to damage caused by lead, cadmium, and mercury.[86]


Mercury
Found in fluorescent tubes (numerous applications), tilt switches (mechanical doorbells, thermostats),[87] and flat screen monitors.
Health effects include sensory impairment, dermatitis, memory loss, and muscle weakness. Exposure in-utero causes fetal deficits in motor function, attention, and verbal domains.[85] Environmental effects in animals include death, reduced fertility, and slower growth and development.


Cadmium
Found in light-sensitive resistors, corrosion-resistant alloys for marine and aviation environments, and nickel-cadmium batteries. The most common form of cadmium is found in Nickel-cadmium rechargeable batteries. These batteries tend to contain between 6 and 18% cadmium. The sale of Nickel-Cadmium batteries has been banned in the European Union except for medical use. When not properly recycled it can leach into the soil, harming microorganisms and disrupting the soil ecosystem. Exposure is caused by proximity to hazardous waste sites and factories and workers in the metal refining industry.
The inhalation of cadmium can cause severe damage to the lungs and is also known to cause kidney damage.[88] Cadmium is also associated with deficits in cognition, learning, behavior, and neuromotor skills in children.[85]


Hexavalent chromium
Used in metal coatings to protect from corrosion.
A known carcinogen after occupational inhalation exposure.[85]
There is also evidence of cytotoxic and genotoxic effects of some chemicals, which have been shown to inhibit cell proliferation, cause cell membrane lesion, cause DNA single-strand breaks, and elevate Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels.[89]



Sulphur
Found in lead-acid batteries.
Health effects include liver damage, kidney damage, heart damage, eye and throat irritation. When released into the environment, it can create sulphuric acid through sulphur dioxide.


Brominated Flame Retardants (BFRs)
Used as flame retardants in plastics in most electronics. Includes PBBs, PBDE, DecaBDE, OctaBDE, PentaBDE.
Health effects include impaired development of the nervous system, thyroid problems, liver problems.[90] Environmental effects: similar effects as in animals as humans. PBBs were banned from 1973 to 1977 on. PCBs were banned during the 1980s.


Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA)
Used as an antistatic additive in industrial applications and found in electronics, also found in non-stick cookware (PTFE). PFOAs are formed synthetically through environmental degradation.
Studies in mice have found the following health effects: Hepatotoxicity, developmental toxicity, immunotoxicity, hormonal effects and carcinogenic effects. Studies have found increased maternal PFOA levels to be associated with an increased risk of spontaneous abortion (miscarriage) and stillbirth. Increased maternal levels of PFOA are also associated with decreases in mean gestational age (preterm birth), mean birth weight (low birth weight), mean birth length (small for gestational age), and mean APGAR score.[91]


Beryllium oxide
Filler in some thermal interface materials such as thermal grease used on heatsinks for CPUs and power transistors,[92] magnetrons, X-ray-transparent ceramic windows, heat transfer fins in vacuum tubes, and gas lasers.
Occupational exposures associated with lung cancer, other common adverse health effects are beryllium sensitization, chronic beryllium disease, and acute beryllium disease.[93]


Other health effects

DNA breaks can increase the likelihood of developing cancer (if the damage is to a tumor suppressor gene)
DNA damages are a special problem in non-dividing or slowly dividing cells, where unrepaired damages will tend to accumulate over time. On the other hand, in rapidly dividing cells, unrepaired DNA damages that do not kill the cell by blocking replication will tend to cause replication errors and thus mutation
Elevated Reactive Oxygen Species (ROS) levels can cause damage to cell structures (oxidative stress)[89]

Generally non-hazardous[edit]




An iMac G4 that has been repurposed into a lamp (photographed next to a Mac Classic and a flip phone).




E-Waste Component
Process Used


Aluminium
nearly all electronic goods using more than a few watts of power (heatsinks), electrolytic capacitors.


Copper
copper wire, printed circuit board tracks, component leads.


Germanium
1950s–1960s transistorized electronics (bipolar junction transistors).


Gold
connector plating, primarily in computer equipment.


Iron
steel chassis, cases, and fixings.


Lithium
lithium-ion batteries.


Nickel
nickel-cadmium batteries.


Silicon
glass, transistors, ICs, printed circuit boards.


Tin
solder, coatings on component leads.


Zinc
plating for steel parts.


See also[edit]


Environment portal
Electronics portal



2000s commodities boom
Computer Recycling
Digger gold
eDay
Electronic waste in Japan
Green computing
Mobile phone recycling
Material safety data sheet
Polychlorinated biphenyls
Retrocomputing
Radio Row

Policy and conventions:

Basel Action Network (BAN)
Basel Convention
China RoHS
e-Stewards
Restriction of Hazardous Substances Directive (RoHS)
Soesterberg Principles
Sustainable Electronics Initiative (SEI)
Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment Directive


Organizations


Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance (ADISA)[94]
Empa
IFixit
International Network for Environmental Compliance and Enforcement
Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries (ISRI)
Solving the E-waste Problem
World Reuse, Repair and Recycling Association

General:

Retail hazardous waste
Waste
Environmental racism in Europe#Romani settlements and e-waste (France)

References[edit]


^ Sakar, Anne. "Dad brought home lead, kids got sick". 
^ a b : Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ "WEEE CRT and Monitor Recycling". Executiveblueprints.com. 2 August 2009. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ a b Morgan, Russell (21 August 2006). "Tips and Tricks for Recycling Old Computers". SmartBiz. Retrieved 17 March 2009. 
^ "Defining & categorization of wastes via the regulations". ITGreen. 2 June 2013. Retrieved 21 June 2013. 
^ "Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment" (PDF). Ghana e-Waste Country Assessment. SBC e-Waste Africa Project. Retrieved 29 August 2011. 
^ Smedley, Tim. The Guardian, 2013. Web. 22 May 2015. <https://www.theguardian.com/sustainable-business/phonebloks-future-sustainable-smartphone
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics". US Environmental Protection Agency. Retrieved 13 March 2012. 
^ "Environment". ECD Mobile Recycling. Retrieved 24 April 2014. 
^ Blau, J (November 2006). "UN Summit on e-waste: Nokia, Vodaphone and Others to Attend UN Summit on e-waste". CIO business magazine. 
^ Section, United Nations News Service (22 February 2010). "As e-waste mountains soar, UN urges smart technologies to protect health". United Nations-DPI/NMD – UN News Service Section. Retrieved 12 March 2012. 
^ a b "Urgent need to prepare developing countries for surges in E-Waste". 
^ Luthar, Breda. "Class, Cultural Capital, and the Mobile Phone." JSTOR. Web. 22 May 2015. .
^ "E-Waste: How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage." Science Space EWaste How the New IPad Adds to Electronic Garbage Comments. 2014. Web. 22 May 2015.
^ http://www.electronicstakeback.com/wp-content/uploads/Facts_and_Figures_on_EWaste_and_Recycling.pdf
^ Kozlan, Melanie (2 November 2010). "What is 'E-Waste' & How Can I Get Rid of It?!". Four Green Steps. 
^ "Poison PCs and toxic TVs" (PDF). 
^ Ingenthron, Robin (31 March 2011). "Why We Should Ship Our Electronic "waste" to China and Africa". [Motherboard.tv]. 
^ Grossman, Elizabeth (10 April 2006). "Where computers go to die – and kill (4/10/2006)". Salon.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ Prashant, Nitya (20 August 2008). "Cash For Laptops Offers 'Green' Solution for Broken or Outdated Computers". Green Technology. Norwalk, Connecticut: Technology Marketing Corporation. Retrieved 17 March 2009.  In "CELL PHONE DISPOSAL AND STRATEGIC EVALUATION OF ELECTRONIC WASTE MANAGEMENT IN KENYA, A CASE OF MOBILE PHONE DEALERS IN KISUMU COUNTY" (PDF). European Centre for Research, Training and Development UK. December 2013. 
^ a b Basel Action Network; Silicon Valley Toxics Coalition (25 February 2002). "Exporting Harm: The High-Tech Trashing of Asia" (PDF). Seattle and San Jose. 
^ Chea, Terence (18 November 2007). "America Ships Electronic Waste Overseas". Associated Press. 
^ Slade, Giles (2006). "Made To Break: Technology and Obsolescence in America". Harvard University Press. 
^ a b Carroll (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Magazine Online. 
^ "Product or Waste? Importation and End-of-Life Processing of Computers in Peru", Ramzy Kahhat and Eric Williams, Center for Earth Systems Engineering and Management, Arizona State University, published Environmental Science and Technology June 2009.
^ Minter, Adam. "Shanghai Scrap". Wasted 7/7. The Atlantic. Retrieved 7 March 2011. 
^ "Illegal e-waste exposed". Greenpeace International. 
^ "E-Trash Industry Poses Hazards to Workers". 
^ Simmons, Dan (14 October 2005). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste in Ghana". YouTube. 
^ "Poisoning the poor – Electronic Waste in Ghana". Greenpeace International. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 5 August 2008. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. 27 November 2006. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ Carney, Liz (19 December 2006). "British Broadcasting Corporation". BBC News. Retrieved 3 January 2010. 
^ "Electronic Waste: High-impact Strategies". 
^ Slade, Giles. "Computer age leftovers". Denver Post. Retrieved 13 November 2006. 
^ "Export of toxic chemicals - A review of the case of uncontrolled electronic-waste recycling" (PDF). Environmental Pollution. 149. 2007. 
^ "Electronic Waste Dump of the World". Sometimes-interesting.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Persepectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "Lead". Centers of Disease Control and Prevention. 
^ Huo, X; Peng, L; Xu, X; Zheng, L; Qiu, B; Qi, Z; Zhang, B; Han, D; Piao, Z (July 2007). "Elevated blood lead levels of children in Guiyu, an electronic waste recycling town in China" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 115: 1113–7. PMC 1913570 . PMID 17637931. doi:10.1289/ehp.9697. 
^ "E-Waste Dump of the World". Seattletimes.com. Retrieved 23 November 2012. 
^ "Where does e-waste end up?". Greenpeace. 
^ "STEP". STEP: Solving The E-waste Problem. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ Needhidasan, S; Samuel, M; Chidambaram, R (2014). "Electronic waste- an emerging threat to the environment of urban India" (PDF). Journal of Environmental Health Science & Engineering. 12: 36. PMC 3908467 . PMID 24444377. doi:10.1186/2052-336X-12-36. 
^ "Contamination by trace elements at e-waste recycling sites in Bangalore, India" (PDF). Chemosphere. 76. 2009. 
^ "High levels of PAH-metabolites in urine of e-waste recycling workers from Agbogbloshie, Ghana" (PDF). Science of the Total Environment. 2014. 
^ Frazzoli, C. &. (2010). Diagnostic health risk assessment of electronic waste on the general population in developing countries' scenarios. Environmental Impact Assessment Review , 388–399
^ Sthiannopkao, S. &. (2012). Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Inititatives, practices and consequences. Science of the Total Environment
^ Wath, S. B., Dutt, P. S., & Chakrabarti, T. (2011). E-Waste scenario in India, its management and implications. Environmental Monitoring and Assessment, pp. 172, 249–262.
^ a b "Africa’s Agbogbloshie Market Is a Computer Graveyard" NewsBreakingOnline.com. Web. 20 February 2011.
^ Doctorow, Cory. "Illegal E-waste Dumped in Ghana Includes Unencrypted Hard Drives Full of US Security Secrets." Boing Boing. 25 June 2009. Web. 15 March 2011.
^ Sthiannopkao S, Wong MH. (2012) Handling e-waste in developed and developing countries: Initiatives, practices, and consequences. Sci Total Environ.
^ Yuan, C.; Zhang, H. C.; McKenna, G.; Korzeniewski, C.; Li, J. (2007). "Experimental Studies on Cryogenic Recycling of Printed Circuit Board". International Journal of Advanced Manufacturing Technology. 34: 657–666. doi:10.1007/s00170-006-0634-z. 
^ Fela, Jen (April 2010). "Developing countries face e-waste crisis". Frontiers in Ecology and the Environment. 8 (3): 117. JSTOR 20696446. doi:10.1890/1540-9295-8.3.116. 
^ "Data Destruction". www.pureplanetrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 
^ "E-cycling certification". Environmental Protection Agency. 2013. 
^ "Best Buy Recycles". Bestbuy.com. 2013. 
^ "Staples recycling and eco-stapling". Staples.com. 2013. 
^ "CEA – eCycle". http://www.ce.org. Retrieved 6 January 2015.  External link in |publisher= (help)
^ United States Environmental Protection Agency, Sustainable Materials Management Electronics Challenge. Retrieved from http://www.epa.gov/wastes/conserve/smm/electronics/index.htm
^ "Home – Electronics TakeBack Coalition". Electronicstakeback.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "How to Find a Responsible Recycler". Electronics TakeBack Coalition. 
^ "Default Parallels Plesk Panel Page". Certifiedelectronicsrecycler.com. Retrieved 8 November 2012. 
^ "Take Back My TV". 
^ "eWASA". 
^ "ecyclingcentral.com". ecyclingcentral.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "ewasteguide.info". ewasteguide.info. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "Statistics on the Management of Used and End-of-Life Electronics | eCycling | US EPA". Epa.gov. 28 June 2006. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "step-initiative.org". step-initiative.org. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ "40 Million BGN Invested in Bulgaria's 1st Appliances Recycle Plant". Sofia News Agency. 28 June 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "Bulgaria Opens Largest WEEE Recycling Factory in Eastern Europe". Ask-eu.com. 12 July 2010. Retrieved 28 March 2011. 
^ "WEEE recycling resources". Simsrecycling.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "Kwiat_Environmental Educatioin". Learning Ace. 
^ "Benefits of Recycling". hardrawgathering.co.uk. Retrieved 6 January 2015. 
^ "What can be recycled from e-waste?". zerowaste.sa.gov.au. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "How to Print 3D Parts Better". sustainabilityworkshop.autodesk.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Zero or close to zero waste". plasticscribbler.com. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ Interagency Task Force on Electronics Stewardship. (20 July 2011). National Strategy for Electronics Stewardship
^ "THE FUTURE OF ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLING IN THE UNITED STATES: Obstacles and Domestic Solution" (PDF). sea.columbia.edu/. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Characteristics of E-waste Recycling System in Japan and China" (PDF). workspace.unpan.org. Retrieved 29 February 2016. 
^ "Chemical fact sheet: Thallium". Spectrum Laboratories. Retrieved 2 February 2008. 
^ "Americium, Radioactive". TOXNET Toxicology Data Network. 
^ a b c d Chen, A., Dietrich, K. N., Huo, X., & Ho, S.-m. (2011). Developmental Neurotoxicants in E-Waste: An Emerging Health Concern. Environmental Health Perspectives , 119 (4), 431–438.
^ Chen, Aimin; Dietrich, Kim N.; Huo, Xia; Ho, Shuk-mei (2011-04-01). "Developmental neurotoxicants in e-waste: an emerging health concern". Environmental Health Perspectives. 119 (4): 431–438. ISSN 1552-9924. PMC 3080922 . PMID 21081302. doi:10.1289/ehp.1002452. 
^ "Question 8" (PDF). 
^ "Cadmium (Cd) – Chemical properties, Health and Environmental effects". Lenntech.com. Retrieved 2 June 2014. 
^ a b Liulin, W., Meiling, H., Jing, A., Yufang, Z., Xuetong, W., Yangjun, W., et al. (2011). The cytotoxic and genetoxic effects of dust and soil samples from E-waste recycling area on L02 cells. Toxicology and Industrial Health , 27 (9), 831–839.
^ Birnbaum, LS; Staskal, DF (2004). "Brominated flame retardants: Cause for concern?" (PDF). Environmental Health Perspectives. 112: 9–17. PMC 1241790 . PMID 14698924. doi:10.1289/ehp.6559. 
^ Wu, K., Xu, X., Peng, L., Liu, J., Guo, Y., & Huo, X. (2012). Association between maternal exposure to perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) from electronic waste recycling and neonatal health outcomes. Environment International , 41, 1–8.
^ Becker, Greg; Lee, Chris; Lin, Zuchen (July 2005). "Thermal conductivity in advanced chips: Emerging generation of thermal greases offers advantages". Advanced Packaging: 2–4. Archived from the original on 21 June 2000. Retrieved 4 March 2008. 
^ "Health Effects". United States Department of Labor. Retrieved October 30, 2016. 
^ "ADISA website". Asset Disposal and Information Security Alliance. Retrieved 9 May 2015. 


Further reading[edit]

Hicks, C.; Dietmara, R.; Eugsterb, M. (2005). "The recycling and disposal of electrical and electronic waste in China—legislative and market responses". Environmental Impact Assessment Review. 25 (5): 459–471. ISSN 0195-9255. doi:10.1016/j.eiar.2005.04.007. 
Ogunseitan, O.A.; Schoenung, J.M.; Saphores, J-D.M.; Shapiro, A.A. (2009). "The Electronics Revolution: From E-Wonderland to E-Wasteland". Science. 326: 670–671. PMID 19900918. doi:10.1126/science.1176929. 
Toxics Link (February 2003). "Scrapping the Hi-tech Myth: Computer waste in India". India. Retrieved 25 March 2011. 
Cheng, I-Hwa, E-waste Trafficking: From Your Home to China 
United Nations University: THE GLOBAL E-WASTE MONITOR 2014 – Quantities, flows and resources, 2015
Li, J.; Zeng, X.; Chen, M.; Ogunseitan, O.A.; Stevels, A. (2015). ""Control-Alt-Delete": Rebooting Solutions for the E-Waste Problem". Environmental Science & Technology. 49 (12): 7095–7108. doi:10.1021/acs.est.5b00449. 

External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Electronic waste.



Carroll, Chris (January 2008). "High-Tech Trash". National Geographic Society. 
E-waste management: Scientific Recycling, Green E-products, Stringent Legislation Need of Hour
Sustainable Management of Electronics







v
t
e


Biosolids, waste and waste management



Major types



Agricultural wastewater
Biodegradable waste
Brown waste
Chemical waste
Construction waste
Demolition waste
Electronic waste

by country


Food waste
Green waste
Hazardous waste
Heat waste
Industrial waste
Litter
Marine debris
Biomedical waste
Mining waste
Municipal solid waste
Open defecation
Post-consumer waste
Radioactive waste
Scrap metal
Sewage
Toxic waste
Wastewater








Processes



Anaerobic digestion
Biodegradation
Composting
Garden waste dumping
Illegal dumping
Incineration
Landfill
Landfill mining
Mechanical biological treatment
Mechanical sorting
Open dump
Photodegradation
Recycling
Resource recovery
Sewage treatment
Waste collection
Waste picking
Waste sorting
Waste trade
Waste treatment
Waste-to-energy





Countries



Armenia
Bangladesh
Brazil
Hong Kong
India
Kazakhstan
New Zealand
Russia
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Turkey
UK
US





Agreements



Bamako Convention
Basel Convention
EU directives

batteries
landfills
RoHS
framework
incineration
waste water
WEEE


London Convention
Oslo Convention
OSPAR Convention





Other topics



Blue Ribbon Commission on America's Nuclear Future
Cleaner production
Downcycling
Eco-industrial park
Extended producer responsibility
High-level radioactive waste management
History of waste management
Landfill fire
Sewage regulation and administration
Upcycling
Waste hierarchy
Waste legislation
Waste minimisation
Zero waste








 Environment portal
 Category
 Commons
Concepts
Index
Journals
Lists
Organizations









Authority control



GND: 4324135-9










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Electronic_waste&oldid=791607037"					
Categories: Electronic wasteHidden categories: CS1 errors: external linksUse dmy dates from March 2016Articles needing cleanup from May 2013All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from May 2013Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from May 2013Articles needing additional references from May 2013All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from February 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2016Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתಕನ್ನಡമലയാളംमराठीNederlands日本語PortuguêsRomânăРусскийසිංහලSimple EnglishSlovenščinaSvenskaதமிழ்ไทยTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 10:07.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










E-Waste Systems, Inc.






















































Login

























Home
Customers

Customers Overview
Corporate
Government
Nonprofit
OEM
Retailer


Services

Services Overview
Global Collection & Logistics
Responsible Recycling
Secure Data Destruction
Accredited Repair & Refurbishment
Multi-Channel Remarketing
Energy Saving & Carbon Credit Solutions
Transparent Reporting & Certification
IT Lifecycle Support & Advisory Services


Company

About Us
Team
Advisors
How We Work
Products We Recycle
Contact
Locations
Jobs


Affiliates

Affiliates Overview
Management & Consulting Services
Engineering Solutions
Software Solutions


Investor Relations

Investor Overview
Company Profile
Frequently Asked Questions
SEC Filings
News & Press
















GLOBAL E-WASTE


SOLUTIONS
Customized end-to-end solutions in:
* IT Asset Recovery
* E-Waste Management
* Electronics Reverse Logistics Services








LEADING ENVIRONMENTAL



& SOCIAL STANDARDS

* Highest common denominator
  environmental certification and regulatory
  compliance across jurisdictions * Fair trade principles








STATE-OF-THE-ART



RECYCLING
TECHNOLOGY

Developing and deploying leading
technology for:
* Maximum Value Recovery
* Minimum Environmental Impact


















IT Asset Recovery
Maximum value recovery through qualified restoration of whole units and components for reuse and remarketing.

E-Waste Management
Comprehensive e-waste solutions utilizing state-of-the-art technology and in compliance with the highest environmental standards.

Electronics Reverse Logistics
Optimizing the electronics lifecycle through secure and transparent logistics and expert advisory services.
 


Customers
Comprehensive E-Waste Solutions »



Affiliates
Join the EWSI Network »



Investors
Unique pure play public e-waste opportunity »
 
















 





CORPORATE OFFICES
UNITED STATESCincinnati, Ohio(Office of the Secretary/Treasurer)
      	UNITED KINGDOMLondon, England(Office of the CEO)
      	CHINAShanghai, China 


SERVICES
Overview
Global Collection & Logistics
Responsible Recycling
Secure Data Destruction
Accredited Repair & Refurbishment
Multi-Channel Remarketing
Energy Saving & Carbon Credit Solutions
Transparent Reporting & Certification
IT Lifecycle Support & Advisory Services



CUSTOMERS
Overview
Corporate
Government
Nonprofit
OEM
Retailer
E-Waste Service Providers
AFFILIATES
Overview
Management & Consulting Services
Engineering Solutions
Software Solutions


COMPANY
About Us
Team
Advisors
How We Work
Products We Recycle
Contact
Locations
Jobs
INVESTOR RELATIONS
Overview
Company Profile
FAQ
SEC Filings
News & Press
















				Copyright © 2012 E-Waste Systems, Inc.				

				All images are copyrighted to their respective owners.				












    EWST News - E-Waste Corp. Company News & Press Releases - MarketWatch




































X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

MyRA retirement-savings program to be wound down by Treasury Department »
        




Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers







X

Tweet
 

Share this bulletin

Get news bulletins by email

Bulletin

Consumer-sentiment reading for July is modestly higher »
        

















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































E-Waste Corp.

                  OTC: EWST
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

E-Waste Corp.



Market open
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min



EWST

/quotes/zigman/36481667/delayed


$
0.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume n/a
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/36481667/delayed
Previous close

$



$
				0.00
			
Change

0.00
0.00%





Day low
Day high
n/a
n/a


52 week low
52 week high

            n/a
        

            n/a
        

















/news/latest/company/us/ewst

      MarketWatch News on EWST
    
No News currently available for EWST







/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/ewst

      Other News on EWST
    




 10-Q: E-WASTE CORP.
4:41 p.m. July 17, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-K: E-WASTE CORP.
5:06 p.m. June 8, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: E-WASTE CORP.
3:05 p.m. Jan. 23, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: E-WASTE CORP.
4:52 p.m. Oct. 17, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)









/news/pressrelease/company/us/ewst

      Press Releases on EWST
    
No News currently available for EWST
















Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




10:22 AM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:19aU.S. GDP speeds up to 2.6% in 2nd quarter 
10:17aTime for GOP to face reality: Everybody is going to have health insurance
10:06aStock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses 
10:06aHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
10:05aMinor lift for final consumer sentiment reading in July as partisan divide remains
10:03aU.S. dollar holds decline after consumer sentiment data
10:03aTreasury yields flat after consumer sentiment data 
10:01aFinal UMich consumer sentiment for July was 93.4
10:00aBojangles' shares sink after revenue miss, guidance cut
10:00aTreasury to wind down the myRA retirement savings program
9:58aCan Christopher Nolan’s ‘Dunkirk’ crack China’s market? 
9:55aThis type of investing could save the world — just don’t expect outperformance, too
9:54aThese tips can help advisers attract — and keep — high net worth clients
9:54aA menacing pattern has revealed itself in the stock market
9:53aTeaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
9:45aA case for buying the freakin’ dip with Amazon, as the Mooch might now say
9:43aConsumer-discretionary sector slides as Amazon shares drop on results
9:42aShares of newspaper publisher McClatchy are up more than 2%
9:42a5 cities where you can buy a HUGE house for $100,000 or less
9:42aHow advisers can fight the ‘crisis of trust’ in financial services
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,773.12

-23.43
-0.11%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,351.89

-30.30
-0.47%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,466.42

-9.00
-0.36%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

























































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 


Wastecorp Pumps - Double Disc or Diaphragm Pump?









































UA-60190536-1














About PVP
Products

Pumps

Model 2DDSX05 Pump
Model 3DDSX11 Pump
Model 3DDSX22 Pump
Model 4DDSX30 Pump
Model 6DDSX76 Pump
Model 6DDSX107 Pump
Model 8DDDX214 Pump


Accessories


Operating Principle

Double Disc Pumps™
Cutaway
Applications
Double Disc Pump vs. Diaphragm Pump
Video Demonstrations


Literature
News
Contact
LOGIN



Read MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead MoreRead More

Home / Wastecorp Pumps

Wastecorp Pumps


Wastecorp SludgePro double disc (diaphragm) pumps vs. Penn Valley Double Disc Pump
There are distinct technology differences between a Double Disc Pump and a Diaphragm Pump.  Penn Valley Pump Company manufactures a true double disc pump technology while Wastecorp Pumps manufactures a diaphragm pump they are trying to market as a double disc pump.
Penn Valley Pump – True Double Disc Pump Technology
A true double disc pump technology is based on a “non-captive” free disc design whereby two (2) discs are staged in the pump housing.  These discs work simultaneously together to perform the duties of both the pumping element and valving element.  The hydraulic interaction between the discs creates both vacuum and pressure simultaneously to move fluid from suction to discharge. Since the discs are not captive in the housing they are not subject to the flex fatigue failure pattern associated with captive diaphragm pump designs. The discs are of integral elastomer design with rigid core and do not have any external metal components.  The double disc pump has a short stroke length created by eccentric cams pinned to the drive shaft.  The pump design provides for positive valving on every stroke since the discs are mechanically driven on the seat.  The pump incorporates an inlet side foot valve we termed a clack valve.  This device is a priming and re-priming aid and only sees action under a suction lift condition or when the suction line is under a vacuum condition.  In flooded suction applications this device does not get back to the seating surface and does not valve.  The pump will operate without the clack valve on flooded suction applications.   This unique design allows the pump to pass larger solids, rags and debris that will cause designs with internal check valves to clog and fail. 
Wastecorp Pump Technology
The Wastecorp pump technology incorporates one (1) “captive” diaphragm that is “sandwiched” between the pump housing and retaining mechanism. Each diaphragm pump is a simplex unit that contains one diaphragm and two ball check valves.   A duplex diaphragm pump adds another simplex pump in parallel and then drives it with a common motor.  A triplex pump adds a third and so on in order to accomplish higher flow rates. The center of the diaphragm is mechanically attached to a connecting rod that raises and lowers the diaphragm on every revolution.  The stroke length is large and leads to a flexing the diaphragm twice (upstroke and down stroke) per revolution.  This design also requires the use of internal check valves (ball or flapper) for operation.  Without these check valves the pump will not operate.  
The “Achilles” heel of the diaphragm pump technology has always been the flex fatigue life of the diaphragm and the clogging of the ball check valves.  The check valves rely on gravity to get back to the seating surface and when debris gets trapped between the ball valve and seat the unit stops pumping.  The reason these designs have a quick release cap to access the ball valve is that clogging is a frequent occurrence requiring the check valve to be accessed and the debris removed so the pump can be made operational again. 
The typical operating life between rebuilds for a double disc pump is thousands of hours since the discs are not captive and therefore not subject to flex fatigue failure.  Industry feedback on the diaphragm pump technology is that the lifespan of the diaphragm only lasts in the hundreds of hours given the flexing action of the diaphragm.  This is a significant difference in the pump technologies and therefore the reliability and long-term operational costs between a double disc pump and diaphragm pump. 
Wastecorp Pumps – Not A Double Disc Pump
Wastecorp has manufactured the Mudsucker® brand diaphragm pump technology for many years and properly called it a diaphragm pump. This technology has never been accepted in the marketplace as an “equal” to the Penn Valley double disc pump and in fact has never been offered as an “or equal” before. It has only been seen as a contractor’s pump and used in relatively light duty applications due the limited run hours between diaphragm failure and low head limitations.  It was not until January of 2014 that Wastecorp began marketing the Sludge Pro® branded pump as a double disc pump. They modified the bearing pedestal design so externally the pump looks similar to our design. They renamed the diaphragm a “trunnion” and the external metal plate that attaches the connecting rod to the diaphragm a “disc”. There appears to be no other differences between the Mudsucker Pump and Sludge Pro pump. 
Wastecorp literature suggests the Mudsucker pump has an average speed of 60RPM with head limitations of 50 vertical feet and 100 horizontal feed.  That would be a maximum limitation of 50ft TDH or 21.6 psi.  Wastecorp now says their double disc (diaphragm) pump can be operated up to 110RPM with total heads to 184ft TDH. Higher speeds and heads will greatly impact the life of the diaphgram exponentially.
PUMP COMPARISON:Double Disc Pump vs. Mechanical Diaphragm Pump



Features
Penn Valley Pump – Double Disc Pump
Wastecorp Pumps – SludgePro Double Disc “Diaphragm” Pump


Technology
A true double disc pump technology based on “non-captive” free-floating disc design whereby two independent discs perform duties of both pump and valve.  Short stroke length not subject to flex fatigue failure and operates into the thousands of hours between rebuilds.
A traditional single “captive” diaphragm technology that requires internal ball check valves for operation. Long stroke length and captive diaphragm leads to flex fatigue failures in the hundreds of hours.


Discs
Integral (no external metal components) reinforced elastomeric component that is both the pumping and valving element.
Wastecorp’s disc is external metal plates that sandwiches diaphragm from above and below.


Trunnion
Sealing device in a true double disc technology that is molded to flex only in the downward stroke extending flex life. Provides no pumping action. Only 9” diameter on largest model and reinforced to eliminate catastrophic failure.
Diaphragm has been renamed a trunnion based on PVP terminology.  This is a captive device that is 14” diameter and flexes on both upward and downward stroke leading to twice the flexure rate and therefore shorter life.


Drive Arrangement
Inexpensive to replace, simple V-belt and Pulley Drive System.
Expensive to replace mechanical gear-motor arrangement close coupled to drive shaft.


Pump Drive Assembly
Short stroke length cam arrangement. Utilizes non-corrosive lightweight aluminum modular pedestals and connecting rods. Eccentric cams are cast bronze-alloy and pinned to shaft with Spirol® drive pins that absorb reciprocating load of pump.
Long-stroke cam arrangement. Utilizes ductile iron pedestals, connecting rods and eccentric cams which rust and corrode. Cams are keyed to shaft with traditional keyway and setscrew arrangement which is inferior for reciprocating loads.


Internal Check Valves
A double disc pump does not have internal check valves. The inlet clack valve is a priming device that only operates under suction lift and high vacuum installation. Pump works without this device on flooded suction applications.
Pump will not operate without the 5-1/4” ball check valves or flapper check valves on suction and discharge side. These items rely on gravity to get back to seat and if there is debris on seat the pumping stops.


Pumping Action
Short stroke length produces small pulses and relatively smooth flows.
Long stroke length produces large pulses and large pressure spikes in flow.


Maintenance
Maintain-in-Place design with integral hinged housings. Allows pump to be serviced without removing pump from mounting frame or disturbing piping.  Staged assembly allows for disassembly one section at a time.
Pedestal assembly requires complete removal when diaphragm fails.  On multiplex units all pedestals have to be removed even when only one diaphragm fails. Ball check valves clog requiring frequent clean out.


Base Frame and Covers
Standard in SS304
Carbon Steel, painted. Pumps must be mounted on elevated concrete foundation that is the owners or contractors responsibility.


Pump Configurations
Units are simplex design with single motor. Provides easier maintenance.
Duplex, Triplex and Quadraplex units are large footprint with multiple pumps mani-folded together and driven by single motor.


Installations
Over 10,000 units installed and operating in North America.
Introduced pump to market in January 20014. Few if any installations for this branded technology and none long-term.


Spare Parts
All parts kept in stock for same day shipment.
???


Warranty
Two (2) Years
One (1) Year


Company Established
1980
2005 (Based on LLC origination)


Manufacturing Location
Made in the USA
Product Made in Canada, Holding company in the US.



It is clear that Wastecorp decided to reconfigure their pump and call it a double disc pump with the hope to capitalize on the successes of this technology over the last 37 years. The use of the double disc name, along with renaming the diaphragm a “trunnion” and the external metal plate a “disc” is a direct attempt to confuse the marketplace into thinking this new line of pumps is the same as our technology. The Wastecorp SludgePro pump is a diaphragm pump and changing the name and copying our terminology does not change this fact.
Check the Facts
We encourage you to conduct the proper due diligence in investigating the differences in the technologies and long-term operating installations.









 Call for immediate Sales Assistance.
 Our Maintain In Place™  system makes the disassembly and reassembly of our pumps fast and easy. Click [HERE] to learn how.

 Upgrade/Exchange your PumpNobody knows your Double Disc Pumps™ better than the pros at Penn Valley Pump. Click [HERE] to learn more.
 Let us pump your sludge.Then you be the judge. Put our pumps to the test. Click [HERE] to take advantage of our "Swap Your Pump" Program challenge.











ProductsModel 2DDSX05 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 3DDSX11 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 3DDSX22 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 4DDSX30 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 6DDSX76 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 6DDSX107 Double Disc Pumps™
Model 8DDDX214 Double Disc Pumps™
Accessories
Penn Valley Pump Co.About Penn Valley Pump Company
The Operating Principle
Maintenance & Operating Costs
Applications
Double Disc Pump vs. Diaphragm Pump
Video Demonstrations
Upgrade/Exchange Program
Swap Your Pump Program
Literature
News
Contact 
 
 
Penn Valley Pump Company, Inc.
998 Easton Road, Warrington, PA 18976
Tel: (215) 343-8750  Fax: (215) 343-8753
Web: www.pennvalleypump.com 
Email: info@pennvalleypump.com
 
Website Design & Maintenanceby the Russell-Risko Agency


© Copyright 2011-2017. Penn Valley Pump Company, Inc. All rights reserved. Any and all specifications are subject to change.





	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































